Outline of the Law Governing Lawyers
Selection of Rules
John Steele





 

JOHN STEELE, ATTORNEY AT LAW
2225 E. BAYSHORE ROAD; SUITE 200
PALO ALTO, CA 94303
WWW.JOHNSTEELELAW.COM
JOHN.STEELE@JOHNSTEELELAW.COM

© John Steele (2012-2020)
 
 



ABOUT THE AUTHOR: John Steele is a solo practitioner, representing clients on matters of legal ethics, professional liability, risk management, and the law of lawyering.  For over fifteen years, he served as the top internal ethics lawyer at an AmLaw 100 firm, where he was Special Counsel for Ethics, and at an AmLaw 200 firm, where he was a trial lawyer and litigation partner.  He has taught professional responsibility for over thirty semesters at UC-Berkeley School of Law, Stanford Law School, Santa Clara University, Golden Gate University, and Indiana University – Maurer School of Law.  The Second Circuit recently cited and relied upon a law review article authored by Mr. Steele in a case of first impression on an important conflict of interest issue.  (GSI Commerce Solutions  v. BabyCenter, LLC, 618 F.3d 204 (2nd Cir. 2010)) He has served on a variety of professional committees, including the State Bar of California’s standing Committee on Professional Responsibility and Conduct (COPRAC), and serves an arbitrator in fee disputes. He speaks widely to professional audiences, including providing CLE credits, on issues of legal ethics and risk management, elimination of bias in the legal profession, substance abuse, and law practice management, and is a co-founder of a leading blog on legal ethics, LEGAL ETHICS FORUM (www.legalethicsforum.com).  
ABOUT THE ILLUSTRATIONS ON THE COVER: The two illustrations symbolize the same concept: the lawyer’s duties to the client are balanced against the lawyer’s duties to society in general and to particular social systems (e.g., courts, the public markets, etc.) with which the lawyer is interacting. 
FUNDAMENTAL AXIOMS OF LEGAL ETHICS: In criminal prosecutions, the prosecutor owes fair process and a fair result to the accused and to society; in all other matters, the lawyer owes fair process to society and owes to the client as advantageous a result as the relevant legal process provides; in particular, in criminal defense matters, lawyers for the accused may present false theories but may not present false evidence. 
COPYRIGHT: No copyright claim is made regarding the rules. 


 
TABLE OF CONTENTS
I. Regulation of the Legal Profession	1
A.	Who Regulates the Profession?	1
1.	State courts (especially state supreme courts).	1
2.	State bar associations	1
3.	State legislatures	1
4.	Substantive state law	1
5.	Federal law	1
6.	The American Bar Association (ABA) does not formally regulate the legal profession.	2
B.	Admission to the Profession.	2
1.	Truthfulness in admission process	2
2.	Character & Fitness (“C&F”) requirement	2
3.	Valid and invalid considerations in C&F determinations for admission	3
C.	Regulation after Admission	4
1.	Bar Discipline.  We need to distinguish the “discipline” systems from other legal regimes that punish bad lawyers	4
2.	Professional discipline - substantive violations.  Lawyers are subject to professional discipline for:	4
3.	Professional Discipline - procedures and law.	4
D.	Peer Responsibility for Regulation of Lawyers	5
1.	Supervisors and subordinates	5
2.	Law firms	6
3.	Mandatory reporting (8.3)	6
E.	Legal Regimes Governing Lawyers	7
1.	Criminal Law.  Questions involving criminal law often have to do with theft, bribery, obstruction of justice, and extortion.	7
2.	Disciplinary Process.	7
3.	Civil Law.	7
4.	Disqualification Law.	7
5.	Litigation Sanctions.	7
II. Lawyers’ Over-arching Duties to the Legal Profession	7
A.	Obey the Law	7
1.	Do not commit, counsel, or assist criminal conduct. (1.2(d))	7
2.	Do not commit, counsel, or assist fraudulent conduct. (1.2(d))	7
3.	Exceptions:	7
 
B.	Maintain Professional Boundaries: Who May Practice Law & Where	8
1.	Lawyers may not engage in or facilitate the unauthorized practice of law (“UPL”) by non-lawyers or by lawyers practicing law outside the jurisdiction where they are licensed.  (5.5)	8
2.	Non-legal work (“Law Related Services”) by licensed lawyer.	8
3.	Lawyers shall not practice law where not admitted.  (5.5)	9
C.	Maintain Professional Boundaries: Financial Participation in the Legal Profession	10
1.	A lawyer must maintain the independence, including the financial independence, of the legal profession.	10
2.	The general rule is that a lawyer may not share legal fees with a non-lawyer.  (5.4)	10
3.	When a non-client pays the lawyer’s fees, or when a non-client recommends that the lawyer be hired, the lawyer must not allow that non-client to direct or regulate the lawyer’s judgment or interfere with the attorney client relationship.  (5.4(c))	10
4.	The practice of law with non-lawyers is not permitted.	10
5.	Contractual restrictions on practice:	11
6.	Selling a law practice is permitted under certain conditions.  (1.17)	11
D.	Pro Bono and Public Service (6.1)	12
1.	In general, lawyers are called to participate in efforts to improve the quality of justice and access to justice.	12
2.	Types of public service.	12
III. Getting Clients: Communications, Advertising, Solicitation, and Referrals	12
A.	The Constitutional Limitations on Regulation of Lawyer Speech	12
1.	Speech seeking pecuniary (i.e., for profit) employment is commercial speech and as such it enjoys intermediate constitutional protection.	12
2.	State governments can, and do, ban false or misleading speech by lawyers.	12
3.	State governments can, and do, ban lawyer speech likely to result in coercion, harassment, and duress.	13
B.	Definitions and Rules	13
1.	“Communications”	13
2.	“Advertising”	13
3.	“Solicitations”	13
C.	Firm Names and Letterheads (7.5)	14
1.	Can’t be false or misleading	14
2.	Trade names are permitted, but	14
3.	Geographic use of names	14
4.	Lawyer holding public office	15
 
D.	Referrals by Others	15
1.	Basic rule: except as otherwise provided in the rules, “lawyers are not permitted to pay others for channeling professional work” to the lawyer.  (Comment [5] to Rule 7.2)	15
2.	Forbidden referrals	15
3.	Permitted forms of referrals and practices akin to referrals	16
4.	Note that fee splitting sometimes resembles referral fees, particularly when a lawyer refers a matter to a specialist but retains a fee split on the matter.  Fee splitting with a lawyer in another firm is discussed below at §IVH2e.	16
IV. Duties between Lawyers and Clients during the Attorney Client Relationship	16
A.	Lawyerly Rights and Duties Before the Attorney Client Relationship (“ACR”) is Created:	16
1.	The lawyer is governed by the rules on advertising and solicitation (see, §III.B)	16
2.	Meetings with prospective clients (1.18)	16
B.	Accepting and Rejecting ACRs	17
1.	“Must” ACRs	17
2.	“Should” ACRs	17
3.	“May Not” ACRs.  Lawyers may not undertake or continue representations where:	17
C.	Creation of the ACR	18
1.	Tests for creation	18
2.	Definition of the ACR:	18
D.	Client Identity	18
1.	Having natural person clients (i.e., human beings) often raises some ethics issues	18
2.	Organizations as clients. (1.13).	19
3.	Multiple Clients	21
E.	Scope of the Engagement. (1.2)	22
1.	Lawyer and client may reasonably limit the scope of the representation or the tactics used.	22
2.	Client must give informed consent to such limitations.	22
F.	Duties Flowing from Lawyer to Client during ACR (Fiduciary Duties) (1.x)	22
1.	Decision-making and power sharing.  (“Abide & Consult”) (1.2)	22
2.	Communication (1.4)	23
3.	Competence (1.1)	23
4.	Diligence/Zeal.  (1.3)	24
5.	Confidentiality, Privilege, and Work Product Protection (1.6; common law)	25
6.	Loyalty. (1.7-1.12)	29
 
7.	Independent Judgment. (2.1)	37
8.	Safeguarding Property	37
G.	Duties Related to Attorneys’ Fees	39
1.	Clients may owe lawyers contractual duties, whereas lawyers owe clients fiduciary duties.	39
2.	Fees	39
H.	Termination of the ACR	40
1.	Tribunal’s permission needed after appearance:	40
2.	Termination by Client:	41
3.	Termination by Lawyer: “Shall” withdraw (1.16(a)) if:	41
4.	Termination by Lawyer: “May” withdraw 1.16(b)) if:	41
5.	Termination by completion of assigned task	42
6.	Termination by operation of law occurs upon:	42
7.	Procedure for withdrawal:	42
8.	Duties pertaining to termination:	43
I.	Post-Termination Duties (duties surviving termination of the ACR).	43
1.	Rules pertaining to confidentiality survive the ACR.  (e.g., MR 1.6; 1.9(a)-(c))	43
2.	Lawyer must forward to client or successor counsel any communications the lawyer receives pertaining to the terminated ACR. (Rest LGL §33(2)(c))	44
3.	The duty of loyalty survives the ACR to the extent the conflict of interest rules turn on the terminated lawyer’s receipt or possession of client confidences.  (e.g., MR 1.6; 1.9(a)-(c))	44
4.	There are a few cases dealing with unusual fact patterns that suggest that a lawyer has a continuing duty of loyalty that precludes the lawyer from attacking her own work product or the subject matter that was the focus of her prior efforts for the former client.	44
V. Lawyers’ Duties to Third Parties and Social Systems during the Attorney Client Relationship	44
A.	Duties to Non-clients during the ACR	44
1.	Duties to All Third Parties	44
2.	Duties to Represented Persons (4.2)(the “no contact rule”)	45
3.	Duties to Unrepresented Parties (4.3)	46
B.	Role-Based Duties to Social Systems during the ACR	46
1.	Litigator/Advocate	46
2.	Evaluator (2.3)	49
3.	Counselor/Advisor	49
4.	Negotiator	49
Appendix A Concise Summary of Consents under ABA Model Rules	51
Appendix B Detailed Summary of Consent, Disclosure, and Notification in the ABA Model Rules and the California Rules of Professional Conduct	52
I. ABA Model Rules of Professional Conduct	52
A.	By Rule	52
B.	By Type	53
Appendix C Principal Differences between California and ABA Ethics Rules	55
Appendix D Catalog of Ethics Issues Raised on Recent California Bar Examination Essay Questions	57
Appendix F A Mnemonic-Driven Model for PR Essay Questions on the Bar Examination	60
Appendix H Spotting Issues of Fee Sharing, Fee Splitting and Referral Fees	65
Appendix I Summary of Exceptions to the Duty of Confidentiality	66


RULES


PREAMBLE AND SCOPE	67
RULE 1.0:	TERMINOLOGY	70
RULE 1.1	COMPETENCE	72
RULE 1.2:	SCOPE OF REPRESENTATION AND ALLOCATION OF AUTHORITY BETWEEN CLIENT AND LAWYER	74
RULE 1.3:	DILIGENCE	76
RULE 1.4	COMMUNICATIONS	77
RULE 1.5:	FEES	78
RULE 1.6:	CONFIDENTIALITY OF INFORMATION	81
RULE 1.7:	CONFLICT OF INTEREST - CURRENT CLIENTS	85
RULE 1.8:	CURRENT CLIENTS – SPECIFIC RULES	91
RULE 1.9:	DUTIES TO FORMER CLIENTS	97
RULE 1.10:	IMPUTATION OF CONFLICTS OF INTEREST – GENERAL RULE	99
RULE 1.11:	SPECIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST FOR FORMER AND CURRENT GOVERNMENT OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES	101
RULE 1.12:	FORMER JUDGE, ARBITRATOR, MEDIATOR OR OTHER THIRD-PARTY NEUTRAL	103
RULE 1.13:	ORGANIZATION AS CLIENT	104
RULE 1.14:	CLIENT WITH DIMINISHED CAPACITY	108
RULE 1.15:	SAFEKEEPING PROPERTY	110
RULE 1.16:	DECLINING OR TERMINATING REPRESENTATION	111
RULE 1.17:	SALE OF LAW PRACTICE	113
RULE 1.18:	DUTIES TO PROSPECTIVE CLIENT	115
RULE 2.1:	ADVISOR	117
RULE 2.2:	DELETED	118
RULE 2.3:	EVALUATION FOR USE BY THIRD PERSONS	118
RULE 2.4:	LAWYER SERVING AS THIRD-PARTY NEUTRAL	119
RULE 3.1:	MERITORIOUS CLAIMS & CONTENTIONS	120
RULE 3.2:	EXPEDITING LITIGATION	121
RULE 3.3:	CANDOR TOWARD THE TRIBUNAL	121
RULE 3.4:	FAIRNESS TO OPPOSING PARTY & COUNSEL	124
RULE 3.5:	IMPARTIALITY & DECORUM OF THE TRIBUNAL	125
RULE 3.6:	TRIAL PUBLICITY	126
RULE 3.7:	LAWYER AS WITNESS	128
RULE 3.8:	SPECIAL RESPONSIBILITIES OF A PROSECUTOR	130
RULE 3.9:	ADVOCATE IN NONADJUDICATIVE PROCEEDINGS	132
RULE 4.1:	TRUTHFULNESS IN STATEMENTS TO OTHERS	132
RULE 4.2:	COMMUNICATION WITH PERSON REPRESENTED BY COUNSEL	133
RULE 4.3:	DEALING WITH UNREPRESENTED PERSON	134
RULE 4.4:	RESPECT FOR RIGHTS OF THIRD PERSONS	135
RULE 5.1:	RESPONSIBILITIES OF A PARTNER OR SUPERVISORY LAWYER	136
RULE 5.2:	RESPONSIBILITIES OF A SUBORDINATE LAWYER	137
RULE 5.3:	RESPONSIBILITIES REGARDING NONLAWYER ASSISTANT	138
RULE 5.4:	PROFESSIONAL INDEPENDENCE OF A LAWYER	139
RULE 5.5:	UNAUTHORIZED PRACTICE OF LAW; MULTIJURISDICTIONAL PRACTICE OF LAW	140
RULE 5.6:	RESTRICTIONS ON RIGHTS TO PRACTICE	144
RULE 5.7:	RESPONSIBILITIES REGARDING LAW-RELATED SERVICES	144
RULE 6.1:	VOLUNTARY PRO BONO PUBLICO SERVICE	146
RULE 6.2:	ACCEPTING APPOINTMENTS	148
RULE 6.3:	MEMBERSHIP IN LEGAL SERVICES ORGANIZATION	149
RULE 6.4:	LAW REFORM ACTIVITIES AFFECTING CLIENT INTERESTS	149
RULE 6.5:	NONPROFIT & COURT-ANNEXED LIMITED LEGAL SERVICES PROGRAMS	150
RULE 7.1:	COMMUNICATION CONCERNING A LAWYER'S SERVICES	150
RULE 7.2:	ADVERTISING	151
RULE 7.3:	DIRECT CONTACT WITH PROSPECTIVE CLIENTS	154
RULE 7.4:	COMMUNICATION OF FIELDS OF PRACTICE & SPECIALIZATION	156
RULE 7.5:	FIRM NAMES & LETTERHEAD	156
RULE 7.6:	POLITICAL CONTRIBUTIONS TO OBTAIN LEGAL ENGAGEMENTS OR APPOINTMENTS BY JUDGES	156
RULE 8.1:	BAR ADMISSION & DISCIPLINARY MATTERS	157
RULE 8.2:	JUDICIAL & LEGAL OFFICIALS	157
RULE 8.3:	REPORTING PROFESSIONAL MISCONDUCT	158
RULE 8.4:	MISCONDUCT	159
RULE 8.5:	DISCIPLINARY AUTHORITY; CHOICE OF LAW	160
 
I. REGULATION OF THE LEGAL PROFESSION
A.	Who Regulates the Profession?
1.	State courts (especially state supreme courts).
a.	State supreme courts oversee the legal profession in that state and manage the state bars and discipline process.
b.	State trial and appellate courts regulate lawyers appearing before them.  This includes rules of procedure, discovery rules, and, in federal courts, Federal Rule of Civil Procedure 11, which forbids frivolous and baseless litigation and tactics.
2.	State bar associations
a.	Mandatory bars.  (All lawyers who wish to practice law in that state must join the bar association; majority approach in the US.)
b.	Voluntary bars.   (Lawyers decide if they wish to join the bar association; minority approach in the US.)
3.	State legislatures
a.	When a state legislature attempts to regulate the bar, there is a potential separation of powers issue under that state’s constitution.  States vary in how aggressively they protect the state supreme court’s control over the bar.
b.	California has extensive legislative control over the bar.  In the State Bar Act (Cal. Bus. &Prof. Code § 6000, et seq.), the legislature has pervasively regulated the formation and operation of the bar.  
(1)	Fee agreements are regulated in the State Bar Act.
(2)	Due to historical accident, the lawyer’s duty of confidentiality was defined by the legislature in the State Bar Act, rather than in the ethics rules (i.e., the California Rules of Professional Conduct).  Today, the ethics rules mirror the State Bar Act regarding the duty of confidentiality.
(3)	The State Bar of California is a public corporation created by statute, and all licensed lawyers are members of the corporation.
4.	Substantive state law
a.	Criminal law governs lawyers.
b.	Civil law governs lawyers.  This includes the law of legal malpractice, breach of fiduciary duty, and fraud.
5.	Federal law
a.	Agency ethics codes.  Most federal agencies have promulgated ethics codes for the lawyers appearing and practicing before the agency.  For examples, pursuant to the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, the Securities and Exchange Commission, which regulates publicly traded companies, has issued an ethics code for lawyers appearing and practicing before the SEC.
b.	Legislation. Increasingly, Congress has passed legislation that appears to apply to activity commonly undertaken by lawyers. Because the regulation of lawyering has traditionally been a matter of state law, the ABA and lawyers have asked the federal courts to interpret such laws not to include lawyers. But the current US Supreme Court seems inclined to interpret those laws of general applicability to include lawyers.
Example:  Congress passed a law forbidding all persons from advising people to load up on additional debt just before filing for bankruptcy. The United States Supreme Court held that the law applied to lawyers. 
c.	Agency regulation.  Increasingly, federal agencies are seeking to substantively regulate the practice of law.  For example, the FTC has attempted to regulate lawyers to the extent that they are creditors of clients.
d.	Court rules and procedures.  Codes of civil procedure often regulate the advocacy of the lawyers appearing before the court.  Perhaps the best known example is Rule 11 of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, which limits frivolous advocacy.
e.	Federal treaty obligations.  Increasingly, the federal government is entering into trade agreements and other international commitments that regulate legal practice.  Because federal law is the supreme law of the land, these regulations may preempt traditional, state-based regulations.
Example: Suppose that during a round of international trade talks, the United States agrees that Australian lawyers may represent Australian citizens on legal matters even when the Australian lawyers are located in the United States. Such a federal law would preempt state regulation of the practice of law and the states would not have the power to forbid the Australian lawyers from doing what the federal law permits.
6.	The American Bar Association (ABA) does not formally regulate the legal profession.
Its ethics rules are simply a model code that states are free to adopt, modify, or reject.  But the ABA does exert enormous influence over the regulation of the legal profession at the state and federal level  by promulgating standards that are adopted by courts, agencies, and bar associations.
B.	Admission to the Profession.
1.	Truthfulness in admission process
a.	When applying for admission to the bar, a strong duty of candor is required.
b.	Applicants can make no false statements when applying for admission. (8.1(a)).
c.	Applicants have an affirmative duty to respond to questions from admissions authorities. (8.1(b))
d.	Applicants have an affirmative duty to correct any factual misapprehension of the authorities (8.1(b)).
e.	This strong duty of truthfulness also applies when lawyers are being disciplined.
Example: Applicant realizes that the state bar’s admissions committee mistakenly believes that applicant has no prior arrests. Even if applicant did not create the confusion, lie about arrests, or conceal arrests, applicant has a duty to dispel the committee’s misapprehension.
2.	Character & Fitness (“C&F”) requirement
a.	This is a constitutionally permitted requirement.
b.	Right to due process hearing.
c.	Rehabilitation is considered.  (E.g., lawyers who have suffered from mental illness or substance abuse, or who have committed a crime, may offer evidence of rehabilitation.)
3.	Valid and invalid considerations in C&F determinations for admission
a.	Valid considerations in C&F determinations
(1)	Criminal conduct.
(2)	Concealment of bad acts.
(3)	Advocating unlawful or violent overthrow of the government.  (Note: a lawyer may not advocate unlawful, violent or illegal overthrow of the government.  Lawyers may advocate peaceful or lawful changes in government.)
(4)	The applicant’s refusal/agreement to take an oath of allegiance to laws and constitution may be considered.
(5)	Acts of moral turpitude (i.e., acts showing lack of honesty), which include:
Definition:  This unusual term, “moral turpitude,” is a key term of art in the law of lawyering.  Learn it! Although modern legal ethics codes use the term less frequently than in the past, the term refers to conduct that is inherently deceitful and immoral.  Getting a parking ticket isn’t an act of turpitude.  But lying about getting a ticket is. Moral turpitude includes:
(a)	Dishonesty and fraud.
(b)	Theft
(c)	Concealment of improper conduct.
(d)	Conduct prejudicial to justice.
(e)	Suggesting that you possess improper influence over judges and officials.
(f)	Assisting a judge or official violate their ethics and rules.
(g)	Note: A lawyer may be disciplined for acts of moral turpitude occurring anywhere in their life—not just for acts while lawyering.
Example: Lawyer, who is licensed to practice in Montana, takes a vacation in Hawaii, enters a fishing contest, and lies about his catch in order to win a trophy. Result: lawyer has committed an act of moral turpitude and may be disciplined by the state bar in Montana.
b.	Invalid considerations in C&F determinations:
(1)	Citizenship, state or federal. 
(2)	Residency.
(3)	Political views. 
C.	Regulation after Admission
1.	Bar Discipline.  We need to distinguish the “discipline” systems from other legal regimes that punish bad lawyers
a.	The “discipline system” is typically run by the state bar or by volunteers working for it.  (Discipline can also be administered within a federal agency or a federal court.) Historically, it’s usually been considered quasi-criminal and punitive in nature, because it has the power to forbid a person from pursuing his or her occupation.  (More recently, some states are trying to make state bar discipline more like any other administrative licensing process and less like a quasi-penal process.) The discipline system cannot impose money damages or incarceration; it can impose disbarment, suspension, probation, and censure (admonishment), and fees and costs of the discipline process.  
b.	Other regimes.  As we will discuss below, (§ I.D.) lawyers can also be subjected to criminal prosecution; civil law suits for negligence, breach of fiduciary duty, or breach of contract; motions to disqualify the lawyer from further participation in a matter; and discovery sanctions for abusive positions in civil or criminal pretrial discovery.  Try to keep these regimes distinct as you discuss and analyze them.  They have different purposes and standards.
2.	Professional discipline - substantive violations.  Lawyers are subject to professional discipline for:
a.	Criminal conduct.
b.	Non-criminal acts of “moral turpitude.”
c.	Violations of the ethics rules.
d.	Secondary liability for misconduct. Lawyers may be disciplined for:
(1)	Assisting other lawyers or judges to commit disciplinable offenses.
(2)	Using others to commit offenses on their behalf.
3.	Professional Discipline - procedures and law.
a.	The process normally includes a written complaint; an opportunity to respond; a hearing; and an appeal.
b.	Lawyer owes the “duty of candor” to the disciplinary authorities.  Lawyers being disciplined have the same strong duty of candor toward the disciplinary authorities that applies to people seeking admission to the bar, as discussed above at §IB1.
(1)	The lawyer has no right to refuse to incriminate herself. 
c.	Lawyer has due process rights.
d.	Disabilities (e.g., alcoholism) are considered and opportunities to attempt rehabilitation should be afforded.
e.	Choice of law:
(1)	When the alleged violation occurred before a court or tribunal, the ethics rules of that tribunal govern the lawyer’s conduct.
Example: Lawyer is licensed to practice in Wyoming and then is admitted to practice pro hac vice (“for that matter”) in Colorado, where lawyer engages in fraud during a trial. Lawyer is subject to discipline in both Wyoming and Colorado, and the ethics rules of Colorado will apply in the discipline proceedings in Wyoming and Colorado.  (Note: The ethics rules of both states are probably identical on that issue, but that’s not true for all ethical violations.)
(2)	For other violations, the site of bad conduct governs.  For the vast majority of discipline matters, that will be a state where the lawyer is licensed and practices laws.
f.	Collateral use of finding of discipline violation:
(1)	States make automatic collateral use of discipline imposed by other   state bars.
Example: A lawyer is licensed in Maryland and California. The State Bar of Maryland finds that the lawyer violated its ethics rules. The State Bar of California would discipline the lawyer without an independent hearing on whether the lawyer violated Maryland’s ethics rules.
(2)	Federal courts undertake independent investigations and do not make collateral use of the discipline findings of other bars.
Example: Lawyer is licensed in Maryland and California, including the USDC for the District of Northern California. The State Bar of Maryland finds that the lawyer violated its ethics rules. The USDC for the Northern District of California would not discipline the lawyer based solely upon the findings of the Maryland bar, but rather would open an independent investigation of the lawyer’s conduct. 
D.	Peer Responsibility for Regulation of Lawyers
1.	Supervisors and subordinates
a.	The rules (5.1) mention two kinds of bosses:
(1)	“Partners” and persons of “comparable managerial authority,” “whether they be in law firms or law departments, must ensure that the firm has “measures,” that is, “internal policies and procedures,” giving reasonable assurances that the firm’s lawyers are conforming to the ethics rules. (5.1)
(a)	They must also have measures to ensure that any non-lawyers they supervise behave in a way that is compatible with the lawyer’s ethical duties. (5.3)
(2)	Lawyers with “direct supervisory authority over other lawyers” shall take reasonable steps to ensure that the supervised lawyer is conforming to the ethics rules. (5.1) 
(a)	They must also take steps to ensure that any non-lawyers they supervise are acting in ways that are compatible with the supervisor-lawyer’s ethical duties. (5.3)
(3)	Both kinds of bosses are responsible for ethical breaches by other lawyers or non-lawyers if the boss orders or ratifies the breach, or fails to mitigate or avoid the breach at a time when the boss could have done so. (5.1; 5.3)
b.	Subordinates are bound by ethics rules notwithstanding a supervisor’s orders. (5.2)
(1)	Exception: In response to disciplinary charges, subordinates can raise an affirmative defense that they were “following orders” of a supervisor if the supervisor’s orders were a “reasonable resolution of arguable question” of ethics (“RRAQ”). (5.2)
Example: Partner and Associate disagree on whether a request for production of documents requires them to produce a particular document. After debating the merits, Associate believes that the rules of ethics and the rules of civil procedure are best read to require production. The Associate also reasonably concludes that a reasonable person could draw the opposite conclusion. The Partner instructs the Associate not to produce the document and she therefore does not produce it. Result: Associate has not breached her ethical duties.
Example: Partner failed to finish and serve her opposition to a summary judgment motion by the due date. Partner instructs Associate to backdate the proof of service to make it appear that the opposition was served on time. Associate complies with Partner’s instructions. Result: Associate has breached his ethical duties, because this is not a “reasonable resolution of an arguable question.”
2.	Law firms
a.	Definition: under the ABA approach, a “firm” is any group of lawyers working together as a unit. This would include private practice firms the in-house legal department at a corporation, the group of lawyers working at the City Attorney’s office, and other similar groups. (1.0(c))
b.	Under the majority approach in the United States, law firms do not have ethical duties. Only individual lawyers do! But, because law firms have partners and “supervisory lawyers,” as discussed above, those kinds of lawyers within the firm will have an ethical duty to regulate legal practice within the firm. 
c.	Firms cannot be disciplined under ABA scheme.
Example: Junior lawyers at a private practice firm are stealing money from a client. A partner learns of the theft but does nothing to prevent it or rectify it. The junior lawyers and the partner would be subject to discipline, but the firm itself would not.
3.	Mandatory reporting (8.3)
a.	Lawyers are required to report to the state bar any breach of the ethics rules that raises a “substantial question” about a lawyer’s honesty, trustworthiness, or fitness to practice.
b.	Lawyers are required to report to appropriate judicial discipline authorities any judge’s breach of the rules of judicial conduct that raises a “substantial question as to the judge’s fitness for office.”
Example: A lawyer sees a judge park in a no-parking zone, step out of her car, and take a bribe from a criminal accused. The lawyer has a duty to report the bribe but has no duty to report the parking violation. 
c.	The reporting duty does not require revelation of client confidences.  But, if revelation would not prejudice the client, the lawyer “should” ask the client for permission to reveal the bad conduct.
d.	The reporting duty doesn’t apply to conduct that the lawyer learned through participation in a Lawyer’s Assistance Program (such as, “Alcoholics Anonymous” programs run by the state bar for lawyers suffering from substance abuse or related problems).
E.	Legal Regimes Governing Lawyers
(The questions on the MPRE usually indicate the legal regime that is being used to govern the lawyer’s conduct. It’s important to recognize the different regimes.)
1.	Criminal Law.  Questions involving criminal law often have to do with theft, bribery, obstruction of justice, and extortion. 
a.	Also, because the United States Constitution guarantees a criminal accused effective assistance of counsel, there is a category of conduct, “ineffective assistance of counsel,” that applies to inadequate lawyering on behalf of a criminal accused. That category is sometimes called “IAC.”
2.	Disciplinary Process.
Questions involving discipline typically involve breaches of the ethics rules and the general prohibition against acts of moral turpitude.
3.	Civil Law.
Questions involving civil liability often involve claims of legal malpractice, misrepresentation, and breach of fiduciary duty.
4.	Disqualification Law.
Questions asking whether the lawyer is subject to disqualification primarily involve the ethics rules and law governing conflicts of interest. 
5.	Litigation Sanctions.
Questions involving litigation sanctions often involve discovery abuse and violations of Federal Rule of Civil Procedure 11 (which is, in effect, a mini-code of legal ethics for federal litigation). Such questions often involve fines, fee forfeitures, disqualification, punishment for contempt, and similar sanctions.  Note: to the extent that MPRE questions deal with privilege or civil litigation, unless the question states otherwise, you must assume that the governing law is given by the Federal Rules of Evidence and the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.
II. LAWYERS’ OVER-ARCHING DUTIES TO THE LEGAL PROFESSION
A.	Obey the Law
1.	Do not commit, counsel, or assist criminal conduct. (1.2(d))
2.	Do not commit, counsel, or assist fraudulent conduct. (1.2(d))
3.	Exceptions:
a.	A litigator may disobey an obligation of a tribunal, but only openly and on an assertion that no valid obligation exists.  (3.4(c))
b.	A lawyer may counsel a client to break a law for purposes of obtaining standing to challenge the legitimacy of the law, if there is a good faith basis for that challenge.
Example: In the 1950s, many municipalities still had laws requiring racial segregation on public transportation such as buses and trains. Lawyer meets with a client and advises her that to gain standing to challenge the constitutionality of the laws, the client should refuse to abide by the segregation law. Result: lawyer is not subject to discipline. 
B.	Maintain Professional Boundaries: Who May Practice Law & Where
1.	Lawyers may not engage in or facilitate the unauthorized practice of law (“UPL”) by non-lawyers or by lawyers practicing law outside the jurisdiction where they are licensed.  (5.5)
a.	Definition. The practice of law is:
(1)	Application of legal principles and judgment;
(2)	Regarding a person’s particular situation; 
(3)	As traditionally recognized as practice of law.
b.	Definition. UPL is any practice of law that is not permitted by the state or federal regulatory scheme. Often, UPL issues involve non-lawyers or lawyers who are acting outside the geographic scope of their license. 
c.	Forbidden behavior; UPL
(1)	Non-lawyers may not represent other people or organizations on their legal matters.
(2)	Disbarred or suspended lawyers may not practice law, and licensed lawyers may not assist them to do so.
Exception/Example:  Suppose a licensed lawyer, with full disclosure to the State Bar and with full permission from the State Bar, hires a disbarred lawyer to work in a law firm as a clerk, away from clients and the court.  If the fact pattern explicitly says that a fully informed State Bar approved of that course of conduct, then assume it is lawful.
d.	Permitted behavior, Not UPL:
(1)	Handling one’s own legal affairs. 
Example: If you are a licensed lawyer and Mary Jones is not, it is permitted for you to help her represent herself in an upcoming legal matter.  But, if Mary Jones says that she plans to represent others in the trial, you may not assist her because that would be assisting her UPL.
(2)	Non-lawyers (e.g., paralegals, administrative assistants, and secretaries) acting under a licensed lawyer’s supervision. 
(3)	Non-lawyers helping others to fill out legal forms or fill in the blanks on legal documents; that is not UPL.
(4)	Any activities by non-lawyers permitted by state or federal law.
Example: A federal law permits non-lawyers to represent other people in hearings about certain administrative benefits. A non-lawyer, Maria, attends such a hearing where she represents her friend Robert. Result: Maria’s conduct is not UPL. 
2.	Non-legal work (“Law Related Services”) by licensed lawyer.
a.	Sometimes, a licensed lawyer provides services that are not the practice of law, but seem related to the practice of law.  For example, a litigation attorney might own a copier/messenger business or a real estate attorney may run an escrow company.  In that case, the lawyer has some ethical duties.  (5.7)
b.	The lawyer’s ethical duties apply to the provision of law-related services if they are not distinct from the provision of legal services, or if the lawyer fails to inform the recipient that the services are not the practice of law and that the protections of the attorney client relationship do not apply.
Example: A real estate lawyer owns an insurance brokerage and informs the client that those services are not the practice of law and that when interacting with the brokerage the normal protections of the attorney client relationship, such as confidentiality, do not apply. Result: the ethics rules would not apply to the brokerage business.
c.	Therefore, if the lawyer wants the law-related services not to constitute legal practice, she should keep the services distinct from her legal services and inform the client that the service is not the practice of law and that, for example, the attorney client privilege does not apply.
3.	Lawyers shall not practice law where not admitted.  (5.5)  
a.	Usually, this is an issue of geography.  States license lawyers and lawyers should not practice outside their licensed state unless an exception applies.  This issue can also arise under the rules of an agency.  For example, only members of the patent bar may prosecute patents before the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office.  There are some exceptions to the general rule.
b.	A lawyer may be admitted to another jurisdiction for one matter.  This is called “pro hac vice” admission (“for this matter”).
(1)	Pro hac vice admission must be approved by the relevant tribunal.
(2)	The lawyer must have a reasonable connection to the matter.
(3)	The lawyer admitted pro hac vice is typically required to associate with local co-counsel on the matter.
c.	A lawyer may participate in out-of-state ADR arising from home state lawyering.  
Example: Iowa lawyer with Iowa clients flies to Miami to represent her Iowa-based client in an arbitration or mediation. This is permitted and is not UPL.
d.	A lawyer may do legal work  in a non-admitted jurisdiction when such work is reasonably related to lawyer’s practice in an admitted jurisdiction, but only so long as the lawyer does not open an office or maintain a “systematic and continuous” presence in the non-admitted jurisdiction.  (5.5(b))
Example: Once or twice a year, lawyer visits the out-of-state office of a corporate client for a day or two of meetings. Result: this is not a systematic and continuous presence in the other state; the lawyer has not committed UPL.
Example: Because lawyer’s in-state corporate client has a satellite office out-of-state, lawyer rents an office suite near the client’s satellite office and spends many weeks doing legal work in the suite. Result: lawyer has committed UPL. 
e.	In-house, employed lawyers who have a valid license of admission from some state may represent their employer in a non-admitted state where they do not have a license. 
Example: Lawyer is licensed only in Kentucky and works in-house for her sole client, the Corporation.  Corporation opens a new office in Idaho and lawyer relocates to that location, still working only for her corporate employer. Result: Lawyer’s conduct is permitted and is not UPL.  Note: if Lawyer acts unethically, she may be disciplined in both Kentucky and Idaho.
f.	A lawyer may do any legal work anywhere as permitted by state or federal law.
C.	Maintain Professional Boundaries: Financial Participation in the Legal Profession
1.	A lawyer must maintain the independence, including the financial independence, of the legal profession.
Often this rule is intended to prevent legal matters from becoming commodities, from giving lawyers improper financial incentives, and from sharing legal fees with non-lawyers. (5.4)
2.	The general rule is that a lawyer may not share legal fees with a non-lawyer.  (5.4)
The traditional rationale is that once a lawyer is sharing legal fees with non-lawyers, the lawyer will have a financial incentive other than the best interests of the client. 
There are some behaviors that appear to involve sharing fees with non-lawyers, but that are permitted. Some examples:
a.	An agreement to pay a lawyer’s estate after her death is permitted. 
b.	An agreement to purchase another lawyer’s practice, if done appropriately under 1.17 as discussed below, often results in a permitted payment to a retired lawyer. 
c.	A lawyer may use her legal fees for a compensation or retirement plan including non-lawyers, even if the plan is in whole or in part a profit-sharing arrangement.  
Example.  Suppose a plaintiff’s lawyer has a regularly established compensation plan, including profit-sharing retirement benefits, for her employees.  That is permitted under 5.4(a)(3).  But suppose the lawyer wins a big fee and decides to give $50,000 of the fees to each paralegal and secretary.  That would be improper fee sharing.  
d.	Sharing court awarded legal fees with non-profit organization that employed or recommended lawyer is OK.
Example.  Suppose organization “Citizens for Greener Laws” recommends that some citizens hire you, and you win a test case for them, and are awarded statutory attorneys' fees.  If the organization is a non-profit, you may turn over the court-awarded attorneys' fees to the organization.  (5.4(a)(4))
3.	When a non-client pays the lawyer’s fees, or when a non-client recommends that the lawyer be hired, the lawyer must not allow that non-client to direct or regulate the lawyer’s judgment or interfere with the attorney client relationship.  (5.4(c))
4.	The practice of law with non-lawyers is not permitted.
a.	Forbidden: forming a for profit partnership with non-lawyers where any of the partnership practices law (5.4(b))
Examples: Under the ABA approach, a law firm partnership may not admit a non-lawyer partner who is, for example, a lobbyist.  A lawyer may join a real estate investment partnership with non-lawyers so long as none of the partnership’s business is the practice of law.
b.	Forbidden: forming a corporation or association where non-lawyers have managerial responsibility over the lawyer’s professional judgment.  (5.4(d))
Example: A large law firm organized as a professional corporation may have a non-lawyer Chief Financial Officer if the CFO neither manages the professional judgment of the lawyers nor interferes in the lawyers’ exercise of professional judgment.
5.	Contractual restrictions on practice:
a.	The general rule is that a lawyer may not “contract away” her ability to practice law unless an exception applies.
b.	A lawyer may not agree to restrict her practice as part of a settlement agreement.  (5.6(b))
Example:  Defendant offers plaintiff a $5 million settlement, so long as plaintiff’s attorney agrees not to represent any clients adverse to defendant for the next five years.  That agreement is forbidden under Rule 5.6(b).
c.	A lawyer may “covenant not to compete” in exchange for benefits upon retirement. (5.6(a))
d.	As discussed below, a lawyer may agree to restrict her practice as part of the lawful sale of a law practice.  
6.	Selling a law practice is permitted under certain conditions.  (1.17)
a.	The selling lawyer must altogether cease to practice in their current area of law or in their current geographical area;
Example.  A 65-year-old lawyer maintains a business litigation practice and a trusts and estates practice in both San Francisco and Los Angeles.  He may sell his entire law practice; may sell just the trusts-and-estates practice or just the litigation practice; or may sell one of his two geographical areas.
b.	The entire practice (or area of practice) must be sold; and 
c.	Clients must be given written notice of:
(1)	The proposed sale; and 
(2)	The client’s right to retain other counsel and/or take possession of the client file; and
(3)	The fact that the client’s consent to transfer will be presumed if the client takes no action or does not object within 90 days of receipt of the notice.
d.	Fees may not be increased by reason of the sale.
 
D.	Pro Bono and Public Service (6.1)
1.	In general, lawyers are called to participate in efforts to improve the quality of justice and access to justice.
(I use the phrase “called to,” because as explained below, these duties are aspirational and cannot be used as grounds for professional discipline.)
a.	Lawyers are called to engage in, and to financially support, such efforts.
b.	Often, a lawyer’s pro bono and public service work takes place in organizations other than the lawyer’s law firm or place of employment.  For that reason, as discussed below in §IV.F.6.e, special rules apply to conflicts of interest arising from public service work. 
2.	Types of public service.
a.	Traditional “pro bono” service: work for free or reduced fees for persons of limited means.
(1)	Lawyers “should aspire” to do 50 pro bono hours annually. Note that the phrase “should aspire” is aspirational and failure to do so cannot result in professional discipline.
(2)	Free legal work (and reduced fees work) for the poor is the “core” of the pro bono aspiration.  In addition, a lawyer should aspire to participate in the other kinds of public service discussed below.
b.	Appointments.  Sometimes the court will “appoint” a lawyer to do such work.  As discussed below at §IV.B., lawyers shall accept appointments unless there are adequate grounds for declining the work.  (6.2)
c.	Legal Services Organization. (6.3) Across the country, legal services organizations provide legal services to persons of limited means.  These organizations typically have boards and staff lawyers, and other lawyers may elect to serve as volunteers.
d.	Law Reform Organizations.  (6.4)  Lawyers may become involved in organizations seeking the reform of law, such as tort reform, environmental reform, etc.
e.	Non-profit and Court-annexed legal service programs. (6.5)  Sometimes, a court, county bar association, or non-profit will organize programs where lawyers are sought to participate and dispense legal advice in short-term representations.  For example, a county bar association might run a “Tenant’s Rights Clinic” once a month at a local community center.
III. GETTING CLIENTS: COMMUNICATIONS, ADVERTISING, SOLICITATION, AND REFERRALS
A.	The Constitutional Limitations on Regulation of Lawyer Speech
1.	Speech seeking pecuniary (i.e., for profit) employment is commercial speech and as such it enjoys intermediate constitutional protection.
2.	State governments can, and do, ban false or misleading speech by lawyers.
a.	All false and misleading communications by lawyers are forbidden, regardless of the type of communication.
b.	The lawyer may truthfully communicate fields of law the lawyer practices, if the lawyer is a “patent agent,” “proctor in admiralty,” or if the lawyer is officially a “certified specialist” in a field. 
(1)	Note: California is one of the states that has extensive procedures for becoming a “certified specialist” in certain fields.
3.	State governments can, and do, ban lawyer speech likely to result in coercion, harassment, and duress.
a.	All communications by lawyers causing coercion, harassment, and duress are banned.
b.	The government’s right to ban coercive communications justifies the ban on in-person solicitations, discussed below. (§III.B.3)
Example: Lawyer is permitted to personally solicit a former client. After telephoning the former client twice and leaving voicemails asking to be hired, the former client asks the lawyer to stop calling her. Lawyer calls the former client again, asking to be hired. Result: Lawyer has violated the ethics rules because lawyer is engaging in harassing and coercive communications. 
B.	Definitions and Rules
1.	“Communications”
is the broadest term and includes any form of exchange of information whatsoever about the lawyer’s availability for for-profit employment.
Exception/Example: A lawyer for the NAACP wants to find a test plaintiff for a case to enforce voting rights. The lawyer actively telephones possible plaintiffs. If the client is successful, the NAACP will receive attorneys’ fees, which could amount to a substantial sum. Result: because this form of communication is in furtherance of first amendment rights (such as petitioning the government for redress of grievances) the below rule prohibiting in-person solicitation of clients for for-profit purposes will not apply.
2.	“Advertising”
includes broadcasted communications about the lawyer’s availability for for-profit employment.  Being broadcast means the communications are presumably heard or seen by persons who might need the lawyer’s services and those who might not.  A television advertisement for a personal injury lawyer is a classic example.  (7.2)
a.	Advertising cannot be false or misleading.
b.	The advertising must include the name and address of the lawyer or firm responsible for the content of the advertising.
c.	Although the Model Rules are silent on this point, many states require lawyers to maintain copies of their advertising for several years, so that the state bar can audit or investigate as needed.
3.	“Solicitations”
include communications where the lawyer is directly communicating the lawyer’s availability for pecuniary employment to a person who the lawyer believes might need the lawyers’ services.  Solicitations come in two types:
a.	“In person” solicitations include direct communications, where the lawyer speaks directly to the potential client in person, or on the telephone, or in real time electronic contact (e.g., internet chats).
(1)	The basic ban: lawyers shall not solicit in-person for profit professional employment except from (i) a lawyer, or (ii) a person with whom the lawyer has a family, personal, or professional connection.
Example: A personal injury lawyer sees a truck run a red light and smash into a car full of people. In the car are the lawyer’s brother, another lawyer in town, a former client, the lawyer’s best friend, and a complete stranger. The lawyer may solicit all the victims except the last one.  (Note, however, if the solicitation is done while the victims are still trapped and in agony, the state bar is likely to assert that the solicitation was coercive!) 
(2)	The ban on in-person solicitation applies to live conversations, telephone conversations, and real time electronic communications (e.g., internet chats, texting, and instant messaging).  It does not apply to email solicitations, because email is deemed not to be “in-person.”
b.	Written and recorded solicitations (e.g., “robo-calls”) that are not “in person” are often called “targeted mailings and recordings.”  For example, the lawyer might obtain a list of homeowners whose homes were recently foreclosed and then send them a letter or a recorded phone call; that is not forbidden by the ban on solicitation.  (Note, however, that the targeted mailing cannot be false or misleading.)
(1)	The basic ban does not apply to targeted mailings and recordings.  (The recipient can always hang up or throw away the mail.)
(2)	Targeted solicitations must say “Advertising Material.”
C.	Firm Names and Letterheads (7.5)
1.	Can’t be false or misleading
a.	May state it’s a partnership or organization, but only when true.
Example:  A new lawyer, working alone, may not name her law firm “Mary Smith and Associates” if there are no associates working with her.
b.	May use the names of deceased partners.
2.	Trade names are permitted, but
a.	Trade names may not imply any connection with a government agency.
b.	Trade names may not imply any connection with a public or charitable legal services organization.
Examples: You may name your firm, “I Can’t Believe It’s a Law Firm!” or “Lawyers for Tenants.”  You may not name your private practice firm, “Alameda County Superior Court Advocates.”
3.	Geographic use of names
a.	Firms may use the same name across geographic jurisdictions.
b.	The firm must indicate when lawyers in an office aren’t licensed in that jurisdiction. 
Example: If you visit the website for any major firm’s office in Washington, D.C., you will see many lawyers’ biographies with disclaimers, “Not licensed to practice in Washington, D.C.” or “Practice limited to federal agencies.”)
 
4.	Lawyer holding public office
a.	The firm may not use the name of a lawyer holding public office if the lawyer is not practicing there. 
Example: Mary Jones, a partner in the firm, “Smith, Jones & Garcia,” wins an election for a judge’s seat in the local court and leaves the firm. The firm must drop the “Jones” from the firm’s name. 
Example: Mary Jones, a partner in the firm, “Smith, Jones & Garcia,” wins an election for district attorney in a county where DAs are part-time and are permitted to maintain a private practice. Jones serves as DA and also works at the firm. The firm may keep “Jones” as part of the firm’s name.
b.	The firm may use the name of lawyer not practicing there if lawyer is now providing free legal services in the public sphere.
Example: Mary Jones, a senior partner in the firm, “Smith, Jones & Garcia,” retires from the firm and offers her services for free to the County Art Commission. The firm may keep using “Jones” in the firm name. 
D.	Referrals by Others
1.	Basic rule: except as otherwise provided in the rules, “lawyers are not permitted to pay others for channeling professional work” to the lawyer.  (Comment [5] to Rule 7.2)
The traditional rationales for the rule are that paying for referrals creates an incentive that steers the lawyer away from the client’s best interests and that legal matters should not be treated as commodities to be bought and sold.
2.	Forbidden referrals
a.	Forbidden: Utilizing “cappers and runners ” or persons paid for steering clients to the lawyer. (Most these unethical agreements include a “per head” fee for sending personal injury clients to the lawyer).   
b.	Forbidden: Taking government legal engagement or appointment by a judge after a political contribution made for the purpose of obtaining that work.  This practice is sometimes called “pay to play.”  (7.6)
Example: A lawyer donates to the re-election campaign of the County Executive for the purpose of obtaining legal work from the County. That is a violation of the rule.
Example: A lawyer routinely donates to the reelection campaign of county judges and challengers, including to judges who have the power to steer work to local lawyers. If the lawyer’s donation is not for the purpose of obtaining that work, the donation is permitted and the lawyer may still apply for that work.
c.	Forbidden:  A lawyer must not permit a person referring business to the lawyer to direct or regulate the lawyer’s personal judgment in rendering the services. (5.4(c))
d.	Forbidden:  “Bare” referral fees where the referring lawyer is paid a fee that is not proportional to the amount of work done by the referring lawyer.  (1.5(e)) (Note: in contrast, some states like California, do permit the referring lawyer to do no work other than the referral itself and still split the fee.)
Example: A business lawyer refers a personal injury matter to a lawyer who practices those kinds of cases. The personal injury lawyer pays the referring lawyer $1,000. Result: under the ABA approach, both lawyers are subject to professional discipline. 
3.	Permitted forms of referrals and practices akin to referrals
a.	Lawful purchase of another lawyer’s law practice is permitted. (1.17) (See §§II.C.6).
b.	Lawful non-profit referral. 
c.	Legal services plans approved by appropriate regulatory authorities (typically, the state or county bar association) are permissible.  (7.2(b)(2))
d.	Non-exclusive, fully-disclosed cross-referrals with lawyers or other professionals are permitted.  (7.2(b)(4)).
(1)	Cross-referral agreement cannot be exclusive.
(2)	Client must be informed of existence and nature of agreement.
(3)	Note: the fees are not being split; referrals are exchanged.
Example: A trusts and estates lawyer and an accountant agree to cross-refer clients to each other. The agreement isn’t exclusive (i.e., each remains free to refer clients to other professionals) and the lawyer informs her client about the arrangement. Result: the lawyer’s conduct is permitted.
4.	Note that fee splitting sometimes resembles referral fees, particularly when a lawyer refers a matter to a specialist but retains a fee split on the matter.  Fee splitting with a lawyer in another firm is discussed below at §IVH2e.
IV. DUTIES BETWEEN LAWYERS AND CLIENTS DURING THE ATTORNEY CLIENT RELATIONSHIP
A.	Lawyerly Rights and Duties Before the Attorney Client Relationship (“ACR”) is Created:
1.	The lawyer is governed by the rules on advertising and solicitation (see, §III.B)
2.	Meetings with prospective clients (1.18)
a.	The duty of confidentiality and privilege already apply even though the lawyer and prospective client have not yet formed an attorney client relationship.
b.	Lawyer must protect the prospective client’s property (e.g., files, evidence, etc.).
c.	Disqualification of lawyers who received the prospective client’s confidences:
(1)	Lawyers who received confidences from the prospective client are disqualified from taking on related matters adverse to prospective client.
(2)	The disqualification of the lawyers who received the prospective client’s confidences is not imputed to other lawyers in that firm if:
(a)	The lawyers who learned prospective clients’ confidences only learned enough to weigh taking on the client; and
(b)	The lawyers who learned prospective clients’ confidences were timely “screened;” and
(c)	The lawyers who learned prospective clients’ confidences don’t share in the fees from the matter adverse to the prospective client; and
(d)	Written notice is given to the prospective client.
B.	Accepting and Rejecting ACRs
1.	“Must” ACRs
a.	Court appointments must be accepted (6.2) unless:
(1)	The appointment will cause undue financial hardship to the lawyer.
Example: A lawyer is appointed to represent an indigent person facing a mental health commitment hearing. The lawyer could make more money doing litigation for businesses but the appointment will not cause financial hardship. The lawyer may not reject the appointment.
Example: A new lawyer who is having great trouble getting her practice off the ground is appointed to handle a matter that will take a great deal of time to complete. The lawyer may reject the appointment.
(2)	The client or matter  is “repugnant” to the point of affecting the lawyer’s performance.
Example: A lawyer is appointed to represent a child molester. The lawyer finds the client and the matter repugnant, but is still able to fully represent the client. The appointment may not be rejected.
(3)	Representing the client likely leads to breach of ethics or law.
Example: A lawyer is appointed to represent an indigent client but to do so she must act adversely to the interests of one of her current clients who does not wish to waive any conflicts. This presents a conflict of interest and the lawyer must reject the appointment.
2.	“Should” ACRs
a.	Pro bono representations (see §II.D. above) (6.1).
b.	Representing the “defenseless, oppressed and unpopular” is a form of pro bono work.  (Note: This is a traditional, aspirational norm.)
3.	 “May Not” ACRs.  Lawyers may not undertake or continue representations where:
a.	The representation requires unethical conduct by the lawyer, such as:
(1)	Suits purely to harass. (4.4)
(2)	Frivolous matters. (3.1)
(3)	Unconsented conflicts (discussed further below)
(a)	Conflicts can include lawyer’s personal interests and commitments. (1.16; 1.7)
b.	The lawyer would counsel or assist the client to commit crime or fraud. (1.2)
(1)	Distinction: the lawyer may assist the client to understand what’s lawful and the consequences of breaking the law. (1.2)
c.	The lawyer would be incompetent
(1)	As to skill or subject matter (discussed further below, §§IV.F.3); or
(2)	Mental or physical incompetence.
C.	Creation of the ACR
1.	Tests for creation
a.	The ABA Model Rules do not define the test for the creation of an attorney client relationship; most states look at the “reasonable expectations” of the putative client.
b.	Contract approach: Some state law provides that an ACR is formed when client signals assent to form ACR and the lawyer agrees or doesn’t disagree.
c.	Some state law provides that an ACR is formed when the lawyer should know that the client is reasonably relying on the lawyer.
d.	Court appointments (see §IV.B. above).
2.	Definition of the ACR:
a.	The ACR is a fiduciary relationship from lawyer to client. The client is the principal and the lawyer is the agent.
b.	Usually, the ACR is a contractual relationship from client to lawyer.
c.	To properly define an ACR you must ascertain the client’s identity. (§D below)
d.	To properly define an ACR you must ascertain the scope of the representation. (§E below)
D.	Client Identity
1.	Having natural person clients (i.e., human beings) often raises some ethics issues
a.	Non-client payors of the legal fees (“Third party payors,” discussed further below, § IV.F.6.d”)
(1)	Paying the legal fees doesn’t automatically make one a client.
(2)	Non-client payors create conflicts that can be waived.
(3)	This issue often arises with insurers and insureds (discussed below).
b.	Clients under a disability (1.14)
(1)	There are various types of disability (minors, mentally ill, etc.).
(2)	Lawyers must treat the client as normally as possible under the circumstances.
(3)	Disability isn’t “all or nothing.”  Clients may be disabled for some decisions and at some times, yet be fully competent for other decisions and at other times.
(4)	In extreme cases, the lawyer may reasonably protect client by seeking appointment of conservator or guardian.
(a)	If client has an appointed conservator, the lawyer shall take direction from the conservator.
c.	“Friends and family”
(1)	Make sure to protect privilege and maintain confidentiality.  The presence of a non-client during attorney client communications may waive privilege and breach the duty of confidentiality.
Example: Lawyer meets with a fully competent, adult client. During the meeting with client, the client’s friend is present and lawyer does not obtain the informed consent of the client regarding the probable loss of privilege and breach of the duty of confidentiality. The friend listens to what the lawyer and client discuss. Result: The conversation is not protected by the attorney client privilege; the lawyer has probably breached the duties of confidentiality and competence to the client.
2.	Organizations as clients. (1.13).
This is a major, often-tested issue.  In the real world, this is an area where decent, good lawyers frequently make mistakes!
a.	“The Entity Theory.”  A representation of an organization (e.g., a corporation) is the presentation of the entity itself and not of its constituents (officers, directors, employees, shareholders).
(1)	Lawyers should prevent and correct confusion over the lawyer’s role.  If the lawyer senses that one of the entity’s agents believes the lawyer represents him/her personally, the lawyer must clear up the confusion. 
Also, the lawyer shall explain the identity of the client when the lawyer reasonably knows that the organization’s interests are adverse to the constituent with whom the lawyer is dealing. (1.13(f))
Example: An in-house lawyer at Acme, Inc., is asked to interview a Vice President who is suspected of theft from the company. Lawyer, who knows that the organization’s interests are adverse to the interests of the VP, must explain to the VP that the organization is the client and that the VP is not. (This warning is sometimes colloquially called the “Upjohn Warning,” or the “Corporate Miranda Warning.”)
Example: An in-house lawyer for a corporation meets with a Senior Vice President about an ordinary legal matter for the corporation. The matter is not adverse to the interests of the SVP, but the lawyer realizes that the SVP believes the lawyer represents her personally on the matter. The lawyer, who represents only the entity, has an ethical duty to dispel that confusion.
(2)	Representing the entity does not always preclude the lawyer from representing the entity’s agents, but that decision to add a second client (e.g., the corporate Vice President) may create a conflict of interest with the lawyer’s representation of the entity, and so undertaking to represent the agent should be carefully considered and clearly documented, with a conflict waiver letter if necessary.
Example: An in-house lawyer for a corporation meets with a Senior Vice President about a legal matter for the corporation. The SVP asks, “how does this affect me personally?” If the lawyer gives personal advice to the SVP, the lawyer has created an ACR with the SVP which probably conflicts with the lawyer’s representation of the corporation. The lawyer should either clarify to the SVP that the SVP is not a client or should carefully consider whether to take on the SVP as a second client, with the informed consent of the SVP and the organization to the conflicting representations. 
b.	Organizational Clients--Additional Duties and Rules:
(1)	When representing an organizational client, the lawyer turns to the rules of the organization (e.g., by-laws and articles of incorporation) or to governing law (e.g., the corporate law of that state) to determine who at the entity client has the authority to make decisions. (1.13)
(2)	When the lawyer becomes aware of legal violations that may be attributed to the organization, the lawyer must act reasonably in the interests of the organization. Normally, that requires the lawyer to report the situation to appropriate authorities at the organization and, if the matter is not resolved, to report the matter to higher authorities within the organization, including, if appropriate, the highest authority within the organization. (This is sometimes called reporting “up the org chart,” or reporting “up the chain of command.”) (1.13(b)) 
Example: Lawyer learns that her corporate client has mislabeled a small number of products for export. There is no substantial penalty for the mislabeling and the situation is unlikely to re-occur. Result: lawyer should report the situation to some appropriate officer or employee at the corporation.
Example: Lawyer learns that some members of the sales force have offered bribes to public officials, in violation of criminal law. Lawyer should report this matter to high ranking authorities in the organization (which often is the Board of Directors). 
(3)	As long as the lawyer is reporting the news “up the chain of command” within the entity client, the lawyer is still fulfilling her duty of confidentiality to the client, because the lawyer is only disclosing information to the authorized agents of the entity client. 
(4)	When the lawyer is interacting with and communicating with the organization’s agents (e.g., employees, officers, directors), attorney client privilege applies to the communications, but the entity owns the privilege and can decide whether to waive it or not.
Example: Lawyer representing corporation interviews a division manager who had been involved in a disagreement with a customer over the interpretation of a contract. Lawyer prevented any confusion from arising about the identity of the client; the manager knows that she is not personally the lawyer’s client. The conversation is privileged and the entity can decide whether to waive the privilege and disclose to the customer what the manager said in the interviews. Manager will not be able to assert a personal attorney client privilege and prevent the disclosure.  (Note, however, that if the lawyer handles the interview poorly and leaves the manager with a reasonable expectation that the manager is personally a client, then the lawyer will have created a real conflict about what or who controls the privilege!)
(5)	If, after the lawyer reports a clear violation of law “up the chain of command,” the organization fails to address the issue in a timely and appropriate matter, and if the lawyer believes that the violation will result in substantial injury to the organization, then the lawyer “may,” but is not required to, reveal information relating to the representation to the extent permitted by Model Rule 1.6 and as is necessary to prevent substantial injury to the organization. (1.13(c))
(6)	The “may reveal” exception contained in 1.13(c) does not apply to lawyers who are hired to investigate or defend an alleged violation of law.
Example: The Department of Justice informs Acme, Inc., that it is being investigated for allegedly bribing foreign officials. In response, Acme hires some lawyers from a white collar criminal law boutique to investigate the allegations and defend the company from any actions brought by the DOJ. Result: those lawyers may not invoke the “may reveal” exception under 1.13(c). They must report information up the corporate chain of command, but may not reveal what they’ve learned to persons outside their client, Acme, Inc.
(7)	For publicly traded companies, the regulation of the “reporting up the chain of command” function is governed not by rule 1.13, but rather by a federal law called “Sarbanes-Oxley.” (Being federal law, it preempts any state ethics code.) The provisions are similar to rule 1.13.
(a)	A reporting lawyer for an organization will report a violation of law to the Chief Legal Officer (CLO) (typically, the General Counsel of the company) or to the CLO and the CEO of the company. If such a report is futile—for example, if the CLO and CEO have committed the violation and are covering it up—then the reporting lawyer reports the matter to the Board of Directors or to an authorized committee of the Board.
(b)	As is the case with rule 1.13, if the violation of law is not adequately addressed by the entity client, the reporting lawyer may disclose information to the Securities Exchange Commission in order to prevent or rectify the violation of law.
c.	Government Entity as Client. The foregoing comments about organizational clients also apply when the lawyer represents a government agency or entity. But, as comment [9] to MR 1.13 makes clear, representation of government agencies is complicated and can be difficult. It can be hard to define the precise government agency that is the client (e.g., an agency, a branch of government, or the entirety of a state or federal government). Government lawyers are more likely than other lawyers to be governed by specific statutes, rules, and policies. And there may be situations where the duty of confidentiality is more flexible for government lawyers, allowing them to release client confidences to prevent malfeasance. In addition, there are special conflict of interest rules, discussed below, dealing with current and former government attorneys. 
3.	Multiple Clients
a.	In some situations, a lawyer undertakes to represent two or more clients on the same matter. These are called joint representations. Joint representations raise some ethical issues:
(1)	Conflicts of interest.  If the lawyer’s representation of either jointly represented client might materially limit the lawyer’s responsibilities to the other jointly represented client, the lawyer has a conflict of interest and must consider if the conflict can be waived and, if so, how it can be waived.
(2)	Confidentiality and privilege. The general rule in the United States is that when a lawyer jointly represents multiple clients on a matter, the lawyer must share material information with all the clients and must protect confidentiality and assert privilege against any non-client. Further, if the joint clients later commence a dispute between or among themselves, none of the jointly represented clients may assert privilege against the other(s) regarding communications that were made during the joint representation.
b.	Representation of Insurer and Insured (“Tri-partite” representations). Many insurance policies provide for the costs of legal defense and provide that the insurer may select counsel for the insured.  Broadly speaking, there are two approaches in the United States to the definition of the client in such cases. In some states, if there is no conflict between the position of the insurer and the insured, the attorney client relationship is considered “tri-partite.” That is, the lawyer represents the insurer and the insured. In other states, the lawyer is deemed to represent only the insured. These situations can raise subtle and complicated conflicts situations. More detail is provided in Appendix XXX.
E.	Scope of the Engagement. (1.2)
1.	Lawyer and client may reasonably limit the scope of the representation or the tactics used.
Examples: Client might forego costly tactics; might decline to utilize repugnant tactics; might agree to limited objectives.
2.	Client must give informed consent to such limitations.
Example: A family lawyer realizes that his clients often cannot afford his services. So the lawyer draws up an engagement letter for an “unbundled” or “limited scope” representation. The lawyer and the client go over the various tasks that must be accomplished and assign some to the lawyer and rest to the client. Client signs the letter. For most hearings, the lawyer advises the client on what arguments to make and does some role playing to help the client make an appropriate argument. Result: if the limitations inherent in the unbundled representation are reasonable (and these are reasonable) and if the client gives informed consent to the limitation, the lawyer has complied with the ethics rules.
F.	Duties Flowing from Lawyer to Client during ACR (Fiduciary Duties) (1.x)
1.	Decision-making and power sharing.  (“Abide & Consult”) (1.2)
a.	Client decides lawful & ethical “objectives.”  That is, the lawyer must “abide” by the competent client’s choice of lawful objectives.
(1)	The objectives must be lawful and ethical.
(2)	In civil cases, whether to settle is a choice that belongs to the client, not to the lawyer.
(3)	In criminal cases, the client controls:
(a)	The plea to be entered;
(b)	Whether to waive jury trial; and
(c)	Whether to testify.
Exception: as discussed below, if the client intends to commit perjury, the lawyer may not permit the client to take the stand.  (3.3)
(4)	As noted above (§IV.D.2.b.), with organizational clients, the right to determine the objectives of the representation lies with the authorized agents of the client (e.g., officers, directors).
b.	The lawyer decides the “tactics” or “means” after client consultation (1.2).
(1)	The lawyer must still “consult” about the means and tactics to be used. 
(2)	The lawyer may take whatever steps the lawyer is impliedly authorized to take.
(3)	Tactics, or means, include what witnesses to call, exhibits to use, arguments to make, etc.
2.	Communication (1.4)
a.	The lawyer must communicate so client can make informed decisions that belong to the client.
b.	The lawyer must keep client reasonably informed about the status of the matter.
c.	The lawyer must respond timely to reasonable requests for information.
d.	Answer those phone calls!
e.	If the lawyer is too busy to respond immediately to the client, the lawyer may have a subordinate (secretary, paralegal) inform the client that the lawyer will respond once she has an opportunity to do so.
f.	The lawyer must inform the client about limitations on the lawyer’s conduct when the lawyer knows that the client expects assistance that is unethical or illegal. (1.4(a)(5))
Example: Client hires lawyer in a marital dissolution proceeding. Client asks lawyer how they can “hide” financial documents from the other side and asks lawyer to use tactics designed to harass the other side. Result: Lawyer has an ethical duty to communicate to client that the lawyer may not engage in those behaviors.
g.	Withholding information from the client.
(1)	Lawyers may sometimes delay communications to the client if the client is likely to act imprudently.  (1.4, comment [7])
Example: The court issues a major ruling in a case, but the lawyer knows that the client’s mother has just undergone emergency surgery. The lawyer feels that the client is not emotionally prepared to handle the news of the court ruling. The lawyer may delay telling the client until the crisis has passed – but must still inform the client of the ruling.
(2)	Lawyer may be under a court order not to share certain information with the client. If so, the order trumps the duty of communication.
Example: In a commercial litigation, the judge rules that certain business information of the parties is subject to discovery but may not be shared with the business people at the opposing party. The lawyer may not share that information in violation of the judge’s order.
h.	Lawyers must communicate reasonably with disabled clients. (see §IV.D.b.)
3.	Competence (1.1)
a.	Lawyers are required to exhibit/possess legal knowledge, skill, thoroughness, and preparation.
b.	Lawyer may acquire competence through study or associating co-counsel. (Note: the concept of the incompetent “newbie” is often tested; know the two ways to acquire competence!)
c.	In an emergency, a lawyer may give assistance as needed and then either gain competence or turn the matter over to a competent lawyer.
Example: Lawyer, who has little or no criminal defense experience, receives a call late Friday night from a friend who has been arrested. Lawyer unsuccessfully tries to reach several criminal practitioners by phone. Lawyer may assist the client in the emergency over the weekend, but should transfer the matter to a competent criminal lawyer on Monday.
d.	Lawyers must maintain competence. (e.g., CLE and study)
e.	Malpractice claims against lawyer:
(1)	Can be based on any substandard lawyering (not just incompetence)
(2)	Tort elements: duty, breach, causation, damages
(a)	Use of Rules to Determine Duty and Breach.  Under the majority approach in the United States, and under the approach on the MPRE, the ethics rules are relevant to defining duty and breach but do not absolutely define them.  (Under the two minority approaches, the ethics rules are (i) irrelevant and excluded from the malpractice trial, or (ii) are absolutely determinative of duty and breach and the jury is so instructed.)
(b)	“But for” causation.  To succeed, the plaintiff must show what would have happened if the lawyer had performed competently and ethically.  This is called proving the “case within a case.”  For example, the plaintiff might try to prove what contract she would have entered into had her lawyer performed competently.  It is not enough for the plaintiff to show that some substandard lawyering had some substantial effect on the negative outcome.
(c)	In a case for malpractice in a criminal defense matter, the majority approach in the United States provides that the client must prove actual innocence before proceeding against the lawyer.
(d)	A client who agrees to settle a matter may still allege malpractice against the lawyer who represented her. The fact that she agreed to the settlement does not bar her from alleging, for example, that the lawyer’s malpractice prompted her to settle the case on bad terms.
(e)	A lawyer may ask the client to prospectively waive negligence and malpractice claims if the client is advised by an independent lawyer while agreeing to waive those claims.  (1.8)  (Note: although this is permitted in the Model Rules, it is rarely permitted in the real world.)
(f)	A lawyer may negotiate a release of a client’s malpractice claims against the lawyer after the malpractice has occurred if the lawyer advises the client to seek independent advice of counsel regarding the release.  (1.8)
f.	The duty of competence is owed to the client and, in rare situations, to intended third party beneficiaries of the legal services.
(1)	Clients and a narrow class of intended third party beneficiaries of the legal work are the only persons who can sue the lawyer for malpractice.
(2)	The classic case of the intended third party beneficiary is the person to whom the client wanted to leave her money in a will or trust.
Example: Ms. Smith hires Lawyer to draft a will that leaves Smith’s money to Ms. Jones, and the Lawyer commits malpractice resulting in Ms. Jones not receiving the inheritance, Ms. Jones may sue Lawyer for malpractice even though she is not a client.  Note: this is an exception to the general rule that only clients can sue lawyers for malpractice. 
4.	Diligence/Zeal.  (1.3)
a.	The lawyer must timely pursue client’s objectives and fight obstacles.
b.	No procrastination!
c.	Personal crises are irrelevant.
Example: The lawyer is suffering from mental anguish because his father is dying from cancer. If the anguish causes the lawyer to fail to act diligently, the lawyer has breached his ethical obligation. The lawyer should have overcome the anguish or transferred the matter to another lawyer.
d.	Unless relationship is terminated, the lawyer must actively carry on the relationship.
e.	Solo practitioners should have contingency plan for disability or death (e.g., referrals to other lawyers).
5.	Confidentiality, Privilege, and Work Product Protection (1.6; common law)
a.	Privilege defined: communications between a client (or client’s agent) and a lawyer (or lawyer’s agent) made in confidence, for the purpose of securing legal advice, and not for the purpose of furthering a crime or fraud, are privileged from compulsory testimony or production.
(1)	Crime-fraud exception defined:  If the communication was for the purpose of furthering a crime or fraud, the communication is not privileged, even if the lawyer was unaware of the client’s nefarious purpose and if the lawyer’s advice took the form of perfectly legal advice.
Example: Corporate client is secretly running an ongoing stock fraud and asks Lawyer for some advice about Delaware corporate law so that the client can send out some routine (but false) business notices to the investors who are being defrauded.  Lawyer assumes that Client is lawful.  Lawyer’s advice is routine and appears to be perfectly lawful.  Result: because the Client is using the communication to further the fraud, the communications are not privileged ab initio (from the start). Notice that Lawyer’s good intentions and lack of fraudulent intent do not prevent the crime-fraud exception from applying.
(2)	The presence of non-agent, third party destroys the privilege.
Example: Lawyer wants to interview client, but client does not speak English well. At the client interview, lawyer is accompanied by her administrative assistant, a paralegal, and a translator. Result: privilege is not lost, given that the others in the room are agents for the lawyer. 
(3)	Privilege applies to communications with prospective clients.
(4)	As discussed above, §§IV.D.2, privilege applies to communications with organizational clients, but the organization holds the privilege and controls the decision to waive or not waive privilege.
(5)	Waiver of privilege.
(a)	Client’s choice generally.  Note that in representations of an entity client, the decision to waive would belong to the entity and not to, for example, the Senior VP who had the privileged communication with the entity’s lawyer.  
(b)	Waiver by raising issues (e.g., if client alleges as an affirmative defense that it relied upon the advice of counsel, then the privilege is waived as to that advice).
(c)	Waiver by claim against lawyer.  If the client sues the lawyer for malpractice or other grounds that implicate the lawyer’s work for the client, the privilege is waiver to the extent that the lawyer needs to defend herself.
(6)	Joint Privilege. When a lawyer represents two clients on the same matter, it is called a “joint representation.” In those situations, the lawyer’s communications with each client are privileged as against non-clients.
(a)	Either client may assert the privilege as to its own communications with the lawyer and as to the other client’s communications as well (unless the other client has waived its privilege regarding its communications with the lawyer).
(b)	If the two clients later having a falling out and commence legal proceedings against each other regarding that matter, then neither of the former co-clients may assert privilege against the other regarding communications made during the course of the joint representation.
Example: Plaintiff sues Ann and Betty, who jointly hire Lawyer to represent them. Each of the co-clients engages in privileged communications with Lawyer. Plaintiff seeks to learn what Betty told Lawyer. Unless Betty has waived privilege as to her communications with the lawyer, both Ann and Betty can assert privilege as to Betty’s communications with the jointly retained lawyer. Later, Ann and Betty begin to squabble and they each fire Lawyer and hire new, independent lawyers. Ann’s new lawyer seeks to learn the content of all of Betty’s communications with the prior lawyer when Ann and Betty were joint clients. Betty’s new lawyer tries to assert privilege as to those communications, but the judge correctly rules that Betty may not assert privilege against Ann for those communications.  (Note, however, that Betty is now a single client with her own independent lawyer and hence Betty may assert privilege against Ann regarding Betty’s communications with her new lawyer.)
(7)	Privilege survives death of client.
b.	Confidentiality defined.  The duty of confidentiality has a very broad scope!  It pertains to all information relating to the representation.  It’s not limited to the client’s secrets; it can include publicly available information.  California emphasizes that it includes all information that could be “embarrassing or detrimental” to the client.
Example: Plaintiff sues defendant and defendant hires lawyer. Plaintiff’s lawyer tells defendant’s lawyer some information about the defendant. Although the conversation between the two lawyers was not a privileged conversation, and although the information transmitted to the defendant’s lawyer is already known by the plaintiff and the plaintiff’s lawyer, that information is still a “confidence” under the ethics rules because it is information relating to the representation of a client. 
(1)	The duty of confidentiality applies to information learned from prospective clients. (1.18)
(2)	Under 1.6(a), a lawyer may disclose confidences to the extent the lawyer is expressly or impliedly authorized to do so.
(3)	The ABA and MPRE approaches provide for certain exceptions to the duty of confidentiality C, I under which the lawyer may reveal a client confidence even when the client has not given express or implied authorization. Indeed, the rules sometimes permit the lawyer to reveal client confidences even over the objection of the client.
(4)	The following exceptions are found under MR 1.6(b) and when they apply, the lawyer “may” reveal client confidences:
(a)	Under 1.6(b)(1), to prevent reasonably certain death or substantial bodily harm.
Example: Lawyer represents Husband in a marital dissolution matter. Lawyer learns that Husband has obtained a handgun and is driving to his spouse’s house with the intent of shooting her. Lawyer “may” reveal client confidences as is reasonably necessary to prevent the death or substantial bodily harm to the spouse.
Example: In the course of a representation of a corporate client, Lawyer learns that her client has just purchased a piece of land that is polluted with toxins that over time are likely to cause death or substantial bodily harm. Even if the client did not create the situation, the lawyer may reveal client confidences to the extent reasonably necessary to prevent death or substantial bodily harm to others. (Note: the comments to the rule suggest that in these situations, the lawyer should first raise the issue with the client before the lawyer decides to reveal the confidence.)
(b)	To prevent or rectify substantial financial injury through the client’s crime or fraud where the lawyer’s services were used in furtherance of the crime or fraud. (1.6(b)(2-3))
Example: A corporate lawyer has helped a client make private offerings in a real estate investment partnership. After nine months of working for the client, the lawyer realizes that the client is really a “ponzi scheme” that is defrauding the existing partners and is seeking to defraud new partners. Because the client has used the lawyer’s services in carrying out the fraud, and because disclosure of client confidences would help the existing partners “rectify” the fraud and help the potential partners prevent being defrauded, the lawyer may reveal client confidences for those purposes.
Example: Similar facts to the prior example, except that the person running the investment partnership (i.e., the person conducting the fraudulent scheme) retains a lawyer because the he is now being investigated by state and federal authorities for financial fraud. He needs to hire a “white collar criminal defense lawyer.” Note that in this case, the lawyer’s services have not been used in the carrying out of the fraud. They are being sought only for defensive purposes. In this case, there is no “may reveal” exception under 1.6(b)(2-3). 
Exception/Distinction: California’s ethics rules do not permit a lawyer to reveal a client confidence to prevent or rectify a financial fraud. A California-licensed lawyer who discovered that the client was committing fraud would “remonstrate” with the client to stop committing fraud and would withdraw from representation of the client. (CRPC 3-100)
(c)	When the lawyer seeks legal advice about the scope of her ethical duties. (1.6(b)(4))
Example: Lawyer faces a difficult conflict of interest issue and seeks legal advice from an ethics specialist. Lawyer may reveal client confidences in order to obtain that legal advice.
(d)	When the lawyer needs to reveal the confidence to defend the lawyer from civil or criminal claims against lawyer or in a dispute between the lawyer and the client. (1.6(b)(5))
Examples: If the client sues the lawyer for malpractice or if the District Attorney files criminal charges against the lawyer, the lawyer may defend herself including by revealing client confidences to the extent necessary to mount the defense.  But note that the comments to MR 1.6 provide that even if the lawyer is accused less formally, for example in an accusation made by telephone or in a letter before the filing of any complaint or charges, she may still defend herself by revealing client confidences.
Example: Lawyer concludes a business transaction for client. One month later, during a phone call, the opposing party in the transaction accuses lawyer of having committed a fraud during the transaction. Lawyer may reveal client confidences to defend herself. (Note: this exception may not strike you as intuitive, because of how informal the accusation against the lawyer is. (See 1.6, comment [10].))
(e)	If a court order or other law requires disclosure. (1.6(b)(6)). Specifically, three other rules provide that if a lawyer “may reveal” a confidence under 1.6(b), then the lawyer “must reveal” the confidence under the other rule. That is, there are three rules where a 1.6(b) “may reveal” becomes a “must reveal.” 
(i)	As discussed below in the sections on the ethics of dealing with third parties and on the ethics of negotiations, because a lawyer must prevent assisting in a criminal or fraudulent act by a client, in some situations the lawyer must reveal client confidences by “disaffirming” prior representations and in rare situations must reveal client confidences to third parties., I (See, §§ IV.G ) (MR 1.2(d) & 4.1)
(ii)	Under MR 8.1, if the lawyer “may reveal” under 1.6(b), then the lawyer must reveal as required by 8.1. (1.6[15]).
(iii)	Under MR 8.3, if the lawyer “may reveal” under 1.6(b), then the lawyer must reveal as required by 8.3.
(f)	As noted above, when a lawyer representing an organization has reported a violation of law all the way up to the highest authority, the lawyer may reveal client confidences to prevent harm to the client. (See §§§§IV.D.2.b)(1.13(c))
(g)	As discussed below in the section about the ethics of litigators, a lawyer must remedy any false testimony she has offered to a tribunal, including, if necessary, revealing client confidences to the tribunal. (3.3)(See §§V.A.1)
c.	Work Product defined: A series of court cases has created a right by which a lawyer may withhold certain materials that were created in anticipation of litigation (i.e., work product).
(1)	“Core Work Product” or “Opinion Work Product.” Depending on the jurisdiction, the lawyer’s mental thoughts, impressions, strategies, etc., are either absolutely immune from discovery or can be compelled only upon a showing of extraordinary need. (Jurisdictions vary on whether core/opinion work product may be withheld from the client itself.)
(2)	Qualified Work Product. Other forms of work product, such as a list of witnesses generated by the lawyer, may be subject to discovery if the party seeking the work product can establish a “substantial need” for the information or that obtaining it in other ways will cause “undue hardship.”
Example: Lawyer meets with a group of witnesses who saw an accident, generates a list of the witnesses’ names, and also includes the lawyer’s mental impressions about which witnesses would make good witnesses at trial. The list of names is qualified work product and may be ordered to be produced if the other side can show “substantial need” or “undue hardship”. The lawyer’s mental impressions are core work product and, depending on the jurisdiction, cannot be ordered to be produced or will be ordered to be produced only upon a showing of extraordinary need.
(3)	Sometimes the lawyer plays the role of “evaluator” and factually evaluates the client for the benefit of a non-client. The most common situation is when an acquiror in a merger demands that the acquiree’s lawyer provides an opinion letter that makes factual representations about the acquiree. That role is discussed in section V below. When a lawyer evaluates a client for the benefit of a non-client, the lawyer is likely to reveal client confidences. The lawyer must obtain proper consent, after proper disclosure to the client, before doing so. (2.3)
6.	Loyalty. (1.7-1.12)
a.	Definition: Conflicts of interest. Conflicts of interest include any incentive or interest that might substantially impede the lawyer’s discharge of her duty to the client. (These are found in rules 1.7-1.12.)
b.	General analysis:
(1)	Is it a conflict?
(2)	What lawyers in a firm are affected by the conflict (“imputation” of the conflict)?
(3)	Can the conflict be waived?
(4)	How can the conflict be waived?
c.	Conflicts with other current clients (1.7)
(1)	Conflict: direct adversity to current client
(a)	Classic “direct adversity”: suing or negotiating against current client.
Example: Lawyer represents both Acme and Bravo on different matters. Acme asks lawyer to draft and file a lawsuit against Bravo. Result: undertaking that representation would create a direct adversity conflict under 1.7.
Example: Lawyer represents both Acme and Bravo on different matters. Acme asks lawyer to represent it in friendly contract negotiations against Bravo. Result: undertaking that representation would create a direct adversity conflict under 1.7(a)(1).
(2)	Conflict: lawyer’s representation of current client will be “materially limited” by lawyer’s duty to someone else. (1.7(a)(2))
Example: Lawyer represents several persons forming joint venture and hence cannot represent any one of them on how to structure the corporation to maximize his or her ownership vis-à-vis the other founders.
Example: Lawyer is asked by Acme to file a suit against Bravo (which is not a client.)  But a key witness for Bravo is a close friend of the lawyer.  Result: undertaking the representation would be materially limited by the lawyer’s relationship to the key witness and hence is a conflict of interest under 1.7(a)(2). 
(3)	It’s a conflict to be adverse to a current client even if the adversity is unrelated to what you do for the client.  That is, “the matters are unrelated!” is not a defense to current client conflicts!
(4)	Representing two economic competitors in non-adverse matters is not by itself a conflict.  Representing one economic competitor on how to compete against the other is a conflict if both are current clients.
Example: Lawyer represents Coca-Cola on some real estate lease matters and represents Pepsi regarding its foreign tax liabilities. Result: Although the two companies are economic competitors, because it appears that neither representation entails adversity toward the other client, there is no conflict of interest.
(5)	In some situations, taking inconsistent positions for two different clients may raise a conflict of interest.
(a)	Conflict exists if conduct for one client will “materially limit the lawyer’s effectiveness in representing another client in a different case.”  (1.7[24])
(6)	Consent -- “Current Client Rule”
(a)	There is a small category of “always non-consentable” conflicts: representing opposing sides in same litigation.
Example: Acme sues Bravo and both companies ask Lawyer to represent. Lawyer may not represent the opposing sides in the same litigation.
Example: Acme sues Bravo and Charlie as co-defendants. Result: If the defenses of Bravo and Charlie are compatible and if both companies consent to the joint representation, Lawyer may represent the co-defendants. 
(b)	The lawyer must reasonably believe she can competently represent each client.
(c)	Each affected client must give informed consent, confirmed in writing .  (ICCW; discussed below)
(7)	“Hot Potato Rule.” A lawyer may not “fire” a client or terminate an ACR for the purpose of taking on a matter adverse to the client. The act of “dropping a client like a hot potato” for that purpose does not negate the conflict.
Example: Client represents Acme, Inc., on some small matters. Bravo, Inc., asks the lawyer to represent it on a huge lawsuit against Acme. Lawyer may not terminate the ACR with Acme for the purpose of taking on the matter adverse to Acme.
d.	Conflicts with lawyer’s own interests.
(1)	Liens and other “doing business with client” issues. (1.8(a)).
(a)	Liens. A lien is a property right to possess something that the lien holder does not own. When lawyers obtain liens, they are usually liens against the recovery in the case or liens against the client’s assets (e.g., the client’s house) to ensure payment of the legal fees. 
Example: To protect her interest Lawyer asks client to agree that the lawyer may have a lien on any recovery in the case. Result: if lawyer complies with the technicalities of 1.8(a), the lien is permitted.
Example: To protect her interest in recovering fees from the client, lawyers add a provision to the fee agreement by which lawyer takes a lien on the client’s house. Result: if the lawyer complies with the technicalities of 1.8(a), the lien is permitted.
(b)	“Business transaction with client.”  If the lawyer will be entering into a business relationship with the client, the provisions of 1.8(a) apply.
Example: Lawyer advises client on real estate investment partnerships. Client offers to let lawyer join one of the partnerships. Result: lawyer may do so if the lawyer complies with 1.8(a).
Example: Lawyer represents start-up companies and offers that in lieu of cash payments, the client may pay the lawyer with shares of stock in the client. Result: lawyer may do so if the lawyer complies with 1.8(a).
(c)	All of these relationships are prohibited unless (i)  the transaction is “fair and reasonable”; (ii) is disclosed in writing; (iii) the client is advised of the desirability of seeking independent counsel about the relationship; (iv) client is given a reasonable opportunity to seek the advice of independent counsel; and (v) client gives informed consent in a writing signed by the client (IC, WSC). 
(2)	Gifts and inheritances from clients (1.8(c)).
(a)	A lawyer should not solicit any substantial gift from a client unless the client is related to the lawyer. (Note: the rule bars solicitation of gifts. It does not absolutely bar lawyers from accepting unsolicited gifts from non-related clients. ) 
Example: Lawyer asks elderly client to give lawyer a silver vase that lawyer has long admired. Client is not a relative of lawyer. Result: Lawyer has violated 1.8(c).
Example: As a token of appreciation, Client gives Lawyer a silver vase that Lawyer in no way solicited from client. Lawyer may accept the vase without violating 1.8(c). Note, however, that most states have common law rules providing that the client may rescind such gifts or that if the client wishes the gift returned then the lawyer bears the burden of proving that the gift was not obtained through undue influence. 
(b)	The lawyer may not prepare on behalf of a non-relative client any instrument (e.g., will or trust) that gives the lawyer or any related persons to the lawyer any substantial gift. (“Related persons” include spouses, children, grandparents, grandchildren or other person or relative with whom the lawyer maintains a close, familial relationship.)
Example: Lawyer writes a will for client leaving an antique car to Lawyer. Client is not related to Lawyer. Result: lawyer has violated 1.8(c). 
Example: Lawyer writes a will for client leaving $10,000 to the lawyer’s child. The client is not a relative of Lawyer. Result: Lawyer has violated 1.8(c). 
Example: Lawyer’s mother asks lawyer to draft a will by which lawyer and her two sisters will equally share the mother’s estate. Result: lawyer has not violated 1.8(c). (Note, however, that under most states’ common law, it may be possible to void the inheritance by the lawyer if it can be proven that the inheritance was obtained through coercion or undue influence.)
(3)	Literary rights from client (1.8(d)).  Prior to the conclusion of the matter, a lawyer shall not make or negotiate an agreement giving the lawyer literary rights in the client’s matter.
Example: A criminal defense lawyer is engaged by a client who lacks money. Because the case is sensational and has been in the news, the lawyer bargains with the client at the outset of the matter to obtain the right to literary rights about the case. Result: lawyer has violated 1.8(d). 
(4)	Financial assistance to clients (1.8(e)).  Generally, lawyer shall not provide client financial assistance (e.g., pay rent, medical bills).
(a)	Rationale: gives lawyer too much power and influence over client.
(b)	Lawyer may advance court costs and litigation expenses and repayment may be contingent on litigation success.
(c)	Lawyer may outright pay court costs and expenses of indigent clients.
(5)	Third party payors. (1.8(f))  If someone other than the client is paying the legal fees, lawyer must obtain the client’s informed consent; must prevent interference with lawyer’s independent judgment for the benefit of the client; and must protect client confidences.
(a)	Frequently tested fact pattern: Lawyer represents the insured but the legal fees are paid by the insurer.  Lawyer must serve only the interests of the client-insured, must protect the client’s confidences, and must obtain the client’s informed consent to the payments by the insurer non-client.
(6)	Aggregate settlements. (1.8(g))A  Lawyer shall not participate in making an aggregate settlement unless (i) each client gives informed consent in a signed writing and (ii) lawyer’s disclosure states existence and nature of the claims and settlements for all participants.
(a)	Exception: where aggregate settlement in criminal case doesn’t involve guilt or nolo contendere.
(7)	Malpractice liability, limiting liability, and settlements. (1.8(h))
(a)	Lawyer shall not prospectively limit malpractice liability unless client is independently represented by counsel regarding the limitation.
(b)	Lawyer shall not settle malpractice liability unless the client is advised in writing of the desirability of seeking independent counsel regarding the settlement and is given a reasonable opportunity to obtain independent counsel regarding the settlement.
(8)	Acquiring proprietary interest in litigation. (1.8(i))  This is forbidden, except that lawyer may obtain lien (discussed above) or reasonable contingency fee (discussed below).
(9)	Sexual relationship with clients. (1.8(j))  Sexual relationships with clients are forbidden unless the relationship pre-existed attorney client relationship.
e.	Conflicts arising from public service. (6.1 – 6.5)
(1)	For lawyers involved with a Legal Services Organization, the lawyer shall not knowingly participate in decisions that involve adversity to the lawyer’s client.  (6.3)
Example. Lawyer sits on the board of a legal services organization deciding whether to sue a residential landlord in town.  The landlord is a client of Lawyer’s firm.  Lawyer shall not participate in the decision.
(2)	For lawyers involved with law reform activities, if the organization is making a decision that might materially benefit a client, the lawyer shall disclose that fact, but does not need to identify the client, and may participate in the decision.  (6.4)
Example.  Lawyer sits on the board of “Riverside Environmental Alliance,” which is involved in lobbying, legal reform, etc.  The Alliance is considering a proposal that, if passed, would benefit several of Lawyer’s clients.  Lawyer shall disclose that fact, but need not identify the particular clients, and may then participate in the decision without violating the ethics rules.
(3)	For lawyers involved in non-profit and court-annexed limited legal services, the lawyer shall abide by the conflicts rules to the extent the lawyer actually realizes that there is a conflict issue while participating in the service, and if the representation will be continued the lawyer will do a full conflicts check.  (6.5)
Example.  Associate participates in a court-annexed program called “Tenant’s Rights Clinic,” that educates tenants about their legal disputes.  As Associate fields questions from tenants, if the Associate realizes that the question is adverse to a firm client the Associate should not participate—but Associate does not have to run a conflicts check and if it turns out that the question was adverse to a firm client the Associate has not breached the ethics rules.  If the legal representation does not terminate at the end of the conversation, the Associate will run a full conflicts check.
f.	Conflicts with former clients.
(1)	Adversity by lawyer who “formerly represented” a client. (1.9(a))
(a)	It’s a conflict if the new matter adverse to the former client is the “same or substantially related to the matter” the lawyer previously handled for the former client. (“SOSRM”).
(b)	The term of art, “same or substantially related to the matter” (SOSRM) enables the court to weigh the danger that the former client’s confidences will now be used against the client.
(c)	SOSRM can be based on the similarity of legal issues in the previous matter for the former client and the new adversity to the client.  But SOSRM can also be present if the facts disclosed in the previous matter are the kinds of facts that would be useful in the adversity to the former client. 
(2)	Adversity by lawyer whose prior firm represented a client (1.9(b))
(a)	It’s a conflict for a lawyer to undertake a matter adverse to prior firm’s client if the matter is SOSRM to what the prior firm did for client  and if the lawyer acquired material confidences from prior firm’s client.
Example:  While Lawyer was at the firm of Able & Baker, lawyers at that firm represented Consolidated, Inc., on securities law issues.  Lawyer did not represent Consolidated on those matters.  Lawyer then moves to firm of Delta & Echo.  Financial Services, Inc., wants to hire Lawyer and Delta & Echo to sue Consolidated Inc. for securities law fraud.  If Lawyer acquired any material confidences of Consolidated while at prior firm, then it would be a conflict for Lawyer to undertake the adversity to Consolidated, even if Lawyer herself did not represent Consolidated while at Able & Baker.  (1.9(b))
(3)	Use or revelation of information relating to the lawyer’s prior representation of a client, or relating to the lawyer’s firm’s representation of a client.  (1.9(c))
(a)	Cannot use such information to the disadvantage of the former client except as permitted in the rules or when such information has become generally known.
(b)	Cannot reveal such information except as permitted by the rules.
(c)	Notice how broad that definition of information is: any information relating to the representation.
Example:  Lawyer helps Real Estate Investors, Inc., plot strategy for the purchase and redevelopment of land in various parts of town.  In doing so, Lawyer learns (i) how the zoning process works in that town; and (ii) which properties the client thinks are undervalued in the market. Both are “information relating to the representation.”  Lawyer can make use of (i) for other clients and to build her book of business, so along as the matters are not to the detriment of Real Estate Investors, Inc.  Lawyer cannot make use of (ii) to purchase the land that Lawyer knows that Real Estate Investors wants to buy.
(4)	Special case: government lawyer.
(a)	Must follow government’s own conflicts rules and statutes
(b)	Current government lawyer cannot participate in matter in which lawyer “personally and substantially” worked before government service. (1.11(d))
(c)	Current government lawyer cannot negotiate for private employment with party or lawyer in matter in which government lawyer is participating “personally and substantially.” (1.11(d))
Example: Government lawyer is personally and substantially negotiating for City a lease on City property under which Acme Inc., may become be a lessee. The law firm of Able & Baker is representing Acme on the lease negotiations across from Government lawyer. Government lawyer may not negotiate for employment with Able & Baker while the matter is ongoing.
(d)	Former government lawyer can’t participate in matters in which she participated “personally and substantially” as a government lawyer. (1.11(a))
(i)	Former government lawyer’s disqualification is imputed to others at the firm unless lawyer is timely screened, prompt written notice is given to government agency so it can ascertain compliance, and the former government lawyer receives no part of the fees in the matter. (1.11(b))
(e)	Former government lawyer cannot be adverse to person when lawyer obtained material confidences about that person while as a government lawyer (1.11(c))
(i)	Former government lawyer’s disqualification under this rule is imputed to others at firm unless lawyer is timely screened, the former government lawyer enjoys no portion of fees from matter, and the former client is given notice.  (1.11(c))
(5)	Special case: former judges, neutrals, and law clerks.
(a)	Special rules apply to judges & adjudicative officers (and their law clerks); and to third party neutrals (arbitrators and mediators) (“Neutrals”). (1.12(a))
(b)	Former neutral shall not represent anyone in connection with a matter in which they participated “personally and substantially” in neutral role.
(i)	But may do so if all parties consent, confirmed in writing.
(c)	A neutral shall not negotiate for employment with party or lawyer appearing in a matter in which the Neutral is “personally and substantially” participating.  (1.12(b))
(i)	Exception: law clerks can, after notice to supervisor Neutral.
(d)	Former Neutral’s disqualification is imputed to other lawyers at firm unless timely screened, enjoys no portion of fees; timely notice is given to parties and the appropriate tribunal.
g.	Conflicts with third parties. Conflicts can arise out of the lawyer’s relationships with persons other than clients.
(1)	Third party payors. When a non-client pays the client’s legal fees, the conflict is that the lawyer may reveal client confidences to the payor or may let the payor make decisions that belong to the client. (1.7; 1.8; 5.4)
(2)	Opposing lawyer. The lawyer may have a personal or professional relationship with the lawyer on the opposing side. If that relationship is likely to materially limit the lawyer’s representation of the client, it is a conflict of interest. (1.7)
(3)	Witnesses.
h.	What lawyers are affected by the conflict (“imputation”)?  Once we determine that any lawyer has a conflict of interest, we must ask if that conflict applies to other lawyers—that is, if the conflict is “imputed” to other lawyers.  
(“Imputation” is the ABA term of art, and it’s discussed mostly in MR 1.10.  Under the California approach, we ask if there is a “vicarious” imputation of other lawyers.  As of Fall 2011, California has no ethics rule that directly addresses the issue; the issue is addressed by California case law.)
(1)	Definition: “Firm.”  When applying imputation rules, it’s important to remember that the term “firm” includes a wide variety of scenarios where lawyers are working in a cohesive work setting, including private practice firms, in-house corporate law departments, legal services organizations, etc. (1.0(d))
(2)	Conflicts arising under MR 1.8: imputation is governed by 1.8(k)
(a)	You will recall that 1.8 regulates a series of specific conflicts scenarios. (§§IV.f.6.d.)  Rule 1.8(k) provides that whenever a lawyer in a firm has a conflict under 1.8-- except for the prohibition regarding sexual relations with a client--then the conflict is imputed to all the lawyers at the firm,.
(3)	Rule 1.10(a) governs imputation of conflicts arising under 1.7 (current client conflicts) and 1.9 (former client conflicts).
(4)	“Old Rule 1.10(a).”
(a)	Rule 1.10(a) was amended in August 2009.  Under the old version of rule 1.10(a), which is still the dominant approach in most states, when a lawyer in a firm has a conflict under 1.7 or 1.9 arising from the private practice of law, then the conflict is imputed to all the lawyers at the firm.
(b)	Under the old 1.10(a), and under the current rule as well, when a lawyer has a conflict arising from previously serving as a government lawyer or third party neutral (judge, arbitrator, mediator), imputation is regulated by 1.11 (government lawyers) or 1.12 (former third party neutrals).
(5)	“New Rule 1.10(a)” (As of August 2009)
(a)	A lawyer’s conflict is not imputed to others at the firm if it arises from a personal interest of the disqualified lawyer and does not present a significant risk of materially limiting the representation of the client by the other members of the firm. (1.10)(a)(1)).
Example: Suppose that a partner at Able & Baker formerly served on the board of directors of a local college where she is a loyal and devoted alum. Her firm is asked to file a suit against that college.  The individual partner may well have a personal interest conflict under 1.7(a)(2), but that conflict probably will not be imputed to other lawyers at her firm.
(b)	A lawyer’s conflict arising under 1.9(a) or (b), resulting from legal work at a pervious place of employment will not be imputed to others at the lawyer’s current firm if these conditions are met:
(i)	The disqualified lawyer is timely “screened” from participation in the matter, including from participating in the fee; and
(ii)	Written notice is promptly given to any affected former client, including a description of the screen, a statement that the lawyer and firm are complying with the screen, a statement that review may be available before a tribunal, and an agreement to respond to written inquiries about the screen. **(1.10(a)(ii)) [should it be 1.10(a)(2)(ii)?]; and
(6)	Certificates of compliance are provided to the former client upon request and at the conclusion of the screen.
Example: Lawyer formerly worked at the firm Able & Baker, where she represented Cargo, Inc. on a patent litigation matter. Lawyer moved to the firm of Delta & Echo, which wants to undertake a patent litigation matter adverse to Cargo on the very same subject matter that Lawyer worked on for Cargo. Lawyer clearly has a former client conflict under 1.9 and cannot work on the matter without the consent of Cargo—which is unlikely to give consent.  But, if her new firm complies with all the provisions of the new version of 1.10, then Lawyer’s disqualification is not imputed to the other attorneys at her new firm and other lawyers at her new firm can undertake the matter adverse to Cargo.
(a)	If a lawyer leaves a firm, and the departed lawyer’s client is no longer a client of the firm, then under 1.10(b) the firm may commence representations adverse to the former client unless:
(i)	The new matter is the same or substantially related to that in which the firm formerly represented the client; and
(ii)	Any lawyer remaining in the firm has confidential information material to the new matter.
Example: While at the firm of Able & Baker, Lawyer represented Cargo, Inc. Then she left that firm and Cargo was no longer a client of Able & Baker. Six months later, a potential new client wants to hire Able & Baker to sue Cargo.  Result: Able & Baker can ethically take on the new matter adverse to Cargo unless the new matter is the same or substantially related to the matter in which  the firm represented  Cargo and any lawyer at Able & Baker has confidential information material to the new matter. 
(b)	Imputed conflicts may be waived as provided in 1.7 (Informed Consent, Confirmed in Writing, “ICCW”).
(c)	The imputation of the conflicts of a lawyer who formerly worked in a government setting is governed by 1.11; imputation of conflicts of former third party neutrals (including former judges) is governed by 1.12.
i.	What conflicts are consentable:
(1)	Only if the lawyer reasonably believes she can fulfill her duties to the client.
(2)	Cannot represent opposing parties in the same lawsuit  (automatically not reasonable).
j.	How can consent be obtained (“basic waiver”).
(1)	“Informed consent, confirmed in writing.”
(2)	Informed consent requires informing the client of implications, disadvantages, etc. of the waiver
(3)	“Confirmed in writing.”
(a)	The consent may be confirmed in writing by obtaining the client’s signature (or other writing) on a consent waiver. 
(b)	The consent may be confirmed in writing by having the lawyer obtain an oral consent and then promptly sending the client a written confirmation of the consent.  (Note: when the lawyer uses this option for confirming the consent in writing, there is no writing obtained from the client.)
(4)	This formula works for current client (1.7) and former client conflicts (1.9) but some of the sub-paragraphs of MR 1.8 do require specific disclosures and writings signed by the client.
7.	Independent Judgment. (2.1)
a.	Lawyer must give candid assessment.
b.	Advice must be independent of outside influences.
c.	Lawyer may, but is not required to, refer to social factors such as morality in addition to providing legal analysis.
d.	Lawyer may seek out advice from other specialists.
8.	Safeguarding Property
a.	Trust Fund Account
(1)	Must keep lawyer’s money and client’s money separate!  To the penny!
(a)	Advance fees. When the client pays the lawyer fees in advance (what lawyers sometimes call “advance retainers”), the fees remain in the trust account until they are earned, after which they must be promptly moved out of the trust account.
(b)	Advanced costs. When the client pays the lawyer costs in advance (e.g., a $25,000 check for the anticipated costs of an expert witness) the advance costs remain in the trust account until they are incurred, after which they must be promptly used to pay the costs incurred. 
(c)	Distinguish: non-refundable retainers
(2)	IOLTA (Interest on Lawyers Trust Account) vs. Interest-bearing account:
(a)	When to use IOLTA or separate trust account:
(i)	If the money is so little and will be in the account for so short of a time that it will not generate interest that can cover the costs of opening the account and then paying interest to that client, then the lawyer must deposit the money in an IOLTA account.  The interest goes to the state bar and is typically used to fund legal services for the poor.
(ii)	If the interest on the money will exceed the cost of the setting up the account (because the amount is large or will be in the trust account for a longer period of time), then the funds should be set up in a separate trust account so that the interest can be paid to the client.
Example: Lawyer asks client for $1,000 in advance costs that lawyer expects to spend in the first three weeks of the engagement. The $1,000 should be placed in an IOLTA trust account.
Example: In preparation for a major patent infringement and antitrust suit, law firm asks client to pay advance fees of $1,000,000 and advance costs of $500,000. Firm expects that most of these fees and costs will not be incurred for several months. Result: the money should go in a separate account that bears interest that is paid to the client.
(b)	Requirements that lawyer place certain funds in IOLTA accounts are constitutional.  (It is a “taking,” but because there would be no interest paid on such small, short-term accounts, no compensation is owed.)
(3)	Disputed funds
(a)	Disputed funds remain in the trust account. The lawyer must get the dispute resolved promptly and if necessary initiate a legal proceeding to determine who owns the funds.
(b)	This is a commonly tested fact pattern!  Even if the client unfairly and unreasonably contests ownership of funds that appear to clearly belong to the lawyer, the lawyer shall not pay out the disputed funds to herself.
Example: Lawyer enters into a contingency fee agreement with client-plaintiff by which lawyer earns 33% of all recovery.  Defendant pays $300,000 to settle the matter. Lawyer places the $300,000 in the IOLTA trust account because she expects the funds to be paid out in the next few days. Client unexpectedly and unfairly reneges on the fee agreement and asserts that lawyer deserves only $5,000 in fees. The lawyer promptly pays the client $200,000 from the trust account because there is no dispute as to the client’s ownership of 66% of the money. Lawyer promptly withdraws $5,000 from the trust account and pays herself because there is no dispute over her ownership of that money. Lawyer leaves the remaining money ($95,000) in the trust account, because they are disputed funds. Lawyer promptly initiates negotiations and if necessary a legal process to determine if she or the client is entitled to the remaining funds. Result: lawyer has correctly handled the situation.
b.	Other property not belonging to the lawyer.
(1)	The lawyer must keep the property “safe and separate” from the lawyer’s own property. 
(2)	Placing the property in a safe deposit box or a safe is a classic method for keeping property “safe and separate.” 
(3)	If the lawyer undertakes to act as an escrow agent, the lawyer assumes a fiduciary duty to others, possibly including non-clients. The lawyer’s desire to benefit a client does not permit the lawyer to violate her duties as escrow agent.
G.	Duties Related to Attorneys’ Fees
1.	Clients may owe lawyers contractual duties, whereas lawyers owe clients fiduciary duties.  
2.	Fees
a.	Under the ABA approach, all fees must be “reasonable.”  Reasonableness turns on time and labor required; novelty required; skill required; customary fees in that market; results obtained, experience, reputation and the ability of the lawyer.  (1.5(a))
(1)	California uses a test of “unconscionability” rather than “reasonableness” for legal fees.  But the factors are similar.  (CRPC 4-200)
b.	Under the ABA approach, the scope of the representation and basis for fee shall be communicated to client, “preferably in writing.”  (1.5(b))
(1)	The lawyer may charge regularly represented clients the same rate as was charged on previous matters.
(2)	Changes in the basis or the rate shall be communicated as well.
c.	In California, the State Bar Act (Cal. Bus. & Prof. Code §6000, et seq.) extensively regulates fee agreements (Cal. Bus. & Prof. Code §6146, et seq.).
(1)	When it’s foreseeable that fees and expenses to the client will exceed $1,000, the lawyer is required to obtain a written fee agreement signed by the lawyer and the client.
(2)	Among other things, the fee agreement shall contain the nature of the services to be rendered, the rates, fees, and charges.
(3)	Bills must state the basis for the charges.
(4)	Failure to comply with the rules about fee agreements and bills renders the agreement voidable at the client’s choice; whereupon the lawyer is entitled to a “reasonable fee” (i.e., quantum meruit).  
d.	Fees may be contingent upon the result obtained.
(1)	Shall be in writing and signed by client.  (1.5)
(2)	Shall state basis for fee; shall state if expenses deducted before or after the contingent fee calculated
(3)	At conclusion of the representation a writing shall set forth the final dispersal of fees and recovery.
(4)	No contingent fees permitted for representing defendant in criminal matters; or in domestic relations matters for securing divorce or upon the amount of alimony or the property settlement. (1.5(d))
(5)	Note: California has extensive regulation of contingency fee agreements in the State Bar Act (at Cal. Bus. & Prof. Code §6146, et seq.)
e.	“Division” of fees (“Fee splitting”): ABA and California approaches.
(1)	When we discussed “fee splitting” we usually mean that the fees paid to one lawyer will be shared (or split) with another lawyer at a different firm.
(2)	As discussed above (§§II.C) lawyers shall not split fees with a non-lawyer.
(3)	Under the ABA approach, a lawyer can split fees with another lawyer in a different firm if client agrees; the client’s agreement is confirmed in writing; total fee is reasonable; and each lawyer’s fee is in proportion to the services performed or if each lawyer assumes joint responsibility for the representation.  (1.5(e))
Example: Lawyer (“first lawyer”) is retained in a personal injury matter and quickly realizes that it requires legal skills she does not possess. She decides to have a lawyer who is experienced in that field work on the matter (“second lawyer”). First lawyer and second lawyer agree that first lawyer will do very little work on the matter and will not assume responsibility for the entire matter and that first lawyer will split the fees 50/50 with the second lawyer. Result: both lawyers have violated 1.5.
Example: Same as the prior example, except that first lawyer will split the fees with second lawyer in a way that reflects the amount of work each has done on the matter. Result: if the client’s consent is properly obtained, the two lawyers have not violated 1.5.
Example: Same as the prior example, except that first lawyer and second lawyer agree that first lawyer is jointly responsible for the representation. Result: if the client’s consent is properly obtained, the two lawyers have not violated 1.5.
(4)	Under the California approach, a lawyer may split fees with a lawyer in another firm if (i) the client has consented in writing after a full disclosure in writing that a division of fees will be made and the terms of the division, and if (ii) the total fee charged by all lawyers is not increased solely by the division and is not unconscionable.
Note that California’s rule does not require that lawyers be compensated in accordance to the work they perform or that all lawyers receiving a division assume responsibility for the matter.  California therefore follows the minority approach in allowing “bare” referral fees or “raw” fee splitting.
Example: Same as the prior examples, except that California law governs. First lawyer and second lawyer agree that first lawyer will do no work on the matter but will receive 1/3 of all the fees that the second lawyer earns on the matter (i.e., “a third of a third”). Result under California law: if the client’s consent is properly obtained, the two lawyers have not violated California’s ethics rules. This arrangement is one that is often called a “bare” referral fee.
H.	Termination of the ACR
1.	Tribunal’s permission needed after appearance:
a.	Once a lawyer has made an appearance before a tribunal, the tribunal’s permission is needed before the lawyer can withdraw.  (1.16(c))
b.	A competent client’s right to terminate an ACR is so strong that a tribunal will ordinarily prohibit a client’s request to terminate the ACR only if the matter is in mid-trial. (case law)
c.	If the tribunal orders a lawyer to continue the ACR, the lawyer shall obey the order even if the ethics rules otherwise suggest that the lawyer must withdraw.  (1.16(c))
2.	Termination by Client:
a.	Subject to any requirement that a tribunal approve the termination of the ACR, a competent client has a nearly absolute right to terminate the ACR.
b.	Termination of the ACR generally terminates the lawyer’s authority to bind the client.  However, the lawyer may have continuing duties to the client and the court upon termination.  (See below)
c.	There is a body of case law to determine what compensation, if any, the client owes the lawyer following termination.
d.	Government lawyers may be protected from termination by various laws (e.g., whistle-blower statutes) or by collective bargaining agreements.
e.	Corporate employee lawyers may or may not have the right to seek damages for wrongful termination.  This is an emerging issue under state law.
3.	Termination by Lawyer: “Shall” withdraw (1.16(a)) if:
a.	Continuing the ACR would breach ethics rules or other governing law (MR 1.16(a)(1)); or
b.	The lawyer’s physical or mental condition materially impairs the lawyer’s ability to carry out the representation (MR 1.16(a)(2)); or 
c.	The lawyer is discharged. (MR 1.16(a)(3))
d.	The CRPC on mandatory withdrawal, at 3-700(B), is substantially similar to the ABA rules, at 1.16(a).
4.	Termination by Lawyer: “May” withdraw 1.16(b)) if:
a.	Can be done without material adverse effects on the interests of the client. (1.16(b)(1))
b.	Client persists in conduct the lawyer reasonably believes is criminal or fraudulent conduct. (1.16(b)(2))
c.	Client has used lawyer’s services to perpetuate a crime or fraud. (1.16(b)(3))
d.	Client insists upon taking action that is “repugnant” to the lawyer and with which the lawyer has a “fundamental disagreement.”  (1.16(b)(4))
e.	Client has breached an obligation or duty to the lawyer and the client was given reasonable warning that the lawyer would withdraw if the breach was not remedied.  (1.16(b)(5))
(1)	This usually involves the client’s failure to pay legal fees.
f.	Representation will unduly burden the lawyer financially or the client has rendered the ACR unreasonably difficult. (1.16(b)(6))
g.	Other good grounds. (1.16(b)(7)) 
h.	The CRPC, at 3-700 (C), provide similar grounds for permissive withdrawal, and also provide for permissive withdrawal if an inability to work with co-counsel renders withdrawal in the client’s best interests.  (3-700(C)(6))
5.	Termination by completion of assigned task
a.	If the A-C engagement contract or the client’s reasonable expectations so provide, the ACR is terminated by the lawyer’s completion of the assigned task.  (MR 1.3(4); Rest. LGL §31)
b.	If the lawyer has represented the client on a number of matters over time or if the client’s reasonable expectations are that the ACR continues even after completion of an assigned task, the ACR may be found to continue.  (MR 1.3(4); Rest. LGL §31)
c.	The lawyer should prevent confusion, and clarify confusion, by use of a writing.
d.	This is a major risk management issue for private practice lawyers.  The recommended course is to send a friendly termination letter at the conclusion of each matter.  
6.	Termination by operation of law occurs upon:
a.	Death or incapacity of lawyer. (Rest LGL §31(2)(d))
(1)	Lawyer’s incapacity includes loss of law license.
b.	Death or incapacity of client. (Rest LGL §31(2)(b))
c.	Court orders terminating the ACR.
(1)	Typically, this results from an order granting disqualification.
d.	When a lawyer changes firms:
(1)	When a lawyer representing a client changes firms, the client has the right to decide who will continue with the ACR.
(2)	Many ethics authorities recommend that the departing lawyer and the prior firm write a joint letter asking the client to decide who will represent client going forward.  
7.	Procedure for withdrawal:
a.	Where no appearance has been made before a tribunal, no formal procedure is required; provided, however, that the terminated lawyer must fulfill the duties upon termination discussed below.
b.	In cases pending before a tribunal, where the terminated lawyer and client agree upon withdrawal, it may be sufficient under local rules to file a “substitution of counsel.”
c.	Some tribunals require a motion to substitute counsel even if the terminated lawyer and client agree upon the withdrawal.  (This is typically required in federal courts.)
d.	If the terminated lawyer and client do not agree upon withdrawal, it is generally necessary to file a contested motion to withdraw. In doing so, the lawyer has a duty to bring the motion in such a way as to avoid prejudicing the client’s interests.  Depending on the situation, that may include informing the court that the withdrawal is premised upon a rule of professional responsibility but while simultaneously omitting the specific details that led to the motion. Sometimes the withdrawing lawyer may offer to reveal some pertinent facts under seal for in camera review.  The lawyer should carefully follow the procedures in that jurisdiction regarding contested motions to withdraw.
8.	Duties pertaining to termination:
a.	The lawyer must comply with tribunal’s rules
b.	The lawyer must withdraw without prejudice to client: generally shall not withdraw on the eve of deadlines where client cannot obtain alternative services.
(1)	The duty of communication generally requires the lawyer to inform the client of deadlines that it or successor client counsel must meet.
(2)	It is prudent for the lawyer to inform the client of the consequences of failing to meet those deadlines and of the fact that the lawyer will not be calendaring those deadlines or further warning client of the deadlines.
c.	The lawyer has a duty to return or “surrender” the client’s file:
(1)	Depending upon local law, the file may actually be the property of the client.
(2)	Generally, the lawyer must promptly deliver the file to the client upon termination of the ACR.
(a)	Under California law, the file must be returned if the client demands it.
(b)	The ABA rule provides that the lawyer shall “surrender paper and property to which the client is entitled.”  (1.16(d))
(c)	Increasing numbers of jurisdictions require the lawyer to deliver any existing electronic documents in the client’s file. That would include emails and e-copies of papers and documents in the file.
(d)	The California, ABA, and majority approach is that it is an ethical violation to refuse to surrender the file until the client has paid legal fees to the lawyer.  (In a minority of states, this is ethically permitted either if the lawyer contracts for a lien on the file or if the law in that state automatically provides for a lien on the file.)
(e)	In California and many other jurisdictions, the lawyer may keep a copy of the client file at the lawyer’s own expense.  (Often, lawyers do this when they fear that a malpractice or liability suit may ensue from the representation.)
d.	The lawyer has a duty to return unearned fees, other funds to which the client is entitled, and any other property belonging to the client.
I.	Post-Termination Duties (duties surviving termination of the ACR).
1.	Rules pertaining to confidentiality survive the ACR.  (e.g., MR 1.6; 1.9(a)-(c))
2.	Lawyer must forward to client or successor counsel any communications the lawyer receives pertaining to the terminated ACR. (Rest LGL §33(2)(c))
3.	The duty of loyalty survives the ACR to the extent the conflict of interest rules turn on the terminated lawyer’s receipt or possession of client confidences.  (e.g., MR 1.6; 1.9(a)-(c))
Additional aspects of the duty of loyalty to former clients are somewhat vague.  For example, some cases suggest that a lawyer should not attack its prior work product, even when the attack does not implicate the lawyer’s duty of confidentiality to terminated clients.
4.	There are a few cases dealing with unusual fact patterns that suggest that a lawyer has a continuing duty of loyalty that precludes the lawyer from attacking her own work product or the subject matter that was the focus of her prior efforts for the former client.
These cases suggest that there may be a residual duty of loyalty to former clients that is not tied to the former client’s confidences.  (See, e.g., Oasis West Realty, LLC v. Goldman, 51 Cal.4th 811 (2011))
V. LAWYERS’ DUTIES TO THIRD PARTIES AND SOCIAL SYSTEMS
DURING THE ATTORNEY CLIENT RELATIONSHIP
A.	Duties to Non-clients during the ACR
1.	Duties to All Third Parties
a.	Lawyers have a duty not to make false statements of fact or law to third persons.  (4.1) 
(1)	Misrepresentations to non-clients are forbidden. Such misrepresentations include false or misleading statements. (“Misleading” statements include those that are partially true but intended to create in the listener a false factual apprehension.)
(2)	Under generally accepted norms of negotiation, certain statements are deemed not to be factual representations. (4.1[2]) For example, (i) statements about the price or value place on the subject of a transaction or the amount that would be an acceptable settlement and (ii) the use of an undisclosed principal are generally deemed not to be material factual representations.
Example: Plaintiff tells her lawyer that she will accept any settlement offer of $100,000 or greater. Plaintiff’s lawyer gets on the phone and says to defendant’s lawyer, “My client will not accept less than $300,000 for her claim.” Result: Lawyer has not violated MR 4.1.
Example: The Walt Disney Company has decided to build a new theme park in a rural region of Indiana and needs to buy several parcels of land. Walt Disney’s lawyer fears that if she reveals that the potential buyer is Walt Disney, the price of the land will sky-rocket. So she forms a half dozen companies with non-descript names like “Jones Family Farm Corporation,” and approaches the farm owners to buy their land. Result: By itself, the use of undisclosed principals is not a violation of MR 1.4. (Note, however, that in other contexts, use of undisclosed principals and proxies might violate substantive law and, if so, the lawyer would not be permitted to facilitate that use.)
b.	Duty to Disclose Material Facts to Avoid Assistance in a Crime or Fraud. (4.1(b))
(1)	When it is necessary to prevent the lawyer from assisting a crime or fraud, and when disclosure is permitted under MR 1.6(b), the lawyer must prevent the assistance, even if prevention results in a disclosure of client confidences. (Recall that “may reveal” situations under 1.6(b) can become “must reveal” situations under the conditions set forth in MR 4.1, 8.1 and 8.3.) The comments to MR 4.1 describe three ways that the lawyer may avoid assisting the crime or fraud.
(a)	The lawyer might simply withdraw from the representation and no longer assist the client who intends to commit a crime or fraud.
(b)	The lawyer might make a “noisy withdrawal” and disaffirm any prior express or implied representations made to the third person or opposing party.
Example: Lawyer is assisting client to sell a large apartment building. Based upon representations from her client, lawyer has told the potential purchaser during negotiations that the building contains no asbestos. Lawyer recently learned from her client that asbestos is present in the building, although client hopes to have it removed before the transaction is consummated. The seller’s lawyer telephones the potential buyer’s lawyer, announces that lawyer is no longer assisting the seller, and “disaffirms” any prior representations she may have made to the potential buyer. (Note that in this scenario, the lawyer for the potential buyer will almost certainly deduce that a misrepresentation has been made to the buyer.)
(c)	The lawyer may reveal the specific client confidence itself when necessary to prevent assisting a crime or fraud.
c.	Respect for rights of all third persons. (4.4)
(1)	The lawyer shall never use means that have no substantial purpose other than to embarrass, delay, or burden a third person (4.4(a));
(2)	A lawyer shall never use methods of obtaining evidence that violate the legal rights of a third person (4.4(a));
(3)	A lawyer who receives a document relating to the representation of the lawyer’s client and knows or should reasonably know that the document was inadvertently sent shall promptly notify the sender (4.4(b)).
2.	Duties to Represented Persons (4.2)(the “no contact rule”)
a.	In representing a client, a lawyer shall not communicate about the subject of the representation with a “person” the lawyer knows to be represented by another lawyer in the matter, unless the lawyer has the consent of the other lawyer or is authorized by law to make the communication.
b.	Note that the ABA version of the rule refers to “persons” represented by counsel. That means that the rule applies even if the person is not, strictly speaking, a “party” in the matter. This distinction often arises when a lawyer wishes to communicate with a witness who is not a party in the matter.
c.	Note that consent from the other lawyer is required. Consent from the third person is not enough. 
d.	The correct application of this rule to prosecutors who wish to contact witnesses has been a matter of debate and disagreement.
e.	The correct application of this rule has been difficult when lawyer know that an organization is represented by counsel in a matter but the lawyer nonetheless wishes to communicate with current or former agents (officers, directors, shareholders, employees) of that organization. (4.2[7]) 
 
3.	Duties to Unrepresented Parties (4.3)
a.	When dealing with unrepresented non-clients, the lawyer shall not state or imply that the lawyer is disinterested.
Example: Lawyer, who represents a victim of a car crash, is investigating the matter and meets with a witness. Lawyer says to the witness, “I’m just to make sure this thing works out well for everybody.” Result: Lawyer has violated 4.3. 
b.	If the lawyer knows that the third party misunderstands the lawyer’s role, the lawyer shall take reasonable steps to correct the misunderstanding.
Example: Lawyer is representing the victim of a car crash and meets with a witness. The witness says, “Gee, I’ve never had my own lawyer before.” Lawyer immediately says, “Let me explain. I am not your lawyer. I do not represent you. I represent only my client, who was rear-ended in the crash.” Result: Lawyer has complied with 4.3. 
c.	If the lawyer knows that the interests of the unrepresented non-client are possibly adverse to the lawyer’s client, the lawyer shall not give legal advice to the unrepresented non-client other than the advice to secure counsel.
B.	Role-Based Duties to Social Systems during the ACR
1.	Litigator/Advocate
a.	Meritorious claims. (3.1). The lawyer may not bring frivolous claims or defenses or assertions.
(1)	In federal courts, this duty is captured in Federal Rule of Civil Procedure 11.
(2)	Fed. R. Civ. P. 11 provides that a lawyer’s signature on a paper or pleading is an affirmation that:
(a)	After reasonable inquiry the asserted position is grounded in law and facts that are known or that may develop during the litigation; and
(b)	The filing is not brought for an improper purpose such as delay or to harass.
(3)	Fed. R. Civ. P. 11 does not forbid a lawyer from bringing a claim, defense or assertion that would amount to a change in existing law if the argument for change is not frivolous. 
(4)	Violation of Fed. R. Civ. P. 11 justifies the imposition of sanctions.
b.	Expediting matters, consistent with client interest. (3.2) The lawyer must expedite litigation, consistent with the client’s interests.
c.	Candor to the tribunal. (3.3)C
(1)	Lawyer must reveal governing law in that jurisdiction even if the law is not favorable to the client.
(2)	The lawyer shall not offer evidence that the lawyer “knows” to be false.  
(a)	With respect to evidence other than the testimony of the criminal defendant client, under the ABA, California, and majority approach, the lawyer cannot offer false evidence even for a criminal defendant client.
(b)	With respect to the testimony of the criminal defendant client that the lawyer knows to be false, the ABA takes the majority approach and California takes the minority approach.
(i)	The ABA/majority approach is that the lawyer shall not offer false evidence even if that is the testimony of the criminal defendant client.  (3.3)  (Note: the Bill of Rights does not guarantee the criminal defendant the right to offer false testimony.  Nix v. Whiteside, 475 U.S. 157 (1986).)
(ii)	California takes the minority approach.  The criminal defense lawyer should “remonstrate” with the client not to commit perjury, should attempt to withdraw if feasible (should not reveal the cause of the attempted withdrawal except to say that it involves duties of professional responsibility), and then, if cannot withdraw?, offer the testimony through narrative questioning that does not involve or implicate the lawyer.  The lawyer shall not argue the false testimony in the closing argument.
(3)	The lawyer may refuse to offer evidence that the lawyer does not “know” to be false but does “reasonably believe” to be false.
(a)	Exception:  the lawyer must offer the testimony of a criminal defendant client, even if the lawyer reasonably believes the testimony is false, if (i) the lawyer does not know that the testimony is false, and (ii) the client chooses to testify.
(4)	Lawyer who has offered false evidence must remedy those falsehoods.  (3.3)
(a)	Until conclusion of tribunal.
(b)	Duty to remedy trumps duty of confidentiality.
(c)	Note: California does not permit revelation of client confidences except to prevent a crime leading to death or substantial bodily harm.  Hence if a California lawyer offers false evidence the lawyer must remedy it unless it would reveal a client confidence.  If it would reveal a client confidence, the lawyer should remonstrate with the client to grant the lawyer permission to remedy the false evidence and, if the client refuses, the lawyer must carefully consider the duty to withdraw from the representation.  If the lawyer does withdraw, she must be careful not to reveal the client confidence as she withdraws.
d.	General fairness to opposing party and counsel. (3.4)
(1)	A lawyer shall not alter or obstruct access to evidence or “material having potential evidentiary value.”
(2)	Shall not falsify evidence, assist a witness to testify falsely, or offer witnesses forbidden inducements.
(3)	Shall not disobey the tribunal, except openly and for good cause.
(4)	Shall not make or oppose discovery demands frivolously.
(5)	Shall not allude at trial to matters the lawyer does not believe are supported by admissible evidence.  
(6)	A lawyer shall not request a person to refrain from voluntarily giving relevant information to another party unless (i) the person is a client, relative of a client, or agent of a client and (ii) the lawyer believes that that person’s interests will not be adversely affected by refraining from giving such information.
e.	Preserving the tribunal’s impartiality and decorum. (3.5)
(1)	Shall not engage in acts intending to disrupt the courtroom.
(2)	Shall not engage in improper contacts with, or attempt to inappropriately influence, anyone associated with the tribunal (e.g., judge, judge’s staff, court room personnel, jurors.)
f.	Trial Publicity. (3.6)
(1)	Shall not disseminate by means of public communication statements that will have substantial likelihood of materially prejudicing an adjudicative proceeding.
(2)	May state basic facts such as claim, information in public record; scheduling; time and place of arrest; etc.
g.	Lawyer as Witness. (3.7)C
(1)	Shall not act as advocate at a trial where the lawyer is a necessary witness unless the lawyer’s testimony concerns:
(a)	An uncontested issue; or 
(b)	The nature or value of legal services provided; or
(c)	Disqualification would work a substantial prejudice to the client.
(2)	Note: another lawyer at the same firm can be the advocate at trial.
h.	Prosecutor.  (3.8)
(1)	A prosecutor is a “minister of justice” and must “do justice.” 
(2)	Shall refrain from prosecuting claim prosecutor knows is not supported by probable cause. (3.8(a))
(3)	Shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that an accused has been advised of the right to counsel. (3.8(b))
(4)	Shall not seek to obtain from unrepresented accuseds any waivers of important rights such as the right to a preliminary hearing. (3.8(c))
(5)	Shall make timely disclosure of exculpatory materials. (3.8(d); U.S. v. Brady)
(6)	Shall not heighten public condemnation of the accused. (3.8(f))
Example: The US Attorney who announced the indictment of former Illinois governor Rod Blagojevich stated the nature of the charges and added that “Abraham Lincoln would be rolling over in his grave” at the thought of what Blagojevich had done. Result: the statements about the nature of the indictment were ethical; the comments about Abraham Lincoln violated 3.8(f).
(7)	Prosecutor’s Post-Conviction Duties:
(a)	If a prosecutor learns of new, material evidence creating a reasonable likelihood that a convicted defendant did not commit the offense for which he was convicted, the prosecutor shall disclose that evidence to an appropriate authority and, if the conviction was obtained in the prosecutor’s jurisdiction, shall disclose the information to the defendant and undertake further investigation into the conviction.
(b)	If the prosecutor knows of clear and convincing evidence establishing that a defendant in the prosecutor’s jurisdiction was convicted of an offense that the defendant did not commit, the prosecutor shall seek to remedy the conviction. 
i.	Lawyer as advocate in non-adjudicative proceeding.  (3.9)
(1)	When a lawyer representing a client is participating in a non-adjudicatory proceeding (e.g., legislative hearings), the lawyer shall disclose to the non-adjudicatory body that she participates in a representative capacity and owes a duty of candor to the non-adjudicatory body.
2.	Evaluator (2.3)
a.	This unusual role applies when the lawyer undertakes to evaluate the client for the benefit of a non-client.  Classically, in business transactions, the acquiror requests that the acquiree’s lawyers make factual assurances to the acquiror about the acquiree.
b.	If evaluation will materially and adversely affect client, lawyer must obtain client’s informed consent.
c.	Lawyer must receive client’s authorization to reveal confidences when evaluating the client.
Example: In a merger transaction, the acquiror demands an opinion letter running from the acquiree’s lawyer to the acquiror, accurately stating whether the acquiree is duly incorporated, who owns the shares in acquiree, etc. Acquiree’s lawyer shall obtain consent from the acquiree to offer the evaluation to the opposing party after disclosing any potential adverse effects on the acquiree-client.
3.	Counselor/Advisor
a.	This role was discussed above, at §IV.F.7, when we discussed the duty of independent judgment.
b.	Notice that sometimes the counselor/advisor does not interface with the public and in some sense remains “hidden.”  But the role is always done with an eye towards the client’s interaction with society. For that reason, the “counselor” role can be seen as part of the lawyer’s duty to the client (i.e., the duty to render independent judgment), but can also be seen as part of the lawyer’s duty to larger social systems (i.e., the lawyer’s duty to the social systems with which the client is participating after receiving the lawyer’s advice).
4.	Negotiator
a.	This role was discussed above, at §V.A.1, when we discussed the duty of truthfulness to third persons.  Those rules apply in this context as well.
b.	Note that when participating as a direct negotiator in a business setting, the law of fraud governs the lawyer.  If the lawyer makes a false statement, or a materially misleading omission, or knowingly fails to disclose a fact that the client is legally required to disclose, the lawyer may be held accountable for money damages for fraud.
c.	Note also that if the negotiation involves certain regulated subject matters, such as securities governed by state or federal law, the lawyer/negotiator may be held to a very high standard of candor to the opposing party in the negotiation.
d.	One recurring fact pattern that causes trouble for lawyers is a negotiation where the client does not wish to reveal some significant fact to the other party in the negotiation.  In that case, the lawyer might wish to rely upon the common law rule of caveat emptor—that is, the rule of “buyer beware” that typically does not require sellers to make full disclosure of all material facts.  But note that the reverse rule may apply—that is, full truth in context may be required—because of a statute; because the seller has decided to make factual disclosures and hence must make complete disclosures to avoid being misleading; or because the contract requires certain forms of disclosure.
 
Appendix A
Concise Summary of Consents under ABA Model Rules
The ABA Model Rules contain about a dozen formulations for obtaining consent and making disclosure, but this summary focuses on just three: (1) “Informed consent, confirmed in writing,” (2) a “Writing signed by the client,” and (3) what I call “Magic words plus opportunity”—advising the client of “the desirability of seeking the advice of independent counsel” and giving a reasonable opportunity to do so.   A few of the rules require a combination of those formulas.
Informed Consent, Confirmed in Writing (ICCW)
Current client conflicts (1.7)
Former client conflicts (1.9)
(Old Version!) Conflicts from imputation of lateral lawyer’s conflicts (“old” 1.10(a))
Lateral movement conflicts for government lawyers (1.11)
Lawyer as adverse witness to client (3.7, cmt. 6)
Writing signed by client (WSC) or Informed Consent, in Writing Signed by Client (IC, WSC)
Doing business with client; obtaining liens, etc., from client (1.8(a)) (Note: IC plus WSC)
Aggregate settlements (1.8(g)) (Note: IC plus WSC)
Contingency fees (1.5(c)) (just WSC)
Magic words plus Opportunity
Doing business with client; obtaining liens, etc., from client (1.8(a)) (Note: plus IC, WSC!)
Settling or resolving client’s malpractice claim against lawyer (1.8(h)(2))

 
Appendix B
Detailed Summary of Consent, Disclosure, and Notification
in the ABA Model Rules and the California Rules of Professional Conduct

I. ABA MODEL RULES OF PROFESSIONAL CONDUCT 
A.	By Rule
1.0(b):	Defines “confirmed in writing”
1.0(e):	Defines “informed consent”
1.0(n):	Defines “writing” and “written”

1.2(c):	Requires “informed consent” before lawyer may limit the scope of the representation.

1.5(b):	Requires that scope of representation, basis for the fee, and the expenses be “communicated to the client, preferably in writing” and that changes in the basis or rate of the fees or expenses “shall also be communicated to the client.”
1.5(c):	Contingent fee agreement “shall be in a writing signed by the client.”  Must “clearly notify the client of any expenses for which the client will be liable.  Upon conclusion of a contingent matter, lawyer shall provide a “written statement stating” the outcome, remittance to the client, and the method of determination.
1.5(d):	The client’s agreement to a lawful division of fees among lawyers not in the same firm shall be “confirmed in writing.”

1.7(b):	Requires that “each affected client gives informed consent, confirmed in writing.”

1.8(a):	Client must be advised in writing of desirability of seeking advice of independent legal counsel and client must give informed consent, in a writing signed by the client.  
1.8(f):	Where lawyer receives compensation from non-client (e.g., third party payor), client must give “informed consent.”
1.8(g):	In case of aggregate settlement, clients must give “informed consent, in a writing signed by the client.”
1.8(h):	When settling malpractice claim, unrepresented clients and former clients must be “advised in writing of the desirability of seeking . . . independent legal counsel.”
1.8(j):	Sexual relationship between lawyer and client forbidden unless “consensual” and already in existence when the attorney client relationship commenced.

1.9(a); 1.9(b):	“Informed consent, confirmed in writing” required for certain adversities to former clients.

1.10(c):	Refers back to the “informed consent, confirmed in writing” requirement of 1.7(b).

1.11(a):	Requires “informed consent, confirmed in writing.”
1.11(b):	Requires that “written notice” is promptly given.  That “notice” is defined at 1.11[7] as “including a description of the screened lawyer’s prior representation and of the screening procedures employed.”
1.11(d)(2)(i):	Lawyer cannot participate unless the government agency gives its “informed consent, confirmed in writing.”

1.12(c)(2):	Former judge neutral cannot participate unless “written notice is promptly given to the parties.”

1.15(d):	Upon receiving any property in which a client or third person has an interest, lawyer shall “promptly notify” that person.
1.17(c):	Requires “written notice” to each client of the proposed sale of law practice and other factors.

1.18(d)(1):	Permits adversity to prospective client where affected client and prospective client give “informed consent, confirmed in writing.”
1.18(d)(2):	Permits adversity to prospective client under certain conditions, including that “written notice” is promptly given.

2.3(b):	Where evaluation is likely to materially and adversely affect client, lawyer cannot proceed without obtaining client’s “informed consent.”

2.4(b):	Lawyer serving as neutral “shall inform” unrepresented parties of lawyer’s role and if lawyer knows that party is confused about the lawyer’s role, the lawyer “shall explain the difference between” a representative role and a neutral role.

3.7[6]:	When lawyer-advocate’s dual role as witness creates a conflict under 1.7 or 1.9, the lawyer must obtain “informed consent, confirmed in writing.”

4.2:	When communicating with person represented by counsel, lawyer must obtain “consent” of other lawyer.

5.7(a):	Lawyer providing law-related services is subject to Model Rules unless lawyer takes “reasonable measures” to “assure” that recipient of services “knows” the services are not legal services and that protections of attorney-client relationship do not exist.

6.4:	Lawyer providing service for law reform organization, who will participate in organization’s decision that will materially benefit lawyer’s client “shall disclose that fact” to the organization.

7.2(b)(4):	Lawyer in cross-referral agreement shall ensure that “client is informed of the existence and nature of the agreement.”
B.	By Type
Informed Consent, Confirmed in Writing (ICCW)
1.7(b)		Current client waivers
1.9(a)		Former client waivers
1.9(b)		Former client waivers
1.10(c) 		Imputation rule refers back to 1.7 formula
1.11(a)		Government lawyers
1.11(d)(2)(i)		Government lawyers 
1.18(d)(1)		Adversity to prospective client
3.7[6]		Lawyer as adverse witness to client

Writings Signed by Client
Either “writing signed by client” (WSC) or informed consent in writing signed by client (ICWSC).
1.5(c) (WSC)		Contingency fee
1.8(a) (ICWSC)		Liens/Doing business with client 
1.8(g) (ICWSC)		Aggregate settlements

Other requirements of writings
“Advised in writing”
1.8(h)	“Magic words”—advising the client of “the desirability of seeking advice of independent counsel”—required when settling malpractice claim with unrepresented client

“Confirmed in writing”
1.5(e)	Division of fees with lawyer not in same firm

“Written notice promptly given”
1.11(b)		 Government lawyer
1.12(c)		Former judge/neutral
1.18(d)(2)	Adversity to prospective client

“Written statement”
1.5(c)	Conclusion of contingency matter

Other Formulas

“Communicated” to client, “preferably” in writing
1.5(b)	Scope of representation and basis of fee

“Communicated to client”
1.5(b)	 Changes in basis or rate of fee or expenses.

“Informed consent”
1.8(f)	Non-client payor
2.3(b)	Materially adverse evaluation

“Consensual”
1.8(j) 	Sexual relationship with client

“Promptly notify”
1.15(d)	Receipt of property

“Written notice”
1.17(c)	Sale of law practice

“Shall inform”
2.4(b)	Inform unrepresented parties that lawyer-neutral not representing them

“Shall explain”
2.4(b)	Explain to party when it misunderstands lawyer-neutral’s role

“Consent”
4.2	From other lawyer when communicating with represented party

“Reasonable measures to assure person knows”
5.7(a)	Law related services

“Shall disclose”
6.4	Law reform beneficially affecting client

“Inform client”
7.2(b)(4)	Cross referral agreement
 
Appendix C
Principal Differences between California and ABA Ethics Rules
These are not the only differences between the California Rules of Professional Conduct and the ABA Model Rules of Professional Conduct, but in my opinion these are the differences most likely to arise in essay questions on the California bar examination.
Fee Agreements
Under the ABA approach, it is “preferable” but not required that non-contingency fee agreements be in writing. (1.5)  Contingency fees must be in a “writing signed by the client” (1.5(c)).
Under the California approach, if the representation is likely to exceed $1,000 the fee agreement must be in a writing signed by the lawyer and client.  (Cal. Bus. & Prof. Code §6148)(Exception: if the client is a corporation, there is no requirement for a written or signed fee agreement.) Legal bills shall include the amount, rate, basis for calculation, or other method of determining the fee (§6148).  California extensively regulates how contingency fee agreements must be in a writing signed by the client and lawyer (§6147).  
Fees (Unreasonable vs. Unconscionable)
Under the ABA approach, fees cannot be “unreasonable” (1.5).
Under the California approach, fees cannot be “unconscionable” (4-200).
Referral Fees
Under the ABA approach, it is not proper to give a referring lawyer a fee for the act of referring the matter.  (Note that under the ABA approach, the referring lawyer could still share in the legal fee by either assuming joint responsibility for the matter or by doing some of the work on the matter.  See MR 1.5 for details.)
Under the California approach, a lawyer may receive a referral fee if the division of fees is fully disclosed in writing to the client; if the total fees are not thereby increased; and if the client consents in writing.  See CRPC 2-200 for details.  (This is sometimes called a “bare” referral fee.)
Contracting to Limit Malpractice Liability
Under the ABA approach, a lawyer may contract with the client to limit the lawyer’s exposure and liability for malpractice, if the client is actually represented on that contract by independent counsel (1.8(h)).  Note, however, that few jurisdictions follow the ABA’s rule on this point; most ban such limitations on liability.
Under the California approach, such contracts are prohibited.  (3-400)
Confidentiality
Under the ABA approach, there are six “may” exceptions to the duty of confidentiality in the rule on confidentiality (1.6).  In addition there is a “may” reveal exception in the rule on representing organizations (1.13); a “must” reveal exception if the lawyer has offered false evidence or is aware of corruption of the tribunal (3.3); and a type of “must” reveal exception if revelation is the only way to prevent assisting the client in a fraudulent or criminal act (4.1, which covers so-called “noisy withdrawals” and in extreme cases outright revelations of client confidences). 
Under the California approach, the only exception in the State Bar Act (§6068(e)) and the rules (3-100) is a “may” reveal exception to prevent a crime leading to death or substantial bodily harm.  Notice the requirement of a “crime,” which is not part of the ABA’s similar exception on this point.  Notice, too, that under case law the lawyer has a limited exception to reveal confidences to the extent necessary to sue to collect a fee, to defend against claims by the client, or to defend the lawyer against criminal charges.
Conflicts
Under the ABA approach, there are two kinds of current client conflicts: “direct adversity” conflicts under 1.7(a)(1), and “material limitation” conflicts under 1.7(a)(2).  Both kinds require client consent.  Client consent must be “informed consent, confirmed in writing” (ICCW), but that written confirmation may be of two types: (1) a writing signed by the client; or (2) an oral consent promptly followed by a written confirmation from the lawyer to the client.
Under the California approach, there are two types of adverse interests: (1) the kinds of direct adversity to current and former clients that normally count as conflicts [3-310(C) & (F)]; and (2) relationships (personal, business, professional, or legal) that the lawyer may have or had with persons affected by the legal matter [3.310(B)].  The former can be consented only in a writing from the client.  Normally that is accomplished by sending the client a writing laying out all the relevant circumstances and reasonably foreseeable adverse consequences and asking the client to sign the writing if they consent.  The latter may be resolved—note that client “consent” is not required—by sending the client “written disclosure,” which must contain the relevant circumstances and reasonably foreseeable adverse consequences.  (3-310(A))  But in the case of written disclosure, no writing from the client is required.
Sexual Relationships with Clients
Under the ABA approach, lawyers shall not have sexual relationships with clients unless a consensual sexual relationship existed when the ACR commenced.  (1.8(j))  Obviously, coercing a client to have a sexual relationship is a severe breach of fiduciary duty.
Under the California approach, the ethics rules do not forbid such relationships between spouses or if the relationship predated the ACR.  (3-120)  Otherwise the rules forbid such relationships if they interfere with the lawyer’s competence. Obviously, coercing a client to have a sexual relationship is a severe breach of fiduciary duty.
Lawyer as Witness (the Lawyer-Advocate Rule)
Under the ABA approach, leaving aside uncontested matters and testimony about the nature and value of legal services rendered (when the advocate may testify), even if the client consents the court may order disqualification in order to protect the fact finder from confusion or protect the opposing side from prejudice.  (3.7)  The rule requires a balancing of interests among the client, the opponent, and the tribunal.
Under the California approach, leaving aside uncontested matters and testimony about the nature and value of legal services rendered (when the advocate may testify), the rule applies only to jury trials and the issue can be resolved by obtaining the informed, written consent of the party whose lawyer will be a witness.  The rule involves focusing only on the advocate and her client.
Reporting Misconduct by other Lawyers and Judges
Under the ABA approach, lawyers and judges have a duty to report other lawyers and judges if they know about facts that raise a substantial question about the other’s honesty, trustworthiness, or fitness to be a lawyer (or judge).  (8.2; Judicial Rule 2.15)
Under the California approach, there is no duty to report misconduct by other lawyers or by judges; there is, however, a duty to self-report various information to the Bar. (Cal. Bus. & Prof. Code §6068(o))
 
Appendix D
Catalog of Ethics Issues Raised
on Recent California Bar Examination Essay Questions
February 2010
•	100% of essay question: sharing fees with non-lawyer; inadvertently revealing client confidence; responsibility for malpractice of other lawyer working from the common office; failure to supervise non-lawyer subordinate.
July 2009
•	50% of essay question; malicious prosecution; litigation with the intent to harass.
•	100% of essay question; criminal prosecutor's ethics; criminal defense attorney ethics; trial publicity rule; obstructing access to witnesses; destruction and alteration of evidence (Michael Nifong fact pattern); California and ABA
•	33% of essay question; California and ABA duty of confidentiality; (“Death or substantial bodily harm” exception). 
•	33% of essay question; motion for new attorney (withdrawal and termination).
February 2009
•	100% of essay question; ABA and California; attorneys' fees; taking stock in client’s company in lieu of fees; duty of confidentiality. 
July 2008
•	100% of essay question; California and ABA; competence of lawyer; hiring suspended lawyer; fee splitting.
February 2008
•	100% of essay question; California & ABA; conflict with personal feelings of lawyer; duty of confidentiality & whistle blowing for safety reasons; withdrawal due to repugnance toward client.
•	50% of essay question; California & ABA; assisting Unauthorized Practice of Law (UPL); partnership with non-lawyer; sharing legal fees with non-lawyer.
July 2007
•	None!
February 2007
•	50% of essay question; California & ABA; conflicts of interest in business formation; conflicts of interest in entity representation.
 
July 2006
•	100% of essay question; California & ABA; contingency fee formalities; advancing money to the client; undisclosed financial terms; sex with client; coercive settlement.
February 2006
•	50% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; providing non-legal services; doing business with client; adversity to client.
July 2005
•	50% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; lawyer serving on client's corporate board; lawyer conflict of interest representing director against corporate client.
•	100% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; lawyer getting contingency fee in divorce case; solicitation; sexual relations with client; not communicating settlement offer to client; reasonableness of 50% contingency fee.
February 2005
•	100% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; no-contact rule; inadvertent production of privileged document; work product; attorney client privilege.
July 2004
•	100% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; cappers and runners - cash for solicitation; solicitation through others; no contact rule; plaintiff's personal injury lawyer.
•	50% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; malpractice; causation is “but for,” or “case within a case”; allowing statute of limitations to run.
February 2004
•	100% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; representation of elderly father; conflict with former client (father's daughter); waiver of privilege by not meeting with client alone; payment of legal fees by non-client.
July 2003
•	50% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; represented corporation but personally traded on insider information.
•	100% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; in-house lawyer meets with corporate client's employee, learns of toxic dumping; duty of confidentiality.
February 2003
•	100% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; government lawyer moves to private practice and opposes law she help shaped while government lawyer; represents two private clients in challenging the law.
 
July 2002
•	100% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; competence where lawyer had never done a criminal case before; conflict between non-client parent paying bill and 18-year-old client; coercing settlement; fee splitting.
February 2002
•	50% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; lawyer coercively drafts trust instrument for family member in a manner that benefits the lawyer.
July 2001
•	50% of essay question; no jurisdiction specified; lawyer added tort claim to complaint based on unsubstantiated statement from client; client later informed lawyer the claim was false; lawyer let claim lapse but did not correct it or dismiss it.
 
Appendix F
A Mnemonic-Driven Model for PR Essay Questions on the Bar Examination
I will offer three mnemonics: one for duties lawyers owe clients; one regarding legal fees; and one for the roles that lawyers play.  Note that the mnemonics don’t cover all the substantive rules.  But, for test takers who prefer a mnemonic approach, they can be used to generate an outline of issues to discuss.
AC at the CDC to fight CLISP
CRAWLS
CLAPDANCES
•	What is the “Attorney Client Relationship”?
In the attorney client relationship, fiduciary duties (e.g., loyalty) run from the lawyer to the client, contractual duties (e.g., the duty to pay legal fees) run from client to lawyer, and the authority for decision-making is shared.  Graphically:
 

•	What are the fiduciary duties running from Attorney to Client?
Here’s my cheesy mnemonic.  Suppose a tropical disease called “CLISP” was running wild.  We’d expect the CDC (Center for Disease Control) to fight the epidemic.  Because CLISP is a tropical disease that flourishes in warmer temperatures, the CDC laboratories fighting CLISP make heavy use of AC (air conditioning) to keep the labs cools.
AC at CDC to fight CLISP.  
AC = “Abide & Consult.”  Abide by the competent client’s decisions regarding objectives; and Consult with the client about tactics. 
CDC = Competence, Diligence, and Communication.  These are basic duties you owe the client.
 
CLISP = 
	Confidentiality
	Loyalty (conflicts of interest)
	Independent judgment
	Safeguarding Property of the Client
•	What about fees?
Here’s a mnemonic for commonly tested issues regarding fees: CRAWLS.  I am not giving a complete set of rules under each issue, but am touching on highlights.
Contingency fees.
I won’t cover all the rules regarding contingency fees, but they must be in writings signed by clients; are not permitted in criminal defense or for securing a divorce or for securing property in a divorce; and must be “reasonable” (ABA) or not “unconscionable” (California).  
Reasonable/Unconscionable
The general benchmark for fees in the ABA approach is “reasonable,” but in the California approach is “not unconscionable.”  The factors for determining that are basically identical and are commonsense: difficulty, effort required, how specialized it was, results obtained, market rate for similar services, etc.
Accounts (Trust and General)
Advance payments of fees and costs remain in the trust account until earned (fees) or spent (costs).  Any disputed funds remain in the trust account until the dispute is resolved.
Writings
Under the ABA approach, a written fee agreement is “preferred” but not required.  Under the California approach, if the fees will exceed $1,000 then a written agreement is required for clients other than corporations.  Under both approaches, contingency fees must be signed by the client.
Liens and “Doing Business” with clients.  
Whenever you take a possessory interest (e.g., lien) from a client, or go into business with a client, the transaction must be reasonable (ABA & California); you must get a WSC (writing signed by client); and you must put the “magic words” in writing (i.e., advise the client of the desirability of seeking independent counsel and give the client a reasonable opportunity to do so).
Sharing fees with lawyers and non-lawyers.
You can’t share legal fees with non-lawyers; although you may pay non-lawyer employees their salaries, benefits, and profit-sharing plans.  
Under the ABA approach, you cannot share fees with lawyers at other firms unless they assume responsibilities for the entire matter or do a portion of the work for a portion of the fees.  (1.5(e)) You need ICCW (informed consent, confirmed in writing) for the arrangement.
Under the California approach, you can offer a lawyer not at your firm a “bare referral” fee simply for referring you the matter, and you may shares fees with lawyers from other firms actually working on the matter, if the client consents in writing and the total fees are not increased. (2-200)
•	What are professional “roles”?
The word “role” is used many ways when talking about lawyers.  I’m using it in a specific way: “roles” are sets of ethical rules that apply when lawyers are performing particular functions.  For example, special ethical rules regulate the role of “criminal prosecutor.”  When we define any particular role, we specify the duties that the lawyer owes to larger social systems such as the courts or the public markets.  
Let’s look at the roles that lawyers play when representing clients.  When a lawyer is representing a client, she is literally “re-presenting” the client to a tribunal or in another social setting.  While doing so, a lawyer typically acts in one of various sub-roles.  
The lawyers’ main roles are CLAPDANCES.
Corporations and organizational client (client is the entity , not the officers; report bad news up the ‘chain of command’ of org, etc.)
Litigators:
Advocates (general rules for litigators)
Prosecutors (ministers of justice; must fight fair)
Defense lawyers – criminal.  May put state to its burden of proof
A – (filler letter!  Ignore!)
Negotiator (can’t commit fraud; no false statements to 3rd parties)
Counselor (honest, candid, independent advice to the client)
Evaluator (when making factual description of client for benefit of non-clients, get client consent re. confidences and tell no lies!)
Supervisors & Subordinates (reasonably insure ethics below you; subordinates can “follow orders” if it’s a “reasonable resolution of an arguable question (RRAQ).
Hence lawyers have duties running in two directions—to clients and to society.
 

•	How could I use the model to answer essay questions on the bar examination?
First, if you reach a PR essay question, ask yourself, “What duties does this lawyer owe to the client?”  For that, work down your “AC at CDC to fight CLISP” mnemonic and decide what duties are implicated by the fact pattern.  When you address each duty that seems applicable to the fact pattern, underline the key word so that the grader will see that you’re addressing an important issue.  Suppose your believe that the fact pattern calls for discussion of diligence, communication and safeguarding property.  Start consecutive paragraphs like this:
Lawyer owes Client the duty of Diligence.  Here, . . . [discussion of facts relevant to diligence] 
Lawyer owes Client the duty of Communication.  Here,  [discussion of facts to communication] 
Lawyer owes Client the duty of Safeguarding Property.  Here,  [discussion of facts to safeguarding property]
Second, look hard at fees and money issues, using the CRAWLS mnemonic. These are frequently tested!
Third, do the same thing about the duties that run from the Attorney to society.  Use your CLAPDANCES mnemonic and underline key duties.  For example:
As a litigator, Lawyer owes the duty of candor to the tribunal  . . . 
As a negotiator, Lawyer owes the opposing party a duty not to commit fraud  . . . 
As a criminal defense lawyer, Lawyer may put the state to its proof even if Lawyer knows that client really did commit the crime  . . . 
As a subordinate lawyer, Mary must act ethically but may follow a superior’s instructions if it’s a reasonable resolution of an arguable question (RRAQ).
Then trace those duties with reference to facts in the question.
Remember: duties run from the lawyer in two opposite directions: to the client and to society (e.g., courts, opponents, third parties, etc.).  For the former, the “AC at CDC to fight CLISP” may help you think of points to make.  For the latter, focusing on what role the lawyers is playing (CLAPDANCES) may help.  And fees run from the client to the lawyer — CRAWLS.  Good luck.
 
Appendix H
Spotting Issues of Fee Sharing, Fee Splitting and Referral Fees
It is sometimes difficult to distinguish fact patterns dealing with (1) fee sharing with non-lawyers, (2) fee splitting with lawyers at a different firm, and (3) referral fees. It’s important to spot the difference.
1.	Fact patterns dealing with fee sharing with non-lawyers often involve the lawyer sharing legal fees with a secretary, paralegal, or other non-lawyer. Sometimes they involve non-lawyers who join a partnership with lawyers or vice versa. 
2.	Fact patterns dealing with fee splitting often involve two lawyers at different firms who wish to jointly benefit from a particular case. There is usually a focus on whether one of the lawyers has done enough work on the matter and assumed enough responsibility on the matter to warrant the amount of fees being offered to that lawyer.
3.	Fact patterns dealing with referral fees are similar to fee splitting fact patterns but one lawyer does nothing on the matter except refer it to the second lawyer. Referral fees are not permitted under the ABA rules. They are permitted under the rules of several states, but there is usually a requirement that the lawyer obtain client consent in a particular manner.
 
Appendix I
Summary of Exceptions to the Duty of Confidentiality
May Reveal Exceptions:
(1)	Death or substantial bodily harm. (1.6(b)(1))
(2)	To prevent substantial financial injury from a crime or fraud where the lawyer’s services have been used in furtherance of the crime or fraud. (1.6(b)(2))
(3)	To rectify substantial financial injury from a crime or fraud where the lawyer’s services have been used in furtherance of the crime or fraud. (1.6(b)(3))
(4)	To obtain advice about the lawyer’s ethical duties. (1.6(b)(4))
(5)	To defend the lawyer from suits or accusations of improprieties or in disputes between the lawyer and the client. (1.6(b)(5))
(6)	To comply with court orders. (1.6(b)(6))
(7)	To prevent injury to an organizational client if the lawyer’s efforts to resolve the matter by reporting up the “chain of command” did not resolve the matter. (1.13(b))
Must Reveal Exceptions:
(1)	To correct false evidence offered by the lawyer. (3.3)
(2)	If there is a “may reveal” exception under 1.6(b), as detailed above, and if the conditions of the following rules are satisfied, the “may reveal” situation becomes a “must reveal” situation:
a)	Under rules 4.1 and 1.2, to prevent the lawyer’s assistance in a crime or fraud;
b)	Under 8.1, when relaying factual information to an authority that is responsible for making decisions about admission to the bar;
c)	Under 8.3, when reporting information that raises substantial questions about the fitness of a lawyer or judge to practice.
 
SELECTED ETHICS RULES OF VARIOUS STATES 
PREAMBLE AND SCOPE
PREAMBLE:  A LAWYER'S RESPONSIBILITIES
[1] A lawyer, as a member of the legal profession, is a representative of clients, an officer of the legal system and a public citizen having special responsibility for the quality of justice.
[2] As a representative of clients, a lawyer performs various functions. As advisor, a lawyer provides a client with an informed understanding of the client's legal rights and obligations and explains their practical implications. As advocate, a lawyer zealously asserts the client's position under the rules of the adversary system. As negotiator, a lawyer seeks a result advantageous to the client but consistent with requirements of honest dealings with others. As an evaluator, a lawyer acts by examining a client's legal affairs and reporting about them to the client or to others.
[3] In addition to these representational functions, a lawyer may serve as a third-party neutral, a nonrepresentational role helping the parties to resolve a dispute or other matter. Some of these Rules apply directly to lawyers who are or have served as third-party neutrals. See, e.g., Rules 1.12 and 2.4. In addition, there are Rules that apply to lawyers who are not active in the practice of law or to practicing lawyers even when they are acting in a nonprofessional capacity. For example, a lawyer who commits fraud in the conduct of a business is subject to discipline for engaging in conduct involving dishonesty, fraud, deceit or misrepresentation. See Rule 8.4.
[4] In all professional functions a lawyer should be competent, prompt and diligent. A lawyer should maintain communication with a client concerning the representation. A lawyer should keep in confidence information relating to representation of a client except so far as disclosure is required or permitted by the Rules of Professional Conduct or other law.
[5] A lawyer's conduct should conform to the requirements of the law, both in professional service to clients and in the lawyer's business and personal affairs. A lawyer should use the law's procedures only for legitimate purposes and not to harass or intimidate others. A lawyer should demonstrate respect for the legal system and for those who serve it, including judges, other lawyers and public officials. While it is a lawyer's duty, when necessary, to challenge the rectitude of official action, it is also a lawyer's duty to uphold legal process.
[6] As a public citizen, a lawyer should seek improvement of the law, access to the legal system, the administration of justice and the quality of service rendered by the legal profession. As a member of a learned profession, a lawyer should cultivate knowledge of the law beyond its use for clients, employ that knowledge in reform of the law and work to strengthen legal education. In addition, a lawyer should further the public's understanding of and confidence in the rule of law and the justice system because legal institutions in a constitutional democracy depend on popular participation and support to maintain their authority. A lawyer should be mindful of deficiencies in the administration of justice and of the fact that the poor, and sometimes persons who are not poor, cannot afford adequate legal assistance. Therefore, all lawyers should devote professional time and resources and use civic influence to ensure equal access to our system of justice for all those who because of economic or social barriers cannot afford or secure adequate legal counsel. A lawyer should aid the legal profession in pursuing these objectives and should help the bar regulate itself in the public interest.
[7] Many of a lawyer's professional responsibilities are prescribed in the Rules of Professional Conduct, as well as substantive and procedural law. However, a lawyer is also guided by personal conscience and the approbation of professional peers. A lawyer should strive to attain the highest level of skill, to improve the law and the legal profession and to exemplify the legal profession's ideals of public service.
[8] A lawyer's responsibilities as a representative of clients, an officer of the legal system and a public citizen are usually harmonious. Thus, when an opposing party is well represented, a lawyer can be a zealous advocate on behalf of a client and at the same time assume that justice is being done. So also, a lawyer can be sure that preserving client confidences ordinarily serves the public interest because people are more likely to seek legal advice, and thereby heed their legal obligations, when they know their communications will be private.
[9] In the nature of law practice, however, conflicting responsibilities are encountered. Virtually all difficult ethical problems arise from conflict between a lawyer's responsibilities to clients, to the legal system and to the lawyer's own interest in remaining an ethical person while earning a satisfactory living. The Rules of Professional Conduct often prescribe terms for resolving such conflicts. Within the framework of these Rules, however, many difficult issues of professional discretion can arise. Such issues must be resolved through the exercise of sensitive professional and moral judgment guided by the basic principles underlying the Rules. These principles include the lawyer's obligation zealously to protect and pursue a client's legitimate interests, within the bounds of the law, while maintaining a professional, courteous and civil attitude toward all persons involved in the legal system.
[10] The legal profession is largely self-governing. Although other professions also have been granted powers of self-government, the legal profession is unique in this respect because of the close relationship between the profession and the processes of government and law enforcement. This connection is manifested in the fact that ultimate authority over the legal profession is vested largely in the courts.
[11] To the extent that lawyers meet the obligations of their professional calling, the occasion for government regulation is obviated. Self-regulation also helps maintain the legal profession's independence from government domination. An independent legal profession is an important force in preserving government under law, for abuse of legal authority is more readily challenged by a profession whose members are not dependent on government for the right to practice.
[12] The legal profession's relative autonomy carries with it special responsibilities of self-government. The profession has a responsibility to assure that its regulations are conceived in the public interest and not in furtherance of parochial or self-interested concerns of the bar. Every lawyer is responsible for observance of the Rules of Professional Conduct. A lawyer should also aid in securing their observance by other lawyers. Neglect of these responsibilities compromises the independence of the profession and the public interest which it serves.
[13] Lawyers play a vital role in the preservation of society. The fulfillment of this role requires an understanding by lawyers of their relationship to our legal system. The Rules of Professional Conduct, when properly applied, serve to define that relationship.
SCOPE
[14] The Rules of Professional Conduct are rules of reason. They should be interpreted with reference to the purposes of legal representation and of the law itself. Some of the Rules are imperatives, cast in the terms "shall" or "shall not." These define proper conduct for purposes of professional discipline. Others, generally cast in the term "may," are permissive and define areas under the Rules in which the lawyer has discretion to exercise professional judgment. No disciplinary action should be taken when the lawyer chooses not to act or acts within the bounds of such discretion. Other Rules define the nature of relationships between the lawyer and others. The Rules are thus partly obligatory and disciplinary and partly constitutive and descriptive in that they define a lawyer's professional role. Many of the Comments use the term "should." Comments do not add obligations to the Rules but provide guidance for practicing in compliance with the Rules.
[15] The Rules presuppose a larger legal context shaping the lawyer's role. That context includes court rules and statutes relating to matters of licensure, laws defining specific obligations of lawyers and substantive and procedural law in general. The Comments are sometimes used to alert lawyers to their responsibilities under such other law.
[16] Compliance with the Rules, as with all law in an open society, depends primarily upon understanding and voluntary compliance, secondarily upon reinforcement by peer and public opinion and finally, when necessary, upon enforcement through disciplinary proceedings. The Rules do not, however, exhaust the moral and ethical considerations that should inform a lawyer, for no worthwhile human activity can be completely defined by legal rules. The Rules simply provide a framework for the ethical practice of law.
[17] Furthermore, for purposes of determining the lawyer's authority and responsibility, principles of substantive law external to these Rules determine whether a client-lawyer relationship exists. Most of the duties flowing from the client-lawyer relationship attach only after the client has requested the lawyer to render legal services and the lawyer has agreed to do so. But there are some duties, such as that of confidentiality under Rule 1.6, that attach when the lawyer agrees to consider whether a client-lawyer relationship shall be established. See Rule 1.18. Whether a client-lawyer relationship exists for any specific purpose can depend on the circumstances and may be a question of fact.
[18] Under various legal provisions, including constitutional, statutory and common law, the responsibilities of government lawyers may include authority concerning legal matters that ordinarily reposes in the client in private client-lawyer relationships. For example, a lawyer for a government agency may have authority on behalf of the government to decide upon settlement or whether to appeal from an adverse judgment. Such authority in various respects is generally vested in the attorney general and the state's attorney in state government, and their federal counterparts, and the same may be true of other government law officers. Also, lawyers under the supervision of these officers may be authorized to represent several government agencies in intragovernmental legal controversies in circumstances where a private lawyer could not represent multiple private clients. These Rules do not abrogate any such authority.
[19] Failure to comply with an obligation or prohibition imposed by a Rule is a basis for invoking the disciplinary process. The Rules presuppose that disciplinary assessment of a lawyer's conduct will be made on the basis of the facts and circumstances as they existed at the time of the conduct in question and in recognition of the fact that a lawyer often has to act upon uncertain or incomplete evidence of the situation. Moreover, the Rules presuppose that whether or not discipline should be imposed for a violation, and the severity of a sanction, depend on all the circumstances, such as the willfulness and seriousness of the violation, extenuating factors and whether there have been previous violations.
[20] Violation of a Rule should not itself give rise to a cause of action against a lawyer nor should it create any presumption in such a case that a legal duty has been breached. In addition, violation of a Rule does not necessarily warrant any other nondisciplinary remedy, such as disqualification of a lawyer in pending litigation. The Rules are designed to provide guidance to lawyers and to provide a structure for regulating conduct through disciplinary agencies. They are not designed to be a basis for civil liability. Furthermore, the purpose of the Rules can be subverted when they are invoked by opposing parties as procedural weapons. The fact that a Rule is a just basis for a lawyer's self-assessment, or for sanctioning a lawyer under the administration of a disciplinary authority, does not imply that an antagonist in a collateral proceeding or transaction has standing to seek enforcement of the Rule. Nevertheless, since the Rules do establish standards of conduct by lawyers, a lawyer's violation of a Rule may be evidence of breach of the applicable standard of conduct.
[21] The Comment accompanying each Rule explains and illustrates the meaning and purpose of the Rule. The Preamble and this note on Scope provide general orientation. The Comments are intended as guides to interpretation, but the text of each Rule is authoritative.

 
RULE 1.0:	TERMINOLOGY
Client-Lawyer Relationship

(a) "Belief" or "believes" denotes that the person involved actually supposed the fact in question to be true. A person's belief may be inferred from circumstances.
(b) "Confirmed in writing," when used in reference to the informed consent of a person, denotes informed consent that is given in writing by the person or a writing that a lawyer promptly transmits to the person confirming an oral informed consent. See paragraph (e) for the definition of "informed consent." If it is not feasible to obtain or transmit the writing at the time the person gives informed consent, then the lawyer must obtain or transmit it within a reasonable time thereafter.
(c) "Firm" or "law firm" denotes a lawyer or lawyers in a law partnership, professional corporation, sole proprietorship or other association authorized to practice law; or lawyers employed in a legal services organization or the legal department of a corporation or other organization.
(d) "Fraud" or "fraudulent" denotes conduct that is fraudulent under the substantive or procedural law of the applicable jurisdiction and has a purpose to deceive.
(e) "Informed consent" denotes the agreement by a person to a proposed course of conduct after the lawyer has communicated adequate information and explanation about the material risks of and reasonably available alternatives to the proposed course of conduct.
(f)  "Knowingly," "known," or "knows" denotes actual knowledge of the fact in question. A person's knowledge may be inferred from circumstances.
(g) "Partner" denotes a member of a partnership, a shareholder in a law firm organized as a professional corporation, or a member of an association authorized to practice law.
(h) "Reasonable" or "reasonably" when used in relation to conduct by a lawyer denotes the conduct of a reasonably prudent and competent lawyer.
(i)  "Reasonable belief" or "reasonably believes" when used in reference to a lawyer denotes that the lawyer believes the matter in question and that the circumstances are such that the belief is reasonable.
(j)  "Reasonably should know" when used in reference to a lawyer denotes that a lawyer of reasonable prudence and competence would ascertain the matter in question.
(k) "Screened" denotes the isolation of a lawyer from any participation in a matter through the timely imposition of procedures within a firm that are reasonably adequate under the circumstances to protect information that the isolated lawyer is obligated to protect under these Rules or other law.
(l)  "Substantial" when used in reference to degree or extent denotes a material matter of clear and weighty importance.
(m) "Tribunal" denotes a court, an arbitrator in a binding arbitration proceeding or a legislative body, administrative agency or other body acting in an adjudicative capacity. A legislative body, administrative agency or other body acts in an adjudicative capacity when a neutral official, after the presentation of evidence or legal argument by a party or parties, will render a binding legal judgment directly affecting a party's interests in a particular matter.
(n) "Writing" or "written" denotes a tangible or electronic record of a communication or representation, including handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photography, audio or videorecording, and electronic communications. A "signed" writing includes an electronic sound, symbol or process attached to or logically associated with a writing and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the writing.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.0
Confirmed in Writing
[1]  If it is not feasible to obtain or transmit a written confirmation at the time the client gives informed consent, then the lawyer must obtain or transmit it within a reasonable time thereafter. If a lawyer has obtained a client's informed consent, the lawyer may act in reliance on that consent so long as it is confirmed in writing within a reasonable time thereafter.
Firm
[2]  Whether two or more lawyers constitute a firm within paragraph (c) can depend on the specific facts. For example, two practitioners who share office space and occasionally consult or assist each other ordinarily would not be regarded as constituting a firm. However, if they present themselves to the public in a way that suggests that they are a firm or conduct themselves as a firm, they should be regarded as a firm for purposes of the Rules. The terms of any formal agreement between associated lawyers are relevant in determining whether they are a firm, as is the fact that they have mutual access to information concerning the clients they serve. Furthermore, it is relevant in doubtful cases to consider the underlying purpose of the Rule that is involved. A group of lawyers could be regarded as a firm for purposes of the Rule that the same lawyer should not represent opposing parties in litigation, while it might not be so regarded for purposes of the Rule that information acquired by one lawyer is attributed to another.
[3]  With respect to the law department of an organization, including the government, there is ordinarily no question that the members of the department constitute a firm within the meaning of the Rules of Professional Conduct. There can be uncertainty, however, as to the identity of the client. For example, it may not be clear whether the law department of a corporation represents a subsidiary or an affiliated corporation, as well as the corporation by which the members of the department are directly employed. A similar question can arise concerning an unincorporated association and its local affiliates.
[4]  Similar questions can also arise with respect to lawyers in legal aid and legal services organizations. Depending upon the structure of the organization, the entire organization or different components of it may constitute a firm or firms for purposes of these Rules.
Fraud
[5]  When used in these Rules, the terms "fraud" or "fraudulent" refer to conduct that is characterized as such under the substantive or procedural law of the applicable jurisdiction and has a purpose to deceive. This does not include merely negligent misrepresentation or negligent failure to apprise another of relevant information. For purposes of these Rules, it is not necessary that anyone has suffered damages or relied on the misrepresentation or failure to inform.
Informed Consent
[6]  Many of the Rules of Professional Conduct require the lawyer to obtain the informed consent of a client or other person (e.g., a former client or, under certain circumstances, a prospective client) before accepting or continuing representation or pursuing a course of conduct. See, e.g., Rules 1.2(c), 1.6(a) and 1.7(b). The communication necessary to obtain such consent will vary according to the Rule involved and the circumstances giving rise to the need to obtain informed consent. The lawyer must make reasonable efforts to ensure that the client or other person possesses information reasonably adequate to make an informed decision. Ordinarily, this will require communication that includes a disclosure of the facts and circumstances giving rise to the situation, any explanation reasonably necessary to inform the client or other person of the material advantages and disadvantages of the proposed course of conduct and a discussion of the client's or other person's options and alternatives. In some circumstances it may be appropriate for a lawyer to advise a client or other person to seek the advice of other counsel. A lawyer need not inform a client or other person of facts or implications already known to the client or other person; nevertheless, a lawyer who does not personally inform the client or other person assumes the risk that the client or other person is inadequately informed and the consent is invalid. In determining whether the information and explanation provided are reasonably adequate, relevant factors include whether the client or other person is experienced in legal matters generally and in making decisions of the type involved, and whether the client or other person is independently represented by other counsel in giving the consent. Normally, such persons need less information and explanation than others, and generally a client or other person who is independently represented by other counsel in giving the consent should be assumed to have given informed consent.
[7]  Obtaining informed consent will usually require an affirmative response by the client or other person. In general, a lawyer may not assume consent from a client's or other person's silence. Consent may be inferred, however, from the conduct of a client or other person who has reasonably adequate information about the matter. A number of Rules require that a person's consent be confirmed in writing. See Rules 1.7(b) and 1.9(a). For a definition of "writing" and "confirmed in writing," see paragraphs (n) and (b). Other Rules require that a client's consent be obtained in a writing signed by the client. See, e.g., Rules 1.8(a) and (g). For a definition of "signed," see paragraph (n).
Screened
[8]  This definition applies to situations where screening of a personally disqualified lawyer is permitted to remove imputation of a conflict of interest under Rules 1.10, 1.11, 1.12 or 1.18.
[9]  The purpose of screening is to assure the affected parties that confidential information known by the personally disqualified lawyer remains protected. The personally disqualified lawyer should acknowledge the obligation not to communicate with any of the other lawyers in the firm with respect to the matter. Similarly, other lawyers in the firm who are working on the matter should be informed that the screening is in place and that they may not communicate with the personally disqualified lawyer with respect to the matter. Additional screening measures that are appropriate for the particular matter will depend on the circumstances. To implement, reinforce and remind all affected lawyers of the presence of the screening, it may be appropriate for the firm to undertake such procedures as a written undertaking by the screened lawyer to avoid any communication with other firm personnel and any contact with any firm files or other information, including information in electronic form, relating to the matter, written notice and instructions to all other firm personnel forbidding any communication with the screened lawyer relating to the matter, denial of access by the screened lawyer to firm files or other information, including information in electronic form, relating to the matter and periodic reminders of the screen to the screened lawyer and all other firm personnel.
[10]  In order to be effective, screening measures must be implemented as soon as practical after a lawyer or law firm knows or reasonably should know that there is a need for screening.


RULE 1.1	COMPETENCE
Client-Lawyer Relationship
A lawyer shall provide competent representation to a client. Competent representation requires the legal knowledge, skill, thoroughness and preparation reasonably necessary for the representation.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.1
Legal Knowledge and Skill
[1]  In determining whether a lawyer employs the requisite knowledge and skill in a particular matter, relevant factors include the relative complexity and specialized nature of the matter, the lawyer's general experience, the lawyer's training and experience in the field in question, the preparation and study the lawyer is able to give the matter and whether it is feasible to refer the matter to, or associate or consult with, a lawyer of established competence in the field in question. In many instances, the required proficiency is that of a general practitioner. Expertise in a particular field of law may be required in some circumstances.
[2]  A lawyer need not necessarily have special training or prior experience to handle legal problems of a type with which the lawyer is unfamiliar. A newly admitted lawyer can be as competent as a practitioner with long experience. Some important legal skills, such as the analysis of precedent, the evaluation of evidence and legal drafting, are required in all legal problems. Perhaps the most fundamental legal skill consists of determining what kind of legal problems a situation may involve, a skill that necessarily transcends any particular specialized knowledge. A lawyer can provide adequate representation in a wholly novel field through necessary study. Competent representation can also be provided through the association of a lawyer of established competence in the field in question.
[3]  In an emergency a lawyer may give advice or assistance in a matter in which the lawyer does not have the skill ordinarily required where referral to or consultation or association with another lawyer would be impractical. Even in an emergency, however, assistance should be limited to that reasonably necessary in the circumstances, for ill-considered action under emergency conditions can jeopardize the client's interest.
[4]  A lawyer may accept representation where the requisite level of competence can be achieved by reasonable preparation. This applies as well to a lawyer who is appointed as counsel for an unrepresented person. See also Rule 6.2.
Thoroughness and Preparation
[5]  Competent handling of a particular matter includes inquiry into and analysis of the factual and legal elements of the problem, and use of methods and procedures meeting the standards of competent practitioners. It also includes adequate preparation. The required attention and preparation are determined in part by what is at stake; major litigation and complex transactions ordinarily require more extensive treatment than matters of lesser complexity and consequence. An agreement between the lawyer and the client regarding the scope of the representation may limit the matters for which the lawyer is responsible. See Rule 1.2(c).
Retaining or Contracting With Other Lawyers
[6]  Before a lawyer retains or contracts with other lawyers outside the lawyer’s own firm to provide or assist in the provision of legal services to a client, the lawyer should ordinarily obtain informed consent from the client and must reasonably believe that the other lawyers’ services will contribute to the competent and ethical representation of the client.  See also Rules 1.2 (allocation of authority), 1.4 (communication with client), 1.5(e) (fee sharing), 1.6 (confidentiality), and 5.5(a) (unauthorized practice of law).  The reasonableness of the decision to retain or contract with other lawyers outside the lawyer’s own firm will depend upon the circumstances, including the education, experience and reputation of the nonfirm lawyers; the nature of the services assigned to the nonfirm lawyers; and the legal protections, professional conduct rules, and ethical environments of the jurisdictions in which the services will be performed, particularly relating to confidential information.
[7]  When lawyers from more than one law firm are providing legal services to the client on a particular matter, the lawyers ordinarily should consult with each other and the client about the scope of their respective representations and the allocation of responsibility among them. See Rule 1.2.  When making allocations of responsibility in a matter pending before a tribunal, lawyers and parties may have additional obligations that are a matter of law beyond the scope of these Rules.
Maintaining Competence
[8]  To maintain the requisite knowledge and skill, a lawyer should keep abreast of changes in the law and its practice, including the benefits and risks associated with relevant technology, engage in continuing study and education and comply with all continuing legal education requirements to which the lawyer is subject.

RULE 1.2:	SCOPE OF REPRESENTATION AND ALLOCATION
OF AUTHORITY BETWEEN CLIENT AND LAWYER
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) Subject to paragraphs (c) and (d), a lawyer shall abide by a client's decisions concerning the objectives of representation and, as required by Rule 1.4, shall consult with the client as to the means by which they are to be pursued. A lawyer may take such action on behalf of the client as is impliedly authorized to carry out the representation. A lawyer shall abide by a client's decision whether to settle a matter. In a criminal case, the lawyer shall abide by the client's decision, after consultation with the lawyer, as to a plea to be entered, whether to waive jury trial and whether the client will testify.
(b) A lawyer's representation of a client, including representation by appointment, does not constitute an endorsement of the client's political, economic, social or moral views or activities.
(c) A lawyer may limit the scope of the representation if the limitation is reasonable under the circumstances and the client gives informed consent.
(d) A lawyer shall not counsel a client to engage, or assist a client, in conduct that the lawyer knows is criminal or fraudulent, but a lawyer may discuss the legal consequences of any proposed course of conduct with a client and may counsel or assist a client to make a good faith effort to determine the validity, scope, meaning or application of the law.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.2
Allocation of Authority between Client and Lawyer
[1] Paragraph (a) confers upon the client the ultimate authority to determine the purposes to be served by legal representation, within the limits imposed by law and the lawyer's professional obligations. The decisions specified in paragraph (a), such as whether to settle a civil matter, must also be made by the client. See Rule 1.4(a)(1) for the lawyer's duty to communicate with the client about such decisions. With respect to the means by which the client's objectives are to be pursued, the lawyer shall consult with the client as required by Rule 1.4(a)(2) and may take such action as is impliedly authorized to carry out the representation.
[2] On occasion, however, a lawyer and a client may disagree about the means to be used to accomplish the client's objectives. Clients normally defer to the special knowledge and skill of their lawyer with respect to the means to be used to accomplish their objectives, particularly with respect to technical, legal and tactical matters. Conversely, lawyers usually defer to the client regarding such questions as the expense to be incurred and concern for third persons who might be adversely affected. Because of the varied nature of the matters about which a lawyer and client might disagree and because the actions in question may implicate the interests of a tribunal or other persons, this Rule does not prescribe how such disagreements are to be resolved. Other law, however, may be applicable and should be consulted by the lawyer. The lawyer should also consult with the client and seek a mutually acceptable resolution of the disagreement. If such efforts are unavailing and the lawyer has a fundamental disagreement with the client, the lawyer may withdraw from the representation. See Rule 1.16(b)(4). Conversely, the client may resolve the disagreement by discharging the lawyer. See Rule 1.16(a)(3).
[3] At the outset of a representation, the client may authorize the lawyer to take specific action on the client's behalf without further consultation. Absent a material change in circumstances and subject to Rule 1.4, a lawyer may rely on such an advance authorization. The client may, however, revoke such authority at any time.
[4] In a case in which the client appears to be suffering diminished capacity, the lawyer's duty to abide by the client's decisions is to be guided by reference to Rule 1.14.
Independence from Client's Views or Activities
[5] Legal representation should not be denied to people who are unable to afford legal services, or whose cause is controversial or the subject of popular disapproval. By the same token, representing a client does not constitute approval of the client's views or activities.
Agreements Limiting Scope of Representation
[6] The scope of services to be provided by a lawyer may be limited by agreement with the client or by the terms under which the lawyer's services are made available to the client. When a lawyer has been retained by an insurer to represent an insured, for example, the representation may be limited to matters related to the insurance coverage. A limited representation may be appropriate because the client has limited objectives for the representation. In addition, the terms upon which representation is undertaken may exclude specific means that might otherwise be used to accomplish the client's objectives. Such limitations may exclude actions that the client thinks are too costly or that the lawyer regards as repugnant or imprudent.
[7] Although this Rule affords the lawyer and client substantial latitude to limit the representation, the limitation must be reasonable under the circumstances. If, for example, a client's objective is limited to securing general information about the law the client needs in order to handle a common and typically uncomplicated legal problem, the lawyer and client may agree that the lawyer's services will be limited to a brief telephone consultation. Such a limitation, however, would not be reasonable if the time allotted was not sufficient to yield advice upon which the client could rely. Although an agreement for a limited representation does not exempt a lawyer from the duty to provide competent representation, the limitation is a factor to be considered when determining the legal knowledge, skill, thoroughness and preparation reasonably necessary for the representation. See Rule 1.1.
[8] All agreements concerning a lawyer's representation of a client must accord with the Rules of Professional Conduct and other law. See, e.g., Rules 1.1, 1.8 and 5.6.
Criminal, Fraudulent and Prohibited Transactions
[9] Paragraph (d) prohibits a lawyer from knowingly counseling or assisting a client to commit a crime or fraud. This prohibition, however, does not preclude the lawyer from giving an honest opinion about the actual consequences that appear likely to result from a client's conduct. Nor does the fact that a client uses advice in a course of action that is criminal or fraudulent of itself make a lawyer a party to the course of action. There is a critical distinction between presenting an analysis of legal aspects of questionable conduct and recommending the means by which a crime or fraud might be committed with impunity.
[10] When the client's course of action has already begun and is continuing, the lawyer's responsibility is especially delicate. The lawyer is required to avoid assisting the client, for example, by drafting or delivering documents that the lawyer knows are fraudulent or by suggesting how the wrongdoing might be concealed. A lawyer may not continue assisting a client in conduct that the lawyer originally supposed was legally proper but then discovers is criminal or fraudulent. The lawyer must, therefore, withdraw from the representation of the client in the matter. See Rule 1.16(a). In some cases, withdrawal alone might be insufficient. It may be necessary for the lawyer to give notice of the fact of withdrawal and to disaffirm any opinion, document, affirmation or the like. See Rule 4.1.
[11] Where the client is a fiduciary, the lawyer may be charged with special obligations in dealings with a beneficiary.
[12] Paragraph (d) applies whether or not the defrauded party is a party to the transaction. Hence, a lawyer must not participate in a transaction to effectuate criminal or fraudulent avoidance of tax liability. Paragraph (d) does not preclude undertaking a criminal defense incident to a general retainer for legal services to a lawful enterprise. The last clause of paragraph (d) recognizes that determining the validity or interpretation of a statute or regulation may require a course of action involving disobedience of the statute or regulation or of the interpretation placed upon it by governmental authorities.
[13] If a lawyer comes to know or reasonably should know that a client expects assistance not permitted by the Rules of Professional Conduct or other law or if the lawyer intends to act contrary to the client's instructions, the lawyer must consult with the client regarding the limitations on the lawyer's conduct. See Rule 1.4(a)(5).

RULE 1.3:	DILIGENCE
Client-Lawyer Relationship
A lawyer shall act with reasonable diligence and promptness in representing a client.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.3
[1] A lawyer should pursue a matter on behalf of a client despite opposition, obstruction or personal inconvenience to the lawyer, and take whatever lawful and ethical measures are required to vindicate a client's cause or endeavor. A lawyer must also act with commitment and dedication to the interests of the client and with zeal in advocacy upon the client's behalf. A lawyer is not bound, however, to press for every advantage that might be realized for a client. For example, a lawyer may have authority to exercise professional discretion in determining the means by which a matter should be pursued. See Rule 1.2. The lawyer's duty to act with reasonable diligence does not require the use of offensive tactics or preclude the treating of all persons involved in the legal process with courtesy and respect.
[2] A lawyer's work load must be controlled so that each matter can be handled competently.
[3] Perhaps no professional shortcoming is more widely resented than procrastination. A client's interests often can be adversely affected by the passage of time or the change of conditions; in extreme instances, as when a lawyer overlooks a statute of limitations, the client's legal position may be destroyed. Even when the client's interests are not affected in substance, however, unreasonable delay can cause a client needless anxiety and undermine confidence in the lawyer's trustworthiness. A lawyer's duty to act with reasonable promptness, however, does not preclude the lawyer from agreeing to a reasonable request for a postponement that will not prejudice the lawyer's client.
[4] Unless the relationship is terminated as provided in Rule 1.16, a lawyer should carry through to conclusion all matters undertaken for a client. If a lawyer's employment is limited to a specific matter, the relationship terminates when the matter has been resolved. If a lawyer has served a client over a substantial period in a variety of matters, the client sometimes may assume that the lawyer will continue to serve on a continuing basis unless the lawyer gives notice of withdrawal. Doubt about whether a client-lawyer relationship still exists should be clarified by the lawyer, preferably in writing, so that the client will not mistakenly suppose the lawyer is looking after the client's affairs when the lawyer has ceased to do so. For example, if a lawyer has handled a judicial or administrative proceeding that produced a result adverse to the client and the lawyer and the client have not agreed that the lawyer will handle the matter on appeal, the lawyer must consult with the client about the possibility of appeal before relinquishing responsibility for the matter. See Rule 1.4(a)(2). Whether the lawyer is obligated to prosecute the appeal for the client depends on the scope of the representation the lawyer has agreed to provide to the client. See Rule 1.2.
[5] To prevent neglect of client matters in the event of a sole practitioner's death or disability, the duty of diligence may require that each sole practitioner prepare a plan, in conformity with applicable rules, that designates another competent lawyer to review client files, notify each client of the lawyer's death or disability, and determine whether there is a need for immediate protective action. Cf. Rule 28 of the American Bar Association Model Rules for Lawyer Disciplinary Enforcement (providing for court appointment of a lawyer to inventory files and take other protective action in absence of a plan providing for another lawyer to protect the interests of the clients of a deceased or disabled lawyer).

RULE 1.4	COMMUNICATIONS
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) A lawyer shall:
(1) promptly inform the client of any decision or circumstance with respect to which the client's informed consent, as defined in Rule 1.0(e), is required by these Rules;
(2) reasonably consult with the client about the means by which the client's objectives are to be accomplished;
(3) keep the client reasonably informed about the status of the matter;
(4) promptly comply with reasonable requests for information; and
(5) consult with the client about any relevant limitation on the lawyer's conduct when the lawyer knows that the client expects assistance not permitted by the Rules of Professional Conduct or other law.
(b) A lawyer shall explain a matter to the extent reasonably necessary to permit the client to make informed decisions regarding the representation.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.4
[1]  Reasonable communication between the lawyer and the client is necessary for the client effectively to participate in the representation.
Communicating with Client
[2]  If these Rules require that a particular decision about the representation be made by the client, paragraph (a)(1) requires that the lawyer promptly consult with and secure the client's consent prior to taking action unless prior discussions with the client have resolved what action the client wants the lawyer to take. For example, a lawyer who receives from opposing counsel an offer of settlement in a civil controversy or a proffered plea bargain in a criminal case must promptly inform the client of its substance unless the client has previously indicated that the proposal will be acceptable or unacceptable or has authorized the lawyer to accept or to reject the offer. See Rule 1.2(a).
[3]  Paragraph (a)(2) requires the lawyer to reasonably consult with the client about the means to be used to accomplish the client's objectives. In some situations — depending on both the importance of the action under consideration and the feasibility of consulting with the client — this duty will require consultation prior to taking action. In other circumstances, such as during a trial when an immediate decision must be made, the exigency of the situation may require the lawyer to act without prior consultation. In such cases the lawyer must nonetheless act reasonably to inform the client of actions the lawyer has taken on the client's behalf.  Additionally, paragraph (a)(3) requires that the lawyer keep the client reasonably informed about the status of the matter, such as significant developments affecting the timing or the substance of the representation.
[4]  A lawyer's regular communication with clients will minimize the occasions on which a client will need to request information concerning the representation. When a client makes a reasonable request for information, however, paragraph (a)(4) requires prompt compliance with the request, or if a prompt response is not feasible, that the lawyer, or a member of the lawyer's staff, acknowledge receipt of the request and advise the client when a response may be expected. A lawyer should promptly respond to or acknowledge client communications.
Explaining Matters
[5]  The client should have sufficient information to participate intelligently in decisions concerning the objectives of the representation and the means by which they are to be pursued, to the extent the client is willing and able to do so. Adequacy of communication depends in part on the kind of advice or assistance that is involved. For example, when there is time to explain a proposal made in a negotiation, the lawyer should review all important provisions with the client before proceeding to an agreement. In litigation a lawyer should explain the general strategy and prospects of success and ordinarily should consult the client on tactics that are likely to result in significant expense or to injure or coerce others. On the other hand, a lawyer ordinarily will not be expected to describe trial or negotiation strategy in detail. The guiding principle is that the lawyer should fulfill reasonable client expectations for information consistent with the duty to act in the client's best interests, and the client's overall requirements as to the character of representation. In certain circumstances, such as when a lawyer asks a client to consent to a representation affected by a conflict of interest, the client must give informed consent, as defined in Rule 1.0(e).
[6]  Ordinarily, the information to be provided is that appropriate for a client who is a comprehending and responsible adult. However, fully informing the client according to this standard may be impracticable, for example, where the client is a child or suffers from diminished capacity. See Rule 1.14. When the client is an organization or group, it is often impossible or inappropriate to inform every one of its members about its legal affairs; ordinarily, the lawyer should address communications to the appropriate officials of the organization. See Rule 1.13.  Where many routine matters are involved, a system of limited or occasional reporting may be arranged with the client.
Withholding Information
[7]  In some circumstances, a lawyer may be justified in delaying transmission of information when the client would be likely to react imprudently to an immediate communication. Thus, a lawyer might withhold a psychiatric diagnosis of a client when the examining psychiatrist indicates that disclosure would harm the client. A lawyer may not withhold information to serve the lawyer's own interest or convenience or the interests or convenience of another person. Rules or court orders governing litigation may provide that information supplied to a lawyer may not be disclosed to the client. Rule 3.4(c) directs compliance with such rules or orders.

RULE 1.5:	FEES
Client-Lawyer Relationship
[IDAHO]
(a) A lawyer shall not make an agreement for, charge, or collect an unreasonable fee or an unreasonable amount for expenses. The factors to be considered in determining the reasonableness of a fee include the following:
(1) the time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal service properly;
(2) the likelihood, if apparent to the client, that the acceptance of the particular employment will preclude other employment by the lawyer;
(3) the fee customarily charged in the locality for similar legal services;
(4) the amount involved and the results obtained;
(5) the time limitations imposed by the client or by the circumstances;
(6) the nature and length of the professional relationship with the client;
(7) the experience, reputation, and ability of the lawyer or lawyers performing the services; and
(8) whether the fee is fixed or contingent.
(b) The scope of the representation and the basis or rate of the fee and expenses for which the client will be responsible shall be communicated to the client, preferably in writing, before or within a reasonable time after commencing the representation, except when the lawyer will charge a regularly represented client on the same basis or rate. Any changes in the basis or rate of the fee or expenses shall also be communicated to the client.
(c) A fee may be contingent on the outcome of the matter for which the service is rendered, except in a matter in which a contingent fee is prohibited by paragraph (d) or other law. A contingent fee agreement shall be in a writing signed by the client and shall state the method by which the fee is to be determined, including the percentage or percentages that shall accrue to the lawyer in the event of settlement, trial or appeal; litigation and other expenses to be deducted from the recovery; and whether such expenses are to be deducted before or after the contingent fee is calculated. The agreement must clearly notify the client of any expenses for which the client will be liable whether or not the client is the prevailing party. Upon conclusion of a contingent fee matter, the lawyer shall provide the client with a written statement stating the outcome of the matter and, if there is a recovery, showing the remittance to the client and the method of its determination.
(d) A lawyer shall not enter into an arrangement for, charge, or collect:
(1) any fee in a domestic relations matter, the payment or amount of which is contingent upon the securing of a divorce or upon the amount of alimony or support, or property settlement in lieu thereof; or
(2) a contingent fee for representing a defendant in a criminal case.
(e) A division of a fee between lawyers who are not in the same firm may be made only if:
(1) the division is in proportion to the services performed by each lawyer or each lawyer assumes joint responsibility for the representation;
(2) the client agrees to the arrangement, including the share each lawyer will receive, and the agreement is confirmed in writing; and
(3) the total fee is reasonable.

COMMENT ON RULE 1.5
Reasonableness of Fee and Expenses
[1] Paragraph (a) requires that lawyers charge fees that are reasonable under the circumstances. The factors specified in (1) through (8) are not exclusive. Nor will each factor be relevant in each instance. Paragraph (a) also requires that expenses for which the client will be charged must be reasonable. A lawyer may seek reimbursement for the cost of services performed in-house, such as copying, or for other expenses incurred in-house, such as telephone charges, either by charging a reasonable amount to which the client has agreed in advance or by charging an amount that reasonably reflects the cost incurred by the lawyer.
Basis or Rate of Fee
[2] When the lawyer has regularly represented a client, they ordinarily will have evolved an understanding concerning the basis or rate of the fee and the expenses for which the client will be responsible. In a new client-lawyer relationship, however, an understanding as to fees and expenses must be promptly established. Generally, it is desirable to furnish the client with at least a simple memorandum or copy of the lawyer's customary fee arrangements that states the general nature of the legal services to be provided, the basis, rate or total amount of the fee and whether and to what extent the client will be responsible for any costs, expenses or disbursements in the course of the representation. A written statement concerning the terms of the engagement reduces the possibility of misunderstanding.
[3] Contingent fees, like any other fees, are subject to the reasonableness standard of paragraph (a) of this Rule. In determining whether a particular contingent fee is reasonable, or whether it is reasonable to charge any form of contingent fee, a lawyer must consider the factors that are relevant under the circumstances. Applicable law may impose limitations on contingent fees, such as a ceiling on the percentage allowable, or may require a lawyer to offer clients an alternative basis for the fee. Applicable law also may apply to situations other than a contingent fee, for example, government regulations regarding fees in certain tax matters.
Terms of Payment
[4] A lawyer may require advance payment of a fee, but is obliged to return any unearned portion. See Rule 1.16(d). A lawyer may accept property in payment for services, such as an ownership interest in an enterprise, providing this does not involve acquisition of a proprietary interest in the cause of action or subject matter of the litigation contrary to Rule 1.8 (i). However, a fee paid in property instead of money may be subject to the requirements of Rule 1.8(a) because such fees often have the essential qualities of a business transaction with the client.
[5] An agreement may not be made whose terms might induce the lawyer improperly to curtail services for the client or perform them in a way contrary to the client's interest. For example, a lawyer should not enter into an agreement whereby services are to be provided only up to a stated amount when it is foreseeable that more extensive services probably will be required, unless the situation is adequately explained to the client. Otherwise, the client might have to bargain for further assistance in the midst of a proceeding or transaction. However, it is proper to define the extent of services in light of the client's ability to pay. A lawyer should not exploit a fee arrangement based primarily on hourly charges by using wasteful procedures.
Prohibited Contingent Fees
[6] Paragraph (d) prohibits a lawyer from charging a contingent fee in a domestic relations matter when payment is contingent upon the securing of a divorce or upon the amount of alimony or support or property settlement to be obtained. This provision does not preclude a contract for a contingent fee for legal representation in connection with the recovery of post-judgment balances due under support, alimony or other financial orders because such contracts do not implicate the same policy concerns.
Division of Fee
[7] A division of fee is a single billing to a client covering the fee of two or more lawyers who are not in the same firm. A division of fee facilitates association of more than one lawyer in a matter in which neither alone could serve the client as well, and most often is used when the fee is contingent and the division is between a referring lawyer and a trial specialist. Paragraph (e) permits the lawyers to divide a fee either on the basis of the proportion of services they render or if each lawyer assumes responsibility for the representation as a whole. In addition, the client must agree to the arrangement, including the share that each lawyer is to receive, and the agreement must be confirmed in writing. Contingent fee agreements must be in a writing signed by the client and must otherwise comply with paragraph (c) of this Rule. Joint responsibility for the representation entails financial and ethical responsibility for the representation as if the lawyers were associated in a partnership. A lawyer should only refer a matter to a lawyer whom the referring lawyer reasonably believes is competent to handle the matter. See Rule 1.1.
[8] Paragraph (e) does not prohibit or regulate division of fees to be received in the future for work done when lawyers were previously associated in a law firm.
Disputes over Fees
[9] If a procedure has been established for resolution of fee disputes, such as an arbitration or mediation procedure established by the bar, the lawyer must comply with the procedure when it is mandatory, and, even when it is voluntary, the lawyer should conscientiously consider submitting to it. Law may prescribe a procedure for determining a lawyer's fee, for example, in representation of an executor or administrator, a class or a person entitled to a reasonable fee as part of the measure of damages. The lawyer entitled to such a fee and a lawyer representing another party concerned with the fee should comply with the prescribed procedure.

RULE 1.6:	CONFIDENTIALITY OF INFORMATION
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) A lawyer shall not reveal information relating to the representation of a client unless the client gives informed consent, the disclosure is impliedly authorized in order to carry out the representation or the disclosure is permitted by paragraph (b).
(b) A lawyer may reveal information relating to the representation of a client to the extent the lawyer reasonably believes necessary:
(1) to prevent reasonably certain death or substantial bodily harm;
(2) to prevent the client from committing a crime or fraud that is reasonably certain to result in substantial injury to the financial interests or property of another and in furtherance of which the client has used or is using the lawyer's services;
(3) to prevent, mitigate or rectify substantial injury to the financial interests or property of another that is reasonably certain to result or has resulted from the client's commission of a crime or fraud in furtherance of which the client has used the lawyer's services;
(4) to secure legal advice about the lawyer's compliance with these Rules;
(5) to establish a claim or defense on behalf of the lawyer in a controversy between the lawyer and the client, to establish a defense to a criminal charge or civil claim against the lawyer based upon conduct in which the client was involved, or to respond to allegations in any proceeding concerning the lawyer's representation of the client; 
(6) to comply with other law or a court order; or
(7) to detect and resolve conflicts of interest arising from the lawyer’s change of employment or from changes in the composition or ownership of a firm, but only if the revealed information would not compromise the attorney-client privilege or otherwise prejudice the client. 
(c) A lawyer shall make reasonable efforts to prevent the inadvertent or unauthorized disclosure of, or unauthorized access to, information relating to the representation of a client.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.6
[1]  This Rule governs the disclosure by a lawyer of information relating to the representation of a client during the lawyer's representation of the client. See Rule 1.18 for the lawyer's duties with respect to information provided to the lawyer by a prospective client, Rule 1.9(c)(2) for the lawyer's duty not to reveal information relating to the lawyer's prior representation of a former client and Rules 1.8(b) and 1.9(c)(1) for the lawyer's duties with respect to the use of such information to the disadvantage of clients and former clients.
[2]  A fundamental principle in the client-lawyer relationship is that, in the absence of the client's informed consent, the lawyer must not reveal information relating to the representation. See Rule 1.0(e) for the definition of informed consent. This contributes to the trust that is the hallmark of the client-lawyer relationship. The client is thereby encouraged to seek legal assistance and to communicate fully and frankly with the lawyer even as to embarrassing or legally damaging subject matter. The lawyer needs this information to represent the client effectively and, if necessary, to advise the client to refrain from wrongful conduct. Almost without exception, clients come to lawyers in order to determine their rights and what is, in the complex of laws and regulations, deemed to be legal and correct. Based upon experience, lawyers know that almost all clients follow the advice given, and the law is upheld.
[3]  The principle of client-lawyer confidentiality is given effect by related bodies of law: the attorney-client privilege, the work product doctrine and the rule of confidentiality established in professional ethics. The attorney-client privilege and work product doctrine apply in judicial and other proceedings in which a lawyer may be called as a witness or otherwise required to produce evidence concerning a client. The rule of client-lawyer confidentiality applies in situations other than those where evidence is sought from the lawyer through compulsion of law. The confidentiality rule, for example, applies not only to matters communicated in confidence by the client but also to all information relating to the representation, whatever its source. A lawyer may not disclose such information except as authorized or required by the Rules of Professional Conduct or other law. See also Scope.
[4]  Paragraph (a) prohibits a lawyer from revealing information relating to the representation of a client. This prohibition also applies to disclosures by a lawyer that do not in themselves reveal protected information but could reasonably lead to the discovery of such information by a third person. A lawyer's use of a hypothetical to discuss issues relating to the representation is permissible so long as there is no reasonable likelihood that the listener will be able to ascertain the identity of the client or the situation involved.
Authorized Disclosure
[5]  Except to the extent that the client's instructions or special circumstances limit that authority, a lawyer is impliedly authorized to make disclosures about a client when appropriate in carrying out the representation. In some situations, for example, a lawyer may be impliedly authorized to admit a fact that cannot properly be disputed or to make a disclosure that facilitates a satisfactory conclusion to a matter. Lawyers in a firm may, in the course of the firm's practice, disclose to each other information relating to a client of the firm, unless the client has instructed that particular information be confined to specified lawyers.
Disclosure Adverse to Client
[6]  Although the public interest is usually best served by a strict rule requiring lawyers to preserve the confidentiality of information relating to the representation of their clients, the confidentiality rule is subject to limited exceptions. Paragraph (b)(1) recognizes the overriding value of life and physical integrity and permits disclosure reasonably necessary to prevent reasonably certain death or substantial bodily harm. Such harm is reasonably certain to occur if it will be suffered imminently or if there is a present and substantial threat that a person will suffer such harm at a later date if the lawyer fails to take action necessary to eliminate the threat. Thus, a lawyer who knows that a client has accidentally discharged toxic waste into a town's water supply may reveal this information to the authorities if there is a present and substantial risk that a person who drinks the water will contract a life-threatening or debilitating disease and the lawyer's disclosure is necessary to eliminate the threat or reduce the number of victims.
[7]  Paragraph (b)(2) is a limited exception to the rule of confidentiality that permits the lawyer to reveal information to the extent necessary to enable affected persons or appropriate authorities to prevent the client from committing a crime or fraud, as defined in Rule 1.0(d), that is reasonably certain to result in substantial injury to the financial or property interests of another and in furtherance of which the client has used or is using the lawyer’s services. Such a serious abuse of the client-lawyer relationship by the client forfeits the protection of this Rule. The client can, of course, prevent such disclosure by refraining from the wrongful conduct. Although paragraph (b)(2) does not require the lawyer to reveal the client’s misconduct, the lawyer may not counsel or assist the client in conduct the lawyer knows is criminal or fraudulent. See Rule 1.2(d). See also Rule 1.16 with respect to the lawyer’s obligation or right to withdraw from the representation of the client in such circumstances, and Rule 1.13(c), which permits the lawyer, where the client is an organization, to reveal information relating to the representation in limited circumstances.
[8]  Paragraph (b)(3) addresses the situation in which the lawyer does not learn of the client’s crime or fraud until after it has been consummated. Although the client no longer has the option of preventing disclosure by refraining from the wrongful conduct, there will be situations in which the loss suffered by the affected person can be prevented, rectified or mitigated. In such situations, the lawyer may disclose information relating to the representation to the extent necessary to enable the affected persons to prevent or mitigate reasonably certain losses or to attempt to recoup their losses. Paragraph (b)(3) does not apply when a person who has committed a crime or fraud thereafter employs a lawyer for representation concerning that offense.
[9]  A lawyer's confidentiality obligations do not preclude a lawyer from securing confidential legal advice about the lawyer's personal responsibility to comply with these Rules. In most situations, disclosing information to secure such advice will be impliedly authorized for the lawyer to carry out the representation. Even when the disclosure is not impliedly authorized, paragraph (b)(4) permits such disclosure because of the importance of a lawyer's compliance with the Rules of Professional Conduct.
[10]  Where a legal claim or disciplinary charge alleges complicity of the lawyer in a client's conduct or other misconduct of the lawyer involving representation of the client, the lawyer may respond to the extent the lawyer reasonably believes necessary to establish a defense. The same is true with respect to a claim involving the conduct or representation of a former client. Such a charge can arise in a civil, criminal, disciplinary or other proceeding and can be based on a wrong allegedly committed by the lawyer against the client or on a wrong alleged by a third person, for example, a person claiming to have been defrauded by the lawyer and client acting together. The lawyer's right to respond arises when an assertion of such complicity has been made. Paragraph (b)(5) does not require the lawyer to await the commencement of an action or proceeding that charges such complicity, so that the defense may be established by responding directly to a third party who has made such an assertion. The right to defend also applies, of course, where a proceeding has been commenced.
[11]  A lawyer entitled to a fee is permitted by paragraph (b)(5) to prove the services rendered in an action to collect it. This aspect of the rule expresses the principle that the beneficiary of a fiduciary relationship may not exploit it to the detriment of the fiduciary.
[12]  Other law may require that a lawyer disclose information about a client. Whether such a law supersedes Rule 1.6 is a question of law beyond the scope of these Rules. When disclosure of information relating to the representation appears to be required by other law, the lawyer must discuss the matter with the client to the extent required by Rule 1.4. If, however, the other law supersedes this Rule and requires disclosure, paragraph (b)(6) permits the lawyer to make such disclosures as are necessary to comply with the law.
Detection of Conflicts of Interest
[13]  Paragraph (b)(7) recognizes that lawyers in different firms may need to disclose limited information to each other to detect and resolve conflicts of interest, such as when a lawyer is considering an association with another firm, two or more firms are considering a merger, or a lawyer is considering the purchase of a law practice.  See Rule 1.17, Comment [7].  Under these circumstances, lawyers and law firms are permitted to disclose limited information, but only once substantive discussions regarding the new relationship have occurred.  Any such disclosure should ordinarily include no more than the identity of the persons and entities involved in a matter, a brief summary of the general issues involved, and information about whether the matter has terminated.  Even this limited information, however, should be disclosed only to the extent reasonably necessary to detect and resolve conflicts of interest that might arise from the possible new relationship.  Moreover, the disclosure of any information is prohibited if it would compromise the attorney-client privilege or otherwise prejudice the client (e.g., the fact that a corporate client is seeking advice on a corporate takeover that has not been publicly announced; that a person has consulted a lawyer about the possibility of divorce before the person's intentions are known to the person's spouse; or that a person has consulted a lawyer about a criminal investigation that has not led to a public charge).  Under those circumstances, paragraph (a) prohibits disclosure unless the client or former client gives informed consent.  A lawyer’s fiduciary duty to the lawyer’s firm may also govern a lawyer’s conduct when exploring an association with another firm and is beyond the scope of these Rules.
[14]  Any information disclosed pursuant to paragraph (b)(7) may be used or further disclosed only to the extent necessary to detect and resolve conflicts of interest.  Paragraph (b)(7) does not restrict the use of information acquired by means independent of any disclosure pursuant to paragraph (b)(7).  Paragraph (b)(7) also does not affect the disclosure of information within a law firm when the disclosure is otherwise authorized, see Comment [5], such as when a lawyer in a firm discloses information to another lawyer in the same firm to detect and resolve conflicts of interest that could arise in connection with undertaking a new representation.
[15]  A lawyer may be ordered to reveal information relating to the representation of a client by a court or by another tribunal or governmental entity claiming authority pursuant to other law to compel the disclosure. Absent informed consent of the client to do otherwise, the lawyer should assert on behalf of the client all nonfrivolous claims that the order is not authorized by other law or that the information sought is protected against disclosure by the attorney-client privilege or other applicable law. In the event of an adverse ruling, the lawyer must consult with the client about the possibility of appeal to the extent required by Rule 1.4. Unless review is sought, however, paragraph (b)(6) permits the lawyer to comply with the court's order.
[16]  Paragraph (b) permits disclosure only to the extent the lawyer reasonably believes the disclosure is necessary to accomplish one of the purposes specified. Where practicable, the lawyer should first seek to persuade the client to take suitable action to obviate the need for disclosure. In any case, a disclosure adverse to the client's interest should be no greater than the lawyer reasonably believes necessary to accomplish the purpose. If the disclosure will be made in connection with a judicial proceeding, the disclosure should be made in a manner that limits access to the information to the tribunal or other persons having a need to know it and appropriate protective orders or other arrangements should be sought by the lawyer to the fullest extent practicable.
[17]  Paragraph (b) permits but does not require the disclosure of information relating to a client's representation to accomplish the purposes specified in paragraphs (b)(1) through (b)(6). In exercising the discretion conferred by this Rule, the lawyer may consider such factors as the nature of the lawyer's relationship with the client and with those who might be injured by the client, the lawyer's own involvement in the transaction and factors that may extenuate the conduct in question. A lawyer's decision not to disclose as permitted by paragraph (b) does not violate this Rule. Disclosure may be required, however, by other Rules. Some Rules require disclosure only if such disclosure would be permitted by paragraph (b). See Rules 1.2(d), 4.1(b), 8.1 and 8.3. Rule 3.3, on the other hand, requires disclosure in some circumstances regardless of whether such disclosure is permitted by this Rule. See Rule 3.3(c).
Acting Competently to Preserve Confidentiality
[18]  Paragraph (c) requires a lawyer to act competently to safeguard information relating to the representation of a client against unauthorized access by third parties and against inadvertent or unauthorized disclosure by the lawyer or other persons who are participating in the representation of the client or who are subject to the lawyer’s supervision. See Rules 1.1, 5.1 and 5.3.  The unauthorized access to, or the inadvertent or unauthorized disclosure of, information relating to the representation of a client does not constitute a violation of paragraph (c) if the lawyer has made reasonable efforts to prevent the access or disclosure.  Factors to be considered in determining the reasonableness of the lawyer’s efforts include, but are not limited to, the sensitivity of the information, the likelihood of disclosure if additional safeguards are not employed, the cost of employing additional safeguards, the difficulty of implementing the safeguards, and the extent to which the safeguards adversely affect the lawyer’s ability to represent clients (e.g., by making a device or important piece of software excessively difficult to use). A client may require the lawyer to implement special security measures not required by this Rule or may give informed consent to forgo security measures that would otherwise be required by this Rule.  Whether a lawyer may be required to take additional steps to safeguard a client’s information in order to comply with other law, such as state and federal laws that govern data privacy or that impose notification requirements upon the loss of, or unauthorized access to, electronic information, is beyond the scope of these Rules.  For a lawyer’s duties when sharing information with nonlawyers outside the lawyer’s own firm, see Rule 5.3, Comments [3]-[4].   
[19]  When transmitting a communication that includes information relating to the representation of a client, the lawyer must take reasonable precautions to prevent the information from coming into the hands of unintended recipients. This duty, however, does not require that the lawyer use special security measures if the method of communication affords a reasonable expectation of privacy. Special circumstances, however, may warrant special precautions. Factors to be considered in determining the reasonableness of the lawyer's expectation of confidentiality include the sensitivity of the information and the extent to which the privacy of the communication is protected by law or by a confidentiality agreement. A client may require the lawyer to implement special security measures not required by this Rule or may give informed consent to the use of a means of communication that would otherwise be prohibited by this Rule.  Whether a lawyer may be required to take additional steps in order to comply with other law, such as state and federal laws that govern data privacy, is beyond the scope of these Rules.
Former Client
[20]  The duty of confidentiality continues after the client-lawyer relationship has terminated. See Rule 1.9(c)(2). See Rule 1.9(c)(1) for the prohibition against using such information to the disadvantage of the former client.

RULE 1.7:	CONFLICT OF INTEREST - CURRENT CLIENTS
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a lawyer shall not represent a client if the representation involves a concurrent conflict of interest. A concurrent conflict of interest exists if:
(1) the representation of one client will be directly adverse to another client; or
(2) there is a significant risk that the representation of one or more clients will be materially limited by the lawyer's responsibilities to another client, a former client or a third person or by a personal interest of the lawyer.
(b) Notwithstanding the existence of a concurrent conflict of interest under paragraph (a), a lawyer may represent a client if:
(1) the lawyer reasonably believes that the lawyer will be able to provide competent and diligent representation to each affected client;
(2) the representation is not prohibited by law;
(3) the representation does not involve the assertion of a claim by one client against another client represented by the lawyer in the same litigation or other proceeding before a tribunal; and
(4) each affected client gives informed consent, confirmed in writing.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.7
General Principles
[1] Loyalty and independent judgment are essential elements in the lawyer's relationship to a client. Concurrent conflicts of interest can arise from the lawyer's responsibilities to another client, a former client or a third person or from the lawyer's own interests. For specific Rules regarding certain concurrent conflicts of interest, see Rule 1.8. For former client conflicts of interest, see Rule 1.9. For conflicts of interest involving prospective clients, see Rule 1.18. For definitions of "informed consent" and "confirmed in writing," see Rule 1.0(e) and (b).
[2] Resolution of a conflict of interest problem under this Rule requires the lawyer to: 1) clearly identify the client or clients; 2) determine whether a conflict of interest exists; 3) decide whether the representation may be undertaken despite the existence of a conflict, i.e., whether the conflict is consentable; and 4) if so, consult with the clients affected under paragraph (a) and obtain their informed consent, confirmed in writing. The clients affected under paragraph (a) include both of the clients referred to in paragraph (a)(1) and the one or more clients whose representation might be materially limited under paragraph (a)(2).
[3] A conflict of interest may exist before representation is undertaken, in which event the representation must be declined, unless the lawyer obtains the informed consent of each client under the conditions of paragraph (b). To determine whether a conflict of interest exists, a lawyer should adopt reasonable procedures, appropriate for the size and type of firm and practice, to determine in both litigation and non-litigation matters the persons and issues involved. See also Comment to Rule 5.1. Ignorance caused by a failure to institute such procedures will not excuse a lawyer's violation of this Rule. As to whether a client-lawyer relationship exists or, having once been established, is continuing, see Comment to Rule 1.3 and Scope.
[4] If a conflict arises after representation has been undertaken, the lawyer ordinarily must withdraw from the representation, unless the lawyer has obtained the informed consent of the client under the conditions of paragraph (b). See Rule 1.16. Where more than one client is involved, whether the lawyer may continue to represent any of the clients is determined both by the lawyer's ability to comply with duties owed to the former client and by the lawyer's ability to represent adequately the remaining client or clients, given the lawyer's duties to the former client. See Rule 1.9. See also Comments [5] and [29].
[5] Unforeseeable developments, such as changes in corporate and other organizational affiliations or the addition or realignment of parties in litigation, might create conflicts in the midst of a representation, as when a company sued by the lawyer on behalf of one client is bought by another client represented by the lawyer in an unrelated matter. Depending on the circumstances, the lawyer may have the option to withdraw from one of the representations in order to avoid the conflict. The lawyer must seek court approval where necessary and take steps to minimize harm to the clients. See Rule 1.16. The lawyer must continue to protect the confidences of the client from whose representation the lawyer has withdrawn. See Rule 1.9(c).
Identifying Conflicts of Interest: Directly Adverse
[6] Loyalty to a current client prohibits undertaking representation directly adverse to that client without that client's informed consent. Thus, absent consent, a lawyer may not act as an advocate in one matter against a person the lawyer represents in some other matter, even when the matters are wholly unrelated. The client as to whom the representation is directly adverse is likely to feel betrayed, and the resulting damage to the client-lawyer relationship is likely to impair the lawyer's ability to represent the client effectively. In addition, the client on whose behalf the adverse representation is undertaken reasonably may fear that the lawyer will pursue that client's case less effectively out of deference to the other client, i.e., that the representation may be materially limited by the lawyer's interest in retaining the current client. Similarly, a directly adverse conflict may arise when a lawyer is required to cross-examine a client who appears as a witness in a lawsuit involving another client, as when the testimony will be damaging to the client who is represented in the lawsuit. On the other hand, simultaneous representation in unrelated matters of clients whose interests are only economically adverse, such as representation of competing economic enterprises in unrelated litigation, does not ordinarily constitute a conflict of interest and thus may not require consent of the respective clients.
[7] Directly adverse conflicts can also arise in transactional matters. For example, if a lawyer is asked to represent the seller of a business in negotiations with a buyer represented by the lawyer, not in the same transaction but in another, unrelated matter, the lawyer could not undertake the representation without the informed consent of each client.
Identifying Conflicts of Interest: Material Limitation
[8] Even where there is no direct adverseness, a conflict of interest exists if there is a significant risk that a lawyer's ability to consider, recommend or carry out an appropriate course of action for the client will be materially limited as a result of the lawyer's other responsibilities or interests. For example, a lawyer asked to represent several individuals seeking to form a joint venture is likely to be materially limited in the lawyer's ability to recommend or advocate all possible positions that each might take because of the lawyer's duty of loyalty to the others. The conflict in effect forecloses alternatives that would otherwise be available to the client. The mere possibility of subsequent harm does not itself require disclosure and consent. The critical questions are the likelihood that a difference in interests will eventuate and, if it does, whether it will materially interfere with the lawyer's independent professional judgment in considering alternatives or foreclose courses of action that reasonably should be pursued on behalf of the client.
Lawyer's Responsibilities to Former Clients and Other Third Persons
[9] In addition to conflicts with other current clients, a lawyer's duties of loyalty and independence may be materially limited by responsibilities to former clients under Rule 1.9 or by the lawyer's responsibilities to other persons, such as fiduciary duties arising from a lawyer's service as a trustee, executor or corporate director.
Personal Interest Conflicts
[10] The lawyer's own interests should not be permitted to have an adverse effect on representation of a client. For example, if the probity of a lawyer's own conduct in a transaction is in serious question, it may be difficult or impossible for the lawyer to give a client detached advice. Similarly, when a lawyer has discussions concerning possible employment with an opponent of the lawyer's client, or with a law firm representing the opponent, such discussions could materially limit the lawyer's representation of the client. In addition, a lawyer may not allow related business interests to affect representation, for example, by referring clients to an enterprise in which the lawyer has an undisclosed financial interest. See Rule 1.8 for specific Rules pertaining to a number of personal interest conflicts, including business transactions with clients. See also Rule 1.10 (personal interest conflicts under Rule 1.7 ordinarily are not imputed to other lawyers in a law firm).
[11] When lawyers representing different clients in the same matter or in substantially related matters are closely related by blood or marriage, there may be a significant risk that client confidences will be revealed and that the lawyer's family relationship will interfere with both loyalty and independent professional judgment. As a result, each client is entitled to know of the existence and implications of the relationship between the lawyers before the lawyer agrees to undertake the representation. Thus, a lawyer related to another lawyer, e.g., as parent, child, sibling or spouse, ordinarily may not represent a client in a matter where that lawyer is representing another party, unless each client gives informed consent. The disqualification arising from a close family relationship is personal and ordinarily is not imputed to members of firms with whom the lawyers are associated. See Rule 1.10.
[12] A lawyer is prohibited from engaging in sexual relationships with a client unless the sexual relationship predates the formation of the client-lawyer relationship. See Rule 1.8(j).
Interest of Person Paying for a Lawyer's Service
[13] A lawyer may be paid from a source other than the client, including a co-client, if the client is informed of that fact and consents and the arrangement does not compromise the lawyer's duty of loyalty or independent judgment to the client. See Rule 1.8(f). If acceptance of the payment from any other source presents a significant risk that the lawyer's representation of the client will be materially limited by the lawyer's own interest in accommodating the person paying the lawyer's fee or by the lawyer's responsibilities to a payer who is also a co-client, then the lawyer must comply with the requirements of paragraph (b) before accepting the representation, including determining whether the conflict is consentable and, if so, that the client has adequate information about the material risks of the representation.
Prohibited Representations
[14] Ordinarily, clients may consent to representation notwithstanding a conflict. However, as indicated in paragraph (b), some conflicts are nonconsentable, meaning that the lawyer involved cannot properly ask for such agreement or provide representation on the basis of the client's consent. When the lawyer is representing more than one client, the question of consentability must be resolved as to each client.
[15] Consentability is typically determined by considering whether the interests of the clients will be adequately protected if the clients are permitted to give their informed consent to representation burdened by a conflict of interest. Thus, under paragraph (b)(1), representation is prohibited if in the circumstances the lawyer cannot reasonably conclude that the lawyer will be able to provide competent and diligent representation. See Rule 1.1 (competence) and Rule 1.3 (diligence).
[16] Paragraph (b)(2) describes conflicts that are nonconsentable because the representation is prohibited by applicable law. For example, in some states substantive law provides that the same lawyer may not represent more than one defendant in a capital case, even with the consent of the clients, and under federal criminal statutes certain representations by a former government lawyer are prohibited, despite the informed consent of the former client. In addition, decisional law in some states limits the ability of a governmental client, such as a municipality, to consent to a conflict of interest.
[17] Paragraph (b)(3) describes conflicts that are nonconsentable because of the institutional interest in vigorous development of each client's position when the clients are aligned directly against each other in the same litigation or other proceeding before a tribunal. Whether clients are aligned directly against each other within the meaning of this paragraph requires examination of the context of the proceeding. Although this paragraph does not preclude a lawyer's multiple representation of adverse parties to a mediation (because mediation is not a proceeding before a "tribunal" under Rule 1.0(m)), such representation may be precluded by paragraph (b)(1).
Informed Consent
[18] Informed consent requires that each affected client be aware of the relevant circumstances and of the material and reasonably foreseeable ways that the conflict could have adverse effects on the interests of that client. See Rule 1.0(e) (informed consent). The information required depends on the nature of the conflict and the nature of the risks involved. When representation of multiple clients in a single matter is undertaken, the information must include the implications of the common representation, including possible effects on loyalty, confidentiality and the attorney-client privilege and the advantages and risks involved. See Comments [30] and [31] (effect of common representation on confidentiality).
[19] Under some circumstances it may be impossible to make the disclosure necessary to obtain consent. For example, when the lawyer represents different clients in related matters and one of the clients refuses to consent to the disclosure necessary to permit the other client to make an informed decision, the lawyer cannot properly ask the latter to consent. In some cases the alternative to common representation can be that each party may have to obtain separate representation with the possibility of incurring additional costs. These costs, along with the benefits of securing separate representation, are factors that may be considered by the affected client in determining whether common representation is in the client's interests.
Consent Confirmed in Writing
[20] Paragraph (b) requires the lawyer to obtain the informed consent of the client, confirmed in writing. Such a writing may consist of a document executed by the client or one that the lawyer promptly records and transmits to the client following an oral consent. See Rule 1.0(b). See also Rule 1.0(n) (writing includes electronic transmission). If it is not feasible to obtain or transmit the writing at the time the client gives informed consent, then the lawyer must obtain or transmit it within a reasonable time thereafter. See Rule 1.0(b). The requirement of a writing does not supplant the need in most cases for the lawyer to talk with the client, to explain the risks and advantages, if any, of representation burdened with a conflict of interest, as well as reasonably available alternatives, and to afford the client a reasonable opportunity to consider the risks and alternatives and to raise questions and concerns. Rather, the writing is required in order to impress upon clients the seriousness of the decision the client is being asked to make and to avoid disputes or ambiguities that might later occur in the absence of a writing.
Revoking Consent
[21] A client who has given consent to a conflict may revoke the consent and, like any other client, may terminate the lawyer's representation at any time. Whether revoking consent to the client's own representation precludes the lawyer from continuing to represent other clients depends on the circumstances, including the nature of the conflict, whether the client revoked consent because of a material change in circumstances, the reasonable expectations of the other client and whether material detriment to the other clients or the lawyer would result.
Consent to Future Conflict
[22] Whether a lawyer may properly request a client to waive conflicts that might arise in the future is subject to the test of paragraph (b). The effectiveness of such waivers is generally determined by the extent to which the client reasonably understands the material risks that the waiver entails. The more comprehensive the explanation of the types of future representations that might arise and the actual and reasonably foreseeable adverse consequences of those representations, the greater the likelihood that the client will have the requisite understanding. Thus, if the client agrees to consent to a particular type of conflict with which the client is already familiar, then the consent ordinarily will be effective with regard to that type of conflict. If the consent is general and open-ended, then the consent ordinarily will be ineffective, because it is not reasonably likely that the client will have understood the material risks involved. On the other hand, if the client is an experienced user of the legal services involved and is reasonably informed regarding the risk that a conflict may arise, such consent is more likely to be effective, particularly if, e.g., the client is independently represented by other counsel in giving consent and the consent is limited to future conflicts unrelated to the subject of the representation. In any case, advance consent cannot be effective if the circumstances that materialize in the future are such as would make the conflict nonconsentable under paragraph (b).
Conflicts in Litigation
[23] Paragraph (b)(3) prohibits representation of opposing parties in the same litigation, regardless of the clients' consent. On the other hand, simultaneous representation of parties whose interests in litigation may conflict, such as coplaintiffs or codefendants, is governed by paragraph (a)(2). A conflict may exist by reason of substantial discrepancy in the parties' testimony, incompatibility in positions in relation to an opposing party or the fact that there are substantially different possibilities of settlement of the claims or liabilities in question. Such conflicts can arise in criminal cases as well as civil. The potential for conflict of interest in representing multiple defendants in a criminal case is so grave that ordinarily a lawyer should decline to represent more than one codefendant. On the other hand, common representation of persons having similar interests in civil litigation is proper if the requirements of paragraph (b) are met.
[24] Ordinarily a lawyer may take inconsistent legal positions in different tribunals at different times on behalf of different clients. The mere fact that advocating a legal position on behalf of one client might create precedent adverse to the interests of a client represented by the lawyer in an unrelated matter does not create a conflict of interest. A conflict of interest exists, however, if there is a significant risk that a lawyer's action on behalf of one client will materially limit the lawyer's effectiveness in representing another client in a different case; for example, when a decision favoring one client will create a precedent likely to seriously weaken the position taken on behalf of the other client. Factors relevant in determining whether the clients need to be advised of the risk include: where the cases are pending, whether the issue is substantive or procedural, the temporal relationship between the matters, the significance of the issue to the immediate and long-term interests of the clients involved and the clients' reasonable expectations in retaining the lawyer. If there is significant risk of material limitation, then absent informed consent of the affected clients, the lawyer must refuse one of the representations or withdraw from one or both matters.
[25] When a lawyer represents or seeks to represent a class of plaintiffs or defendants in a class-action lawsuit, unnamed members of the class are ordinarily not considered to be clients of the lawyer for purposes of applying paragraph (a)(1) of this Rule. Thus, the lawyer does not typically need to get the consent of such a person before representing a client suing the person in an unrelated matter. Similarly, a lawyer seeking to represent an opponent in a class action does not typically need the consent of an unnamed member of the class whom the lawyer represents in an unrelated matter.
Nonlitigation Conflicts
[26] Conflicts of interest under paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) arise in contexts other than litigation. For a discussion of directly adverse conflicts in transactional matters, see Comment [7]. Relevant factors in determining whether there is significant potential for material limitation include the duration and intimacy of the lawyer's relationship with the client or clients involved, the functions being performed by the lawyer, the likelihood that disagreements will arise and the likely prejudice to the client from the conflict. The question is often one of proximity and degree. See Comment [8].
[27] For example, conflict questions may arise in estate planning and estate administration. A lawyer may be called upon to prepare wills for several family members, such as husband and wife, and, depending upon the circumstances, a conflict of interest may be present. In estate administration the identity of the client may be unclear under the law of a particular jurisdiction. Under one view, the client is the fiduciary; under another view the client is the estate or trust, including its beneficiaries. In order to comply with conflict of interest rules, the lawyer should make clear the lawyer's relationship to the parties involved.
[28] Whether a conflict is consentable depends on the circumstances. For example, a lawyer may not represent multiple parties to a negotiation whose interests are fundamentally antagonistic to each other, but common representation is permissible where the clients are generally aligned in interest even though there is some difference in interest among them. Thus, a lawyer may seek to establish or adjust a relationship between clients on an amicable and mutually advantageous basis; for example, in helping to organize a business in which two or more clients are entrepreneurs, working out the financial reorganization of an enterprise in which two or more clients have an interest or arranging a property distribution in settlement of an estate. The lawyer seeks to resolve potentially adverse interests by developing the parties' mutual interests. Otherwise, each party might have to obtain separate representation, with the possibility of incurring additional cost, complication or even litigation. Given these and other relevant factors, the clients may prefer that the lawyer act for all of them.
Special Considerations in Common Representation
[29] In considering whether to represent multiple clients in the same matter, a lawyer should be mindful that if the common representation fails because the potentially adverse interests cannot be reconciled, the result can be additional cost, embarrassment and recrimination. Ordinarily, the lawyer will be forced to withdraw from representing all of the clients if the common representation fails. In some situations, the risk of failure is so great that multiple representation is plainly impossible. For example, a lawyer cannot undertake common representation of clients where contentious litigation or negotiations between them are imminent or contemplated. Moreover, because the lawyer is required to be impartial between commonly represented clients, representation of multiple clients is improper when it is unlikely that impartiality can be maintained. Generally, if the relationship between the parties has already assumed antagonism, the possibility that the clients' interests can be adequately served by common representation is not very good. Other relevant factors are whether the lawyer subsequently will represent both parties on a continuing basis and whether the situation involves creating or terminating a relationship between the parties.
[30] A particularly important factor in determining the appropriateness of common representation is the effect on client-lawyer confidentiality and the attorney-client privilege. With regard to the attorney-client privilege, the prevailing rule is that, as between commonly represented clients, the privilege does not attach. Hence, it must be assumed that if litigation eventuates between the clients, the privilege will not protect any such communications, and the clients should be so advised.
[31] As to the duty of confidentiality, continued common representation will almost certainly be inadequate if one client asks the lawyer not to disclose to the other client information relevant to the common representation. This is so because the lawyer has an equal duty of loyalty to each client, and each client has the right to be informed of anything bearing on the representation that might affect that client's interests and the right to expect that the lawyer will use that information to that client's benefit. See Rule 1.4. The lawyer should, at the outset of the common representation and as part of the process of obtaining each client's informed consent, advise each client that information will be shared and that the lawyer will have to withdraw if one client decides that some matter material to the representation should be kept from the other. In limited circumstances, it may be appropriate for the lawyer to proceed with the representation when the clients have agreed, after being properly informed, that the lawyer will keep certain information confidential. For example, the lawyer may reasonably conclude that failure to disclose one client's trade secrets to another client will not adversely affect representation involving a joint venture between the clients and agree to keep that information confidential with the informed consent of both clients.
[32] When seeking to establish or adjust a relationship between clients, the lawyer should make clear that the lawyer's role is not that of partisanship normally expected in other circumstances and, thus, that the clients may be required to assume greater responsibility for decisions than when each client is separately represented. Any limitations on the scope of the representation made necessary as a result of the common representation should be fully explained to the clients at the outset of the representation. See Rule 1.2(c).
[33] Subject to the above limitations, each client in the common representation has the right to loyal and diligent representation and the protection of Rule 1.9 concerning the obligations to a former client. The client also has the right to discharge the lawyer as stated in Rule 1.16.
Organizational Clients
[34] A lawyer who represents a corporation or other organization does not, by virtue of that representation, necessarily represent any constituent or affiliated organization, such as a parent or subsidiary. See Rule 1.13(a). Thus, the lawyer for an organization is not barred from accepting representation adverse to an affiliate in an unrelated matter, unless the circumstances are such that the affiliate should also be considered a client of the lawyer, there is an understanding between the lawyer and the organizational client that the lawyer will avoid representation adverse to the client's affiliates, or the lawyer's obligations to either the organizational client or the new client are likely to limit materially the lawyer's representation of the other client.
[35] A lawyer for a corporation or other organization who is also a member of its board of directors should determine whether the responsibilities of the two roles may conflict. The lawyer may be called on to advise the corporation in matters involving actions of the directors. Consideration should be given to the frequency with which such situations may arise, the potential intensity of the conflict, the effect of the lawyer's resignation from the board and the possibility of the corporation's obtaining legal advice from another lawyer in such situations. If there is material risk that the dual role will compromise the lawyer's independence of professional judgment, the lawyer should not serve as a director or should cease to act as the corporation's lawyer when conflicts of interest arise. The lawyer should advise the other members of the board that in some circumstances matters discussed at board meetings while the lawyer is present in the capacity of director might not be protected by the attorney-client privilege and that conflict of interest considerations might require the lawyer's recusal as a director or might require the lawyer and the lawyer's firm to decline representation of the corporation in a matter.


RULE 1.8:	CURRENT CLIENTS – SPECIFIC RULES
PLEASE NOTE! THE ABA AMENDED RULE 1.8(e) IN AUGUST 2020. THE MPRE DOES NOT TEST ON RULES CHANGES FOR A YEAR!  THIS IS THE PRE-AMENDMENT VERSION. 

Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) A lawyer shall not enter into a business transaction with a client or knowingly acquire an ownership, possessory, security or other pecuniary interest adverse to a client unless:
(1) the transaction and terms on which the lawyer acquires the interest are fair and reasonable to the client and are fully disclosed and transmitted in writing in a manner that can be reasonably understood by the client;
(2) the client is advised in writing of the desirability of seeking and is given a reasonable opportunity to seek the advice of independent legal counsel on the transaction; and
(3) the client gives informed consent, in a writing signed by the client, to the essential terms of the transaction and the lawyer's role in the transaction, including whether the lawyer is representing the client in the transaction.
(b) A lawyer shall not use information relating to representation of a client to the disadvantage of the client unless the client gives informed consent, except as permitted or required by these Rules.
(c) A lawyer shall not solicit any substantial gift from a client, including a testamentary gift, or prepare on behalf of a client an instrument giving the lawyer or a person related to the lawyer any substantial gift unless the lawyer or other recipient of the gift is related to the client. For purposes of this paragraph, related persons include a spouse, child, grandchild, parent, grandparent or other relative or individual with whom the lawyer or the client maintains a close, familial relationship.
(d) Prior to the conclusion of representation of a client, a lawyer shall not make or negotiate an agreement giving the lawyer literary or media rights to a portrayal or account based in substantial part on information relating to the representation.
(e) A lawyer shall not provide financial assistance to a client in connection with pending or contemplated litigation, except that:
(1) a lawyer may advance court costs and expenses of litigation, the repayment of which may be contingent on the outcome of the matter; and
(2) a lawyer representing an indigent client may pay court costs and expenses of litigation on behalf of the client.
(f) A lawyer shall not accept compensation for representing a client from one other than the client unless:
(1) the client gives informed consent;
(2) there is no interference with the lawyer's independence of professional judgment or with the client-lawyer relationship; and
(3) information relating to representation of a client is protected as required by Rule 1.6.
(g) A lawyer who represents two or more clients shall not participate in making an aggregate settlement of the claims of or against the clients, or in a criminal case an aggregated agreement as to guilty or nolo contendere pleas, unless each client gives informed consent, in a writing signed by the client. The lawyer's disclosure shall include the existence and nature of all the claims or pleas involved and of the participation of each person in the settlement.
(h) A lawyer shall not:
(1) make an agreement prospectively limiting the lawyer's liability to a client for malpractice unless the client is independently represented in making the agreement; or
(2) settle a claim or potential claim for such liability with an unrepresented client or former client unless that person is advised in writing of the desirability of seeking and is given a reasonable opportunity to seek the advice of independent legal counsel in connection therewith.
(i) A lawyer shall not acquire a proprietary interest in the cause of action or subject matter of litigation the lawyer is conducting for a client, except that the lawyer may:
(1) acquire a lien authorized by law to secure the lawyer's fee or expenses; and
(2) contract with a client for a reasonable contingent fee in a civil case.
(j) A lawyer shall not have sexual relations with a client unless a consensual sexual relationship existed between them when the client-lawyer relationship commenced.
(k) While lawyers are associated in a firm, a prohibition in the foregoing paragraphs (a) through (i) that applies to any one of them shall apply to all of them.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.8
Business Transactions Between Client and Lawyer
[1] A lawyer's legal skill and training, together with the relationship of trust and confidence between lawyer and client, create the possibility of overreaching when the lawyer participates in a business, property or financial transaction with a client, for example, a loan or sales transaction or a lawyer investment on behalf of a client. The requirements of paragraph (a) must be met even when the transaction is not closely related to the subject matter of the representation, as when a lawyer drafting a will for a client learns that the client needs money for unrelated expenses and offers to make a loan to the client. The Rule applies to lawyers engaged in the sale of goods or services related to the practice of law, for example, the sale of title insurance or investment services to existing clients of the lawyer's legal practice. See Rule 5.7. It also applies to lawyers purchasing property from estates they represent. It does not apply to ordinary fee arrangements between client and lawyer, which are governed by Rule 1.5, although its requirements must be met when the lawyer accepts an interest in the client's business or other nonmonetary property as payment of all or part of a fee. In addition, the Rule does not apply to standard commercial transactions between the lawyer and the client for products or services that the client generally markets to others, for example, banking or brokerage services, medical services, products manufactured or distributed by the client, and utilities' services. In such transactions, the lawyer has no advantage in dealing with the client, and the restrictions in paragraph (a) are unnecessary and impracticable.
[2] Paragraph (a)(1) requires that the transaction itself be fair to the client and that its essential terms be communicated to the client, in writing, in a manner that can be reasonably understood. Paragraph (a)(2) requires that the client also be advised, in writing, of the desirability of seeking the advice of independent legal counsel. It also requires that the client be given a reasonable opportunity to obtain such advice. Paragraph (a)(3) requires that the lawyer obtain the client's informed consent, in a writing signed by the client, both to the essential terms of the transaction and to the lawyer's role. When necessary, the lawyer should discuss both the material risks of the proposed transaction, including any risk presented by the lawyer's involvement, and the existence of reasonably available alternatives and should explain why the advice of independent legal counsel is desirable. See Rule 1.0(e) (definition of informed consent).
[3] The risk to a client is greatest when the client expects the lawyer to represent the client in the transaction itself or when the lawyer's financial interest otherwise poses a significant risk that the lawyer's representation of the client will be materially limited by the lawyer's financial interest in the transaction. Here the lawyer's role requires that the lawyer must comply, not only with the requirements of paragraph (a), but also with the requirements of Rule 1.7. Under that Rule, the lawyer must disclose the risks associated with the lawyer's dual role as both legal adviser and participant in the transaction, such as the risk that the lawyer will structure the transaction or give legal advice in a way that favors the lawyer's interests at the expense of the client. Moreover, the lawyer must obtain the client's informed consent. In some cases, the lawyer's interest may be such that Rule 1.7 will preclude the lawyer from seeking the client's consent to the transaction.
[4] If the client is independently represented in the transaction, paragraph (a)(2) of this Rule is inapplicable, and the paragraph (a)(1) requirement for full disclosure is satisfied either by a written disclosure by the lawyer involved in the transaction or by the client's independent counsel. The fact that the client was independently represented in the transaction is relevant in determining whether the agreement was fair and reasonable to the client as paragraph (a)(1) further requires.
Use of Information Related to Representation
[5] Use of information relating to the representation to the disadvantage of the client violates the lawyer's duty of loyalty. Paragraph (b) applies when the information is used to benefit either the lawyer or a third person, such as another client or business associate of the lawyer. For example, if a lawyer learns that a client intends to purchase and develop several parcels of land, the lawyer may not use that information to purchase one of the parcels in competition with the client or to recommend that another client make such a purchase. The Rule does not prohibit uses that do not disadvantage the client. For example, a lawyer who learns a government agency's interpretation of trade legislation during the representation of one client may properly use that information to benefit other clients. Paragraph (b) prohibits disadvantageous use of client information unless the client gives informed consent, except as permitted or required by these Rules. See Rules 1.2(d), 1.6, 1.9(c), 3.3, 4.1(b), 8.1 and 8.3.
Gifts to Lawyers
[6] A lawyer may accept a gift from a client, if the transaction meets general standards of fairness. For example, a simple gift such as a present given at a holiday or as a token of appreciation is permitted. If a client offers the lawyer a more substantial gift, paragraph (c) does not prohibit the lawyer from accepting it, although such a gift may be voidable by the client under the doctrine of undue influence, which treats client gifts as presumptively fraudulent. In any event, due to concerns about overreaching and imposition on clients, a lawyer may not suggest that a substantial gift be made to the lawyer or for the lawyer's benefit, except where the lawyer is related to the client as set forth in paragraph (c).
[7] If effectuation of a substantial gift requires preparing a legal instrument such as a will or conveyance the client should have the detached advice that another lawyer can provide. The sole exception to this Rule is where the client is a relative of the donee.
[8] This Rule does not prohibit a lawyer from seeking to have the lawyer or a partner or associate of the lawyer named as executor of the client's estate or to another potentially lucrative fiduciary position. Nevertheless, such appointments will be subject to the general conflict of interest provision in Rule 1.7 when there is a significant risk that the lawyer's interest in obtaining the appointment will materially limit the lawyer's independent professional judgment in advising the client concerning the choice of an executor or other fiduciary. In obtaining the client's informed consent to the conflict, the lawyer should advise the client concerning the nature and extent of the lawyer's financial interest in the appointment, as well as the availability of alternative candidates for the position.
Literary Rights
[9] An agreement by which a lawyer acquires literary or media rights concerning the conduct of the representation creates a conflict between the interests of the client and the personal interests of the lawyer. Measures suitable in the representation of the client may detract from the publication value of an account of the representation. Paragraph (d) does not prohibit a lawyer representing a client in a transaction concerning literary property from agreeing that the lawyer's fee shall consist of a share in ownership in the property, if the arrangement conforms to Rule 1.5 and paragraphs (a) and (i).
Financial Assistance
[10] Lawyers may not subsidize lawsuits or administrative proceedings brought on behalf of their clients, including making or guaranteeing loans to their clients for living expenses, because to do so would encourage clients to pursue lawsuits that might not otherwise be brought and because such assistance gives lawyers too great a financial stake in the litigation. These dangers do not warrant a prohibition on a lawyer lending a client court costs and litigation expenses, including the expenses of medical examination and the costs of obtaining and presenting evidence, because these advances are virtually indistinguishable from contingent fees and help ensure access to the courts. Similarly, an exception allowing lawyers representing indigent clients to pay court costs and litigation expenses regardless of whether these funds will be repaid is warranted.
Person Paying for a Lawyer's Services
[11] Lawyers are frequently asked to represent a client under circumstances in which a third person will compensate the lawyer, in whole or in part. The third person might be a relative or friend, an indemnitor (such as a liability insurance company) or a co-client (such as a corporation sued along with one or more of its employees). Because third-party payers frequently have interests that differ from those of the client, including interests in minimizing the amount spent on the representation and in learning how the representation is progressing, lawyers are prohibited from accepting or continuing such representations unless the lawyer determines that there will be no interference with the lawyer's independent professional judgment and there is informed consent from the client. See also Rule 5.4(c) (prohibiting interference with a lawyer's professional judgment by one who recommends, employs or pays the lawyer to render legal services for another).
[12] Sometimes, it will be sufficient for the lawyer to obtain the client's informed consent regarding the fact of the payment and the identity of the third-party payer. If, however, the fee arrangement creates a conflict of interest for the lawyer, then the lawyer must comply with Rule 1.7. The lawyer must also conform to the requirements of Rule 1.6 concerning confidentiality. Under Rule 1.7(a), a conflict of interest exists if there is significant risk that the lawyer's representation of the client will be materially limited by the lawyer's own interest in the fee arrangement or by the lawyer's responsibilities to the third-party payer (for example, when the third-party payer is a co-client). Under Rule 1.7(b), the lawyer may accept or continue the representation with the informed consent of each affected client, unless the conflict is nonconsentable under that paragraph. Under Rule 1.7(b), the informed consent must be confirmed in writing.
Aggregate Settlements
[13] Differences in willingness to make or accept an offer of settlement are among the risks of common representation of multiple clients by a single lawyer. Under Rule 1.7, this is one of the risks that should be discussed before undertaking the representation, as part of the process of obtaining the clients' informed consent. In addition, Rule 1.2(a) protects each client's right to have the final say in deciding whether to accept or reject an offer of settlement and in deciding whether to enter a guilty or nolo contendere plea in a criminal case. The rule stated in this paragraph is a corollary of both these Rules and provides that, before any settlement offer or plea bargain is made or accepted on behalf of multiple clients, the lawyer must inform each of them about all the material terms of the settlement, including what the other clients will receive or pay if the settlement or plea offer is accepted. See also Rule 1.0(e) (definition of informed consent). Lawyers representing a class of plaintiffs or defendants, or those proceeding derivatively, may not have a full client-lawyer relationship with each member of the class; nevertheless, such lawyers must comply with applicable rules regulating notification of class members and other procedural requirements designed to ensure adequate protection of the entire class.
Limiting Liability and Settling Malpractice Claims
[14] Agreements prospectively limiting a lawyer's liability for malpractice are prohibited unless the client is independently represented in making the agreement because they are likely to undermine competent and diligent representation. Also, many clients are unable to evaluate the desirability of making such an agreement before a dispute has arisen, particularly if they are then represented by the lawyer seeking the agreement. This paragraph does not, however, prohibit a lawyer from entering into an agreement with the client to arbitrate legal malpractice claims, provided such agreements are enforceable and the client is fully informed of the scope and effect of the agreement. Nor does this paragraph limit the ability of lawyers to practice in the form of a limited-liability entity, where permitted by law, provided that each lawyer remains personally liable to the client for his or her own conduct and the firm complies with any conditions required by law, such as provisions requiring client notification or maintenance of adequate liability insurance. Nor does it prohibit an agreement in accordance with Rule 1.2 that defines the scope of the representation, although a definition of scope that makes the obligations of representation illusory will amount to an attempt to limit liability.
[15] Agreements settling a claim or a potential claim for malpractice are not prohibited by this Rule. Nevertheless, in view of the danger that a lawyer will take unfair advantage of an unrepresented client or former client, the lawyer must first advise such a person in writing of the appropriateness of independent representation in connection with such a settlement. In addition, the lawyer must give the client or former client a reasonable opportunity to find and consult independent counsel.
Acquiring Proprietary Interest in Litigation
[16] Paragraph (i) states the traditional general rule that lawyers are prohibited from acquiring a proprietary interest in litigation. Like paragraph (e), the general rule has its basis in common law champerty and maintenance and is designed to avoid giving the lawyer too great an interest in the representation. In addition, when the lawyer acquires an ownership interest in the subject of the representation, it will be more difficult for a client to discharge the lawyer if the client so desires. The Rule is subject to specific exceptions developed in decisional law and continued in these Rules. The exception for certain advances of the costs of litigation is set forth in paragraph (e). In addition, paragraph (i) sets forth exceptions for liens authorized by law to secure the lawyer's fees or expenses and contracts for reasonable contingent fees. The law of each jurisdiction determines which liens are authorized by law. These may include liens granted by statute, liens originating in common law and liens acquired by contract with the client. When a lawyer acquires by contract a security interest in property other than that recovered through the lawyer's efforts in the litigation, such an acquisition is a business or financial transaction with a client and is governed by the requirements of paragraph (a). Contracts for contingent fees in civil cases are governed by Rule 1.5.
Client-Lawyer Sexual Relationships
[17] The relationship between lawyer and client is a fiduciary one in which the lawyer occupies the highest position of trust and confidence. The relationship is almost always unequal; thus, a sexual relationship between lawyer and client can involve unfair exploitation of the lawyer's fiduciary role, in violation of the lawyer's basic ethical obligation not to use the trust of the client to the client's disadvantage. In addition, such a relationship presents a significant danger that, because of the lawyer's emotional involvement, the lawyer will be unable to represent the client without impairment of the exercise of independent professional judgment. Moreover, a blurred line between the professional and personal relationships may make it difficult to predict to what extent client confidences will be protected by the attorney-client evidentiary privilege, since client confidences are protected by privilege only when they are imparted in the context of the client-lawyer relationship. Because of the significant danger of harm to client interests and because the client's own emotional involvement renders it unlikely that the client could give adequate informed consent, this Rule prohibits the lawyer from having sexual relations with a client regardless of whether the relationship is consensual and regardless of the absence of prejudice to the client.
[18] Sexual relationships that predate the client-lawyer relationship are not prohibited. Issues relating to the exploitation of the fiduciary relationship and client dependency are diminished when the sexual relationship existed prior to the commencement of the client-lawyer relationship. However, before proceeding with the representation in these circumstances, the lawyer should consider whether the lawyer's ability to represent the client will be materially limited by the relationship. See Rule 1.7(a)(2).
[19] When the client is an organization, paragraph (j) of this Rule prohibits a lawyer for the organization (whether inside counsel or outside counsel) from having a sexual relationship with a constituent of the organization who supervises, directs or regularly consults with that lawyer concerning the organization's legal matters.
Imputation of Prohibitions
[20] Under paragraph (k), a prohibition on conduct by an individual lawyer in paragraphs (a) through (i) also applies to all lawyers associated in a firm with the personally prohibited lawyer. For example, one lawyer in a firm may not enter into a business transaction with a client of another member of the firm without complying with paragraph (a), even if the first lawyer is not personally involved in the representation of the client. The prohibition set forth in paragraph (j) is personal and is not applied to associated lawyers.

RULE 1.9:	DUTIES TO FORMER CLIENTS
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) A lawyer who has formerly represented a client in a matter shall not thereafter represent another person in the same or a substantially related matter in which that person's interests are materially adverse to the interests of the former client unless the former client gives informed consent, confirmed in writing.
(b) A lawyer shall not knowingly represent a person in the same or a substantially related matter in which a firm with which the lawyer formerly was associated had previously represented a client
(1) whose interests are materially adverse to that person; and
(2) about whom the lawyer had acquired information protected by Rules 1.6 and 1.9(c) that is material to the matter;
unless the former client gives informed consent, confirmed in writing.
(c) A lawyer who has formerly represented a client in a matter or whose present or former firm has formerly represented a client in a matter shall not thereafter:
(1) use information relating to the representation to the disadvantage of the former client except as these Rules would permit or require with respect to a client, or when the information has become generally known; or
(2) reveal information relating to the representation except as these Rules would permit or require with respect to a client.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.9
[1] After termination of a client-lawyer relationship, a lawyer has certain continuing duties with respect to confidentiality and conflicts of interest and thus may not represent another client except in conformity with this Rule. Under this Rule, for example, a lawyer could not properly seek to rescind on behalf of a new client a contract drafted on behalf of the former client. So also a lawyer who has prosecuted an accused person could not properly represent the accused in a subsequent civil action against the government concerning the same transaction. Nor could a lawyer who has represented multiple clients in a matter represent one of the clients against the others in the same or a substantially related matter after a dispute arose among the clients in that matter, unless all affected clients give informed consent. See Comment [9]. Current and former government lawyers must comply with this Rule to the extent required by Rule 1.11.
[2] The scope of a "matter" for purposes of this Rule depends on the facts of a particular situation or transaction. The lawyer's involvement in a matter can also be a question of degree. When a lawyer has been directly involved in a specific transaction, subsequent representation of other clients with materially adverse interests in that transaction clearly is prohibited. On the other hand, a lawyer who recurrently handled a type of problem for a former client is not precluded from later representing another client in a factually distinct problem of that type even though the subsequent representation involves a position adverse to the prior client. Similar considerations can apply to the reassignment of military lawyers between defense and prosecution functions within the same military jurisdictions. The underlying question is whether the lawyer was so involved in the matter that the subsequent representation can be justly regarded as a changing of sides in the matter in question.
[3] Matters are "substantially related" for purposes of this Rule if they involve the same transaction or legal dispute or if there otherwise is a substantial risk that confidential factual information as would normally have been obtained in the prior representation would materially advance the client's position in the subsequent matter. For example, a lawyer who has represented a businessperson and learned extensive private financial information about that person may not then represent that person's spouse in seeking a divorce. Similarly, a lawyer who has previously represented a client in securing environmental permits to build a shopping center would be precluded from representing neighbors seeking to oppose rezoning of the property on the basis of environmental considerations; however, the lawyer would not be precluded, on the grounds of substantial relationship, from defending a tenant of the completed shopping center in resisting eviction for nonpayment of rent. Information that has been disclosed to the public or to other parties adverse to the former client ordinarily will not be disqualifying. Information acquired in a prior representation may have been rendered obsolete by the passage of time, a circumstance that may be relevant in determining whether two representations are substantially related. In the case of an organizational client, general knowledge of the client’s policies and practices ordinarily will not preclude a subsequent representation; on the other hand, knowledge of specific facts gained in a prior representation that are relevant to the matter in question ordinarily will preclude such a representation. A former client is not required to reveal the confidential information learned by the lawyer in order to establish a substantial risk that the lawyer has confidential information to use in the subsequent matter. A conclusion about the possession of such information may be based on the nature of the services the lawyer provided the former client and information that would in ordinary practice be learned by a lawyer providing such services.
Lawyers Moving Between Firms
[4] When lawyers have been associated within a firm but then end their association, the question of whether a lawyer should undertake representation is more complicated. There are several competing considerations. First, the client previously represented by the former firm must be reasonably assured that the principle of loyalty to the client is not compromised. Second, the rule should not be so broadly cast as to preclude other persons from having reasonable choice of legal counsel. Third, the rule should not unreasonably hamper lawyers from forming new associations and taking on new clients after having left a previous association. In this connection, it should be recognized that today many lawyers practice in firms, that many lawyers to some degree limit their practice to one field or another, and that many move from one association to another several times in their careers. If the concept of imputation were applied with unqualified rigor, the result would be radical curtailment of the opportunity of lawyers to move from one practice setting to another and of the opportunity of clients to change counsel.
[5] Paragraph (b) operates to disqualify the lawyer only when the lawyer involved has actual knowledge of information protected by Rules 1.6 and 1.9(c). Thus, if a lawyer while with one firm acquired no knowledge or information relating to a particular client of the firm, and that lawyer later joined another firm, neither the lawyer individually nor the second firm is disqualified from representing another client in the same or a related matter even though the interests of the two clients conflict. See Rule 1.10(b) for the restrictions on a firm once a lawyer has terminated association with the firm.
[6] Application of paragraph (b) depends on a situation's particular facts, aided by inferences, deductions or working presumptions that reasonably may be made about the way in which lawyers work together. A lawyer may have general access to files of all clients of a law firm and may regularly participate in discussions of their affairs; it should be inferred that such a lawyer in fact is privy to all information about all the firm's clients. In contrast, another lawyer may have access to the files of only a limited number of clients and participate in discussions of the affairs of no other clients; in the absence of information to the contrary, it should be inferred that such a lawyer in fact is privy to information about the clients actually served but not those of other clients. In such an inquiry, the burden of proof should rest upon the firm whose disqualification is sought.
[7] Independent of the question of disqualification of a firm, a lawyer changing professional association has a continuing duty to preserve confidentiality of information about a client formerly represented. See Rules 1.6 and 1.9(c).
[8] Paragraph (c) provides that information acquired by the lawyer in the course of representing a client may not subsequently be used or revealed by the lawyer to the disadvantage of the client. However, the fact that a lawyer has once served a client does not preclude the lawyer from using generally known information about that client when later representing another client.
[9] The provisions of this Rule are for the protection of former clients and can be waived if the client gives informed consent, which consent must be confirmed in writing under paragraphs (a) and (b). See Rule 1.0(e). With regard to the effectiveness of an advance waiver, see Comment [22] to Rule 1.7. With regard to disqualification of a firm with which a lawyer is or was formerly associated, see Rule 1.10.

RULE 1.10:	IMPUTATION OF CONFLICTS OF INTEREST – GENERAL RULE
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) While lawyers are associated in a firm, none of them shall knowingly represent a client when any one of them practicing alone would be prohibited from doing so by Rules 1.7 or 1.9, unless
(1) the prohibition is based on a personal interest of the disqualified lawyer and does not present a significant risk of materially limiting the representation of the client by the remaining lawyers in the firm; or
(2) the prohibition is based upon Rule 1.9(a) or (b) and arises out of the disqualified lawyer’s association with a prior firm, and
(i) the disqualified lawyer is timely screened from any participation in the matter and is apportioned no part of the fee therefrom;
(ii) written notice is promptly given to any affected former client to enable the former client to ascertain compliance with the provisions of this Rule, which shall include a description of the screening procedures employed; a statement of the firm's and of the screened lawyer's compliance with these Rules; a statement that review may be available before a tribunal; and an agreement by the firm to respond promptly to any written inquiries or objections by the former client about the screening procedures; and
(iii) certifications of compliance with these Rules and with the screening procedures are provided to the former client by the screened lawyer and by a partner of the firm, at reasonable intervals upon the former client's written request and upon termination of the screening procedures.
(b) When a lawyer has terminated an association with a firm, the firm is not prohibited from thereafter representing a person with interests materially adverse to those of a client represented by the formerly associated lawyer and not currently represented by the firm, unless:
(1) the matter is the same or substantially related to that in which the formerly associated lawyer represented the client; and
(2) any lawyer remaining in the firm has information protected by Rules 1.6 and 1.9(c) that is material to the matter.
(c) A disqualification prescribed by this rule may be waived by the affected client under the conditions stated in Rule 1.7.
(d) The disqualification of lawyers associated in a firm with former or current government lawyers is governed by Rule 1.11.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.10
Definition of “Firm”
[1] For purposes of the Rules of Professional Conduct, the term “firm” denotes lawyers in a law partnership, professional corporation, sole proprietorship or other association authorized to practice law; or lawyers employed in a legal services organization or the legal department of a corporation or other organization. See Rule 1.0(c). Whether two or more lawyers constitute a firm within this definition can depend upon the specific facts. See Rule 1.10, Comments [2] - [4].
Principles of Imputed Disqualification
[2] The rule of imputed disqualification stated in paragraph (a) gives effect to the principle of loyalty to the client as it applies to lawyers who practice in a law firm. Such situations can be considered from the premise that a firm of lawyers is essentially one lawyer for purposes of the rules governing loyalty to the client, or from the premise that each lawyer is vicariously bound by the obligation of loyalty owed by each lawyer with whom the lawyer is associated. Paragraph (a)(1) operates only among the lawyers currently associated in a firm. When a lawyer moves from one firm to another, the situation is governed by Rules 1.9(b) and 1.10(a)(2) and 1.10 (b).
[3] The rule in paragraph (a) does not prohibit representation whether neither questions of client loyalty nor protection of confidential information are presented. Where one lawyer in a firm could not effectively represent a given client because of strong political beliefs, for example, but that lawyer will do no work on the case and the personal beliefs of the lawyer will not materially limit the representation by others in the firm, the firm should not be disqualified. On the other hand, if an opposing party in a case were owned by a lawyer in the law firm, and others in the firm would be materially limited in pursuing the matter because of loyalty to that lawyer, the personal disqualification of the lawyer would be imputed to all others in the firm.
[4] The rule in paragraph (a) also does not prohibit representation by others in the law firm where the person prohibited from involvement in a matter is a nonlawyer, such as a paralegal or legal secretary. Nor does paragraph (a) prohibit representation if the lawyer is prohibited from acting because of events before the person became a lawyer, for example, work that the person did as a law student. Such persons, however, ordinarily must be screened from any personal participation in the matter to avoid communication to others in the firm of confidential information that both the nonlawyers and the firm have a legal duty to protect. See Rules 1.0(k) and 5.3.
[5] Rule 1.10(b) operates to permit a law firm, under certain circumstances, to represent a person with interests directly adverse to those of a client represented by a lawyer who formerly was associated with the firm. The Rule applies regardless of when the formerly associated lawyer represented the client. However, the law firm may not represent a person with interests adverse to those of a present client of the firm, which would violate Rule 1.7. Moreover, the firm may not represent the person where the matter is the same or substantially related to that in which the formerly associated lawyer represented the client and any other lawyer currently in the firm has material information protected by Rules 1.6 and 1.9(c).
[6] Rule 1.10(c) removes imputation with the informed consent of the affected client or former client under the conditions stated in Rule 1.7. The conditions stated in Rule 1.7 require the lawyer to determine that the representation is not prohibited by Rule 1.7(b) and that each affected client or former client has given informed consent to the representation, confirmed in writing. In some cases, the risk may be so severe that the conflict may not be cured by client consent. For a discussion of the effectiveness of client waivers of conflicts that might arise in the future, see Rule 1.7, Comment [22]. For a definition of informed consent, see Rule 1.0(e).
[7] Rule 1.10(a)(2) similarly removes the imputation otherwise required by Rule 1.10(a), but unlike section (c), it does so without requiring that there be informed consent by the former client. Instead, it requires that the procedures laid out in sections (a)(2)(i)-(iii) be followed. A description of effective screening mechanisms appears in Rule 1.0(k). Lawyers should be aware, however, that, even where screening mechanisms have been adopted, tribunals may consider additional factors in ruling upon motions to disqualify a lawyer from pending litigation.
[8] Paragraph (a)(2)(i) does not prohibit the screened lawyer from receiving a salary or partnership share established by prior independent agreement, but that lawyer may not receive compensation directly related to the matter in which the lawyer is disqualified.
[9] The notice required by paragraph (a)(2)(ii) generally should include a description of the screened lawyer’s prior representation and be given as soon as practicable after the need for screening becomes apparent. It also should include a statement by the screened lawyer and the firm that the client’s material confidential information has not been disclosed or used in violation of the Rules. The notice is intended to enable the former client to evaluate and comment upon the effectiveness of the screening procedures.
[10] The certifications required by paragraph (a)(2)(iii) give the former client assurance that the client’s material confidential information has not been disclosed or used inappropriately, either prior to timely implementation of a screen or thereafter. If compliance cannot be certified, the certificate must describe the failure to comply.
[11] Where a lawyer has joined a private firm after having represented the government, imputation is governed under Rule 1.11(b) and (c), not this Rule. Under Rule 1.11(d), where a lawyer represents the government after having served clients in private practice, nongovernmental employment or in another government agency, former client conflicts are not imputed to government lawyers associated with the individually disqualified lawyer.
[12] Where a lawyer is prohibited from engaging in certain transactions under Rule 1.8, paragraph (k) of that Rule, and not this Rule, determines whether that prohibition also applies to other lawyers associated in a firm with the personally prohibited lawyer.

RULE 1.11:	SPECIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST FOR FORMER AND CURRENT GOVERNMENT OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) Except as law may otherwise expressly permit, a lawyer who has formerly served as a public officer or employee of the government:
(1) is subject to Rule 1.9(c); and
(2) shall not otherwise represent a client in connection with a matter in which the lawyer participated personally and substantially as a public officer or employee, unless the appropriate government agency gives its informed consent, confirmed in writing, to the representation.
(b) When a lawyer is disqualified from representation under paragraph (a), no lawyer in a firm with which that lawyer is associated may knowingly undertake or continue representation in such a matter unless:
(1) the disqualified lawyer is timely screened from any participation in the matter and is apportioned no part of the fee therefrom; and
(2) written notice is promptly given to the appropriate government agency to enable it to ascertain compliance with the provisions of this rule.
(c) Except as law may otherwise expressly permit, a lawyer having information that the lawyer knows is confidential government information about a person acquired when the lawyer was a public officer or employee, may not represent a private client whose interests are adverse to that person in a matter in which the information could be used to the material disadvantage of that person. As used in this Rule, the term "confidential government information" means information that has been obtained under governmental authority and which, at the time this Rule is applied, the government is prohibited by law from disclosing to the public or has a legal privilege not to disclose and which is not otherwise available to the public. A firm with which that lawyer is associated may undertake or continue representation in the matter only if the disqualified lawyer is timely screened from any participation in the matter and is apportioned no part of the fee therefrom.
(d) Except as law may otherwise expressly permit, a lawyer currently serving as a public officer or employee:
(1) is subject to Rules 1.7 and 1.9; and
(2) shall not:
(i) participate in a matter in which the lawyer participated personally and substantially while in private practice or nongovernmental employment, unless the appropriate government agency gives its informed consent, confirmed in writing; or
(ii) negotiate for private employment with any person who is involved as a party or as lawyer for a party in a matter in which the lawyer is participating personally and substantially, except that a lawyer serving as a law clerk to a judge, other adjudicative officer or arbitrator may negotiate for private employment as permitted by Rule 1.12(b) and subject to the conditions stated in Rule 1.12(b).
(e) As used in this Rule, the term "matter" includes:
(1) any judicial or other proceeding, application, request for a ruling or other determination, contract, claim, controversy, investigation, charge, accusation, arrest or other particular matter involving a specific party or parties, and
(2) any other matter covered by the conflict of interest rules of the appropriate government agency.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.11
1] A lawyer who has served or is currently serving as a public officer or employee is personally subject to the Rules of Professional Conduct, including the prohibition against concurrent conflicts of interest stated in Rule 1.7. In addition, such a lawyer may be subject to statutes and government regulations regarding conflict of interest. Such statutes and regulations may circumscribe the extent to which the government agency may give consent under this Rule. See Rule 1.0(e) for the definition of informed consent.
[2] Paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2) and (d)(1) restate the obligations of an individual lawyer who has served or is currently serving as an officer or employee of the government toward a former government or private client. Rule 1.10 is not applicable to the conflicts of interest addressed by this Rule. Rather, paragraph (b) sets forth a special imputation rule for former government lawyers that provides for screening and notice. Because of the special problems raised by imputation within a government agency, paragraph (d) does not impute the conflicts of a lawyer currently serving as an officer or employee of the government to other associated government officers or employees, although ordinarily it will be prudent to screen such lawyers.
[3] Paragraphs (a)(2) and (d)(2) apply regardless of whether a lawyer is adverse to a former client and are thus designed not only to protect the former client, but also to prevent a lawyer from exploiting public office for the advantage of another client. For example, a lawyer who has pursued a claim on behalf of the government may not pursue the same claim on behalf of a later private client after the lawyer has left government service, except when authorized to do so by the government agency under paragraph (a). Similarly, a lawyer who has pursued a claim on behalf of a private client may not pursue the claim on behalf of the government, except when authorized to do so by paragraph (d). As with paragraphs (a)(1) and (d)(1), Rule 1.10 is not applicable to the conflicts of interest addressed by these paragraphs.
[4] This Rule represents a balancing of interests. On the one hand, where the successive clients are a government agency and another client, public or private, the risk exists that power or discretion vested in that agency might be used for the special benefit of the other client. A lawyer should not be in a position where benefit to the other client might affect performance of the lawyer's professional functions on behalf of the government. Also, unfair advantage could accrue to the other client by reason of access to confidential government information about the client's adversary obtainable only through the lawyer's government service. On the other hand, the rules governing lawyers presently or formerly employed by a government agency should not be so restrictive as to inhibit transfer of employment to and from the government. The government has a legitimate need to attract qualified lawyers as well as to maintain high ethical standards. Thus a former government lawyer is disqualified only from particular matters in which the lawyer participated personally and substantially. The provisions for screening and waiver in paragraph (b) are necessary to prevent the disqualification rule from imposing too severe a deterrent against entering public service. The limitation of disqualification in paragraphs (a)(2) and (d)(2) to matters involving a specific party or parties, rather than extending disqualification to all substantive issues on which the lawyer worked, serves a similar function.
[5] When a lawyer has been employed by one government agency and then moves to a second government agency, it may be appropriate to treat that second agency as another client for purposes of this Rule, as when a lawyer is employed by a city and subsequently is employed by a federal agency. However, because the conflict of interest is governed by paragraph (d), the latter agency is not required to screen the lawyer as paragraph (b) requires a law firm to do. The question of whether two government agencies should be regarded as the same or different clients for conflict of interest purposes is beyond the scope of these Rules. See Rule 1.13 Comment [9].
[6] Paragraphs (b) and (c) contemplate a screening arrangement. See Rule 1.0(k) (requirements for screening procedures). These paragraphs do not prohibit a lawyer from receiving a salary or partnership share established by prior independent agreement, but that lawyer may not receive compensation directly relating the lawyer's compensation to the fee in the matter in which the lawyer is disqualified.
[7] Notice, including a description of the screened lawyer's prior representation and of the screening procedures employed, generally should be given as soon as practicable after the need for screening becomes apparent.
[8] Paragraph (c) operates only when the lawyer in question has knowledge of the information, which means actual knowledge; it does not operate with respect to information that merely could be imputed to the lawyer.
[9] Paragraphs (a) and (d) do not prohibit a lawyer from jointly representing a private party and a government agency when doing so is permitted by Rule 1.7 and is not otherwise prohibited by law.
[10] For purposes of paragraph (e) of this Rule, a "matter" may continue in another form. In determining whether two particular matters are the same, the lawyer should consider the extent to which the matters involve the same basic facts, the same or related parties, and the time elapsed.

RULE 1.12:	FORMER JUDGE, ARBITRATOR, MEDIATOR OR
OTHER THIRD-PARTY NEUTRAL
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) Except as stated in paragraph (d), a lawyer shall not represent anyone in connection with a matter in which the lawyer participated personally and substantially as a judge or other adjudicative officer or law clerk to such a person or as an arbitrator, mediator or other third-party neutral, unless all parties to the proceeding give informed consent, confirmed in writing.
(b) A lawyer shall not negotiate for employment with any person who is involved as a party or as lawyer for a party in a matter in which the lawyer is participating personally and substantially as a judge or other adjudicative officer or as an arbitrator, mediator or other third-party neutral. A lawyer serving as a law clerk to a judge or other adjudicative officer may negotiate for employment with a party or lawyer involved in a matter in which the clerk is participating personally and substantially, but only after the lawyer has notified the judge or other adjudicative officer.
(c) If a lawyer is disqualified by paragraph (a), no lawyer in a firm with which that lawyer is associated may knowingly undertake or continue representation in the matter unless:
(1) the disqualified lawyer is timely screened from any participation in the matter and is apportioned no part of the fee therefrom; and
(2) written notice is promptly given to the parties and any appropriate tribunal to enable them to ascertain compliance with the provisions of this rule.
(d) An arbitrator selected as a partisan of a party in a multimember arbitration panel is not prohibited from subsequently representing that party.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.12
[1] This Rule generally parallels Rule 1.11. The term "personally and substantially" signifies that a judge who was a member of a multimember court, and thereafter left judicial office to practice law, is not prohibited from representing a client in a matter pending in the court, but in which the former judge did not participate. So also the fact that a former judge exercised administrative responsibility in a court does not prevent the former judge from acting as a lawyer in a matter where the judge had previously exercised remote or incidental administrative responsibility that did not affect the merits. Compare the Comment to Rule 1.11. The term "adjudicative officer" includes such officials as judges pro tempore, referees, special masters, hearing officers and other parajudicial officers, and also lawyers who serve as part-time judges. Compliance Canons A(2), B(2) and C of the Model Code of Judicial Conduct provide that a part-time judge, judge pro tempore or retired judge recalled to active service, may not "act as a lawyer in any proceeding in which he served as a judge or in any other proceeding related thereto." Although phrased differently from this Rule, those Rules correspond in meaning.
[2] Like former judges, lawyers who have served as arbitrators, mediators or other third-party neutrals may be asked to represent a client in a matter in which the lawyer participated personally and substantially. This Rule forbids such representation unless all of the parties to the proceedings give their informed consent, confirmed in writing. See Rule 1.0(e) and (b). Other law or codes of ethics governing third-party neutrals may impose more stringent standards of personal or imputed disqualification. See Rule 2.4.
[3] Although lawyers who serve as third-party neutrals do not have information concerning the parties that is protected under Rule 1.6, they typically owe the parties an obligation of confidentiality under law or codes of ethics governing third-party neutrals. Thus, paragraph (c) provides that conflicts of the personally disqualified lawyer will be imputed to other lawyers in a law firm unless the conditions of this paragraph are met.
[4] Requirements for screening procedures are stated in Rule 1.0(k). Paragraph (c)(1) does not prohibit the screened lawyer from receiving a salary or partnership share established by prior independent agreement, but that lawyer may not receive compensation directly related to the matter in which the lawyer is disqualified.
[5] Notice, including a description of the screened lawyer's prior representation and of the screening procedures employed, generally should be given as soon as practicable after the need for screening becomes apparent.

RULE 1.13:	ORGANIZATION AS CLIENT
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) A lawyer employed or retained by an organization represents the organization acting through its duly authorized constituents.
(b) If a lawyer for an organization knows that an officer, employee or other person associated with the organization is engaged in action, intends to act or refuses to act in a matter related to the representation that is a violation of a legal obligation to the organization, or a violation of law that reasonably might be imputed to the organization, and that is likely to result in substantial injury to the organization, then the lawyer shall proceed as is reasonably necessary in the best interest of the organization. Unless the lawyer reasonably believes that it is not necessary in the best interest of the organization to do so, the lawyer shall refer the matter to higher authority in the organization, including, if warranted by the circumstances to the highest authority that can act on behalf of the organization as determined by applicable law.
(c) Except as provided in paragraph (d), if
(1) despite the lawyer's efforts in accordance with paragraph (b) the highest authority that can act on behalf of the organization insists upon or fails to address in a timely and appropriate manner an action, or a refusal to act, that is clearly a violation of law, and
(2) the lawyer reasonably believes that the violation is reasonably certain to result in substantial injury to the organization, then the lawyer may reveal information relating to the representation whether or not Rule 1.6 permits such disclosure, but only if and to the extent the lawyer reasonably believes necessary to prevent substantial injury to the organization.
(d) Paragraph (c) shall not apply with respect to information relating to a lawyer's representation of an organization to investigate an alleged violation of law, or to defend the organization or an officer, employee or other constituent associated with the organization against a claim arising out of an alleged violation of law.
(e) A lawyer who reasonably believes that he or she has been discharged because of the lawyer's actions taken pursuant to paragraphs (b) or (c), or who withdraws under circumstances that require or permit the lawyer to take action under either of those paragraphs, shall proceed as the lawyer reasonably believes necessary to assure that the organization's highest authority is informed of the lawyer's discharge or withdrawal.
(f) In dealing with an organization's directors, officers, employees, members, shareholders or other constituents, a lawyer shall explain the identity of the client when the lawyer knows or reasonably should know that the organization's interests are adverse to those of the constituents with whom the lawyer is dealing.
(g) A lawyer representing an organization may also represent any of its directors, officers, employees, members, shareholders or other constituents, subject to the provisions of Rule 1.7. If the organization's consent to the dual representation is required by Rule 1.7, the consent shall be given by an appropriate official of the organization other than the individual who is to be represented, or by the shareholders.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.13
The Entity as the Client
[1] An organizational client is a legal entity, but it cannot act except through its officers, directors, employees, shareholders and other constituents. Officers, directors, employees and shareholders are the constituents of the corporate organizational client. The duties defined in this Comment apply equally to unincorporated associations. "Other constituents" as used in this Comment means the positions equivalent to officers, directors, employees and shareholders held by persons acting for organizational clients that are not corporations.
[2] When one of the constituents of an organizational client communicates with the organization's lawyer in that person's organizational capacity, the communication is protected by Rule 1.6. Thus, by way of example, if an organizational client requests its lawyer to investigate allegations of wrongdoing, interviews made in the course of that investigation between the lawyer and the client's employees or other constituents are covered by Rule 1.6. This does not mean, however, that constituents of an organizational client are the clients of the lawyer. The lawyer may not disclose to such constituents information relating to the representation except for disclosures explicitly or impliedly authorized by the organizational client in order to carry out the representation or as otherwise permitted by Rule 1.6.
[3] When constituents of the organization make decisions for it, the decisions ordinarily must be accepted by the lawyer even if their utility or prudence is doubtful. Decisions concerning policy and operations, including ones entailing serious risk, are not as such in the lawyer's province. Paragraph (b) makes clear, however, that when the lawyer knows that the organization is likely to be substantially injured by action of an officer or other constituent that violates a legal obligation to the organization or is in violation of law that might be imputed to the organization, the lawyer must proceed as is reasonably necessary in the best interest of the organization. As defined in Rule 1.0(f), knowledge can be inferred from circumstances, and a lawyer cannot ignore the obvious.
[4] In determining how to proceed under paragraph (b), the lawyer should give due consideration to the seriousness of the violation and its consequences, the responsibility in the organization and the apparent motivation of the person involved, the policies of the organization concerning such matters, and any other relevant considerations. Ordinarily, referral to a higher authority would be necessary. In some circumstances, however, it may be appropriate for the lawyer to ask the constituent to reconsider the matter; for example, if the circumstances involve a constituent's innocent misunderstanding of law and subsequent acceptance of the lawyer's advice, the lawyer may reasonably conclude that the best interest of the organization does not require that the matter be referred to higher authority. If a constituent persists in conduct contrary to the lawyer's advice, it will be necessary for the lawyer to take steps to have the matter reviewed by a higher authority in the organization. If the matter is of sufficient seriousness and importance or urgency to the organization, referral to higher authority in the organization may be necessary even if the lawyer has not communicated with the constituent. Any measures taken should, to the extent practicable, minimize the risk of revealing information relating to the representation to persons outside the organization. Even in circumstances where a lawyer is not obligated by Rule 1.13 to proceed, a lawyer may bring to the attention of an organizational client, including its highest authority, matters that the lawyer reasonably believes to be of sufficient importance to warrant doing so in the best interest of the organization.
[5] Paragraph (b) also makes clear that when it is reasonably necessary to enable the organization to address the matter in a timely and appropriate manner, the lawyer must refer the matter to higher authority, including, if warranted by the circumstances, the highest authority that can act on behalf of the organization under applicable law. The organization's highest authority to whom a matter may be referred ordinarily will be the board of directors or similar governing body. However, applicable law may prescribe that under certain conditions the highest authority reposes elsewhere, for example, in the independent directors of a corporation.
Relation to Other Rules
[6] The authority and responsibility provided in this Rule are concurrent with the authority and responsibility provided in other Rules. In particular, this Rule does not limit or expand the lawyer's responsibility under Rules 1.8, 1.16, 3.3 or 4.1. Paragraph (c) of this Rule supplements Rule 1.6(b) by providing an additional basis upon which the lawyer may reveal information relating to the representation, but does not modify, restrict, or limit the provisions of Rule 1.6(b)(1) - (6). Under paragraph (c) the lawyer may reveal such information only when the organization's highest authority insists upon or fails to address threatened or ongoing action that is clearly a violation of law, and then only to the extent the lawyer reasonably believes necessary to prevent reasonably certain substantial injury to the organization. It is not necessary that the lawyer's services be used in furtherance of the violation, but it is required that the matter be related to the lawyer's representation of the organization. If the lawyer's services are being used by an organization to further a crime or fraud by the organization, Rules 1.6(b)(2) and 1.6(b)(3) may permit the lawyer to disclose confidential information. In such circumstances Rule 1.2(d) may also be applicable, in which event, withdrawal from the representation under Rule 1.16(a)(1) may be required.
[7] Paragraph (d) makes clear that the authority of a lawyer to disclose information relating to a representation in circumstances described in paragraph (c) does not apply with respect to information relating to a lawyer's engagement by an organization to investigate an alleged violation of law or to defend the organization or an officer, employee or other person associated with the organization against a claim arising out of an alleged violation of law. This is necessary in order to enable organizational clients to enjoy the full benefits of legal counsel in conducting an investigation or defending against a claim.
[8] A lawyer who reasonably believes that he or she has been discharged because of the lawyer's actions taken pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c), or who withdraws in circumstances that require or permit the lawyer to take action under either of these paragraphs, must proceed as the lawyer reasonably believes necessary to assure that the organization's highest authority is informed of the lawyer's discharge or withdrawal.
Government Agency
[9] The duty defined in this Rule applies to governmental organizations. Defining precisely the identity of the client and prescribing the resulting obligations of such lawyers may be more difficult in the government context and is a matter beyond the scope of these Rules. See Scope [18]. Although in some circumstances the client may be a specific agency, it may also be a branch of government, such as the executive branch, or the government as a whole. For example, if the action or failure to act involves the head of a bureau, either the department of which the bureau is a part or the relevant branch of government may be the client for purposes of this Rule. Moreover, in a matter involving the conduct of government officials, a government lawyer may have authority under applicable law to question such conduct more extensively than that of a lawyer for a private organization in similar circumstances. Thus, when the client is a governmental organization, a different balance may be appropriate between maintaining confidentiality and assuring that the wrongful act is prevented or rectified, for public business is involved. In addition, duties of lawyers employed by the government or lawyers in military service may be defined by statutes and regulation. This Rule does not limit that authority. See Scope.
Clarifying the Lawyer's Role
[10] There are times when the organization's interest may be or become adverse to those of one or more of its constituents. In such circumstances the lawyer should advise any constituent, whose interest the lawyer finds adverse to that of the organization of the conflict or potential conflict of interest, that the lawyer cannot represent such constituent, and that such person may wish to obtain independent representation. Care must be taken to assure that the individual understands that, when there is such adversity of interest, the lawyer for the organization cannot provide legal representation for that constituent individual, and that discussions between the lawyer for the organization and the individual may not be privileged.
[11] Whether such a warning should be given by the lawyer for the organization to any constituent individual may turn on the facts of each case.
Dual Representation
[12] Paragraph (g) recognizes that a lawyer for an organization may also represent a principal officer or major shareholder.
Derivative Actions
[13] Under generally prevailing law, the shareholders or members of a corporation may bring suit to compel the directors to perform their legal obligations in the supervision of the organization. Members of unincorporated associations have essentially the same right. Such an action may be brought nominally by the organization, but usually is, in fact, a legal controversy over management of the organization.
[14] The question can arise whether counsel for the organization may defend such an action. The proposition that the organization is the lawyer's client does not alone resolve the issue. Most derivative actions are a normal incident of an organization's affairs, to be defended by the organization's lawyer like any other suit. However, if the claim involves serious charges of wrongdoing by those in control of the organization, a conflict may arise between the lawyer's duty to the organization and the lawyer's relationship with the board. In those circumstances, Rule 1.7 governs who should represent the directors and the organization.

RULE 1.14:	CLIENT WITH DIMINISHED CAPACITY
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) When a client's capacity to make adequately considered decisions in connection with a representation is diminished, whether because of minority, mental impairment or for some other reason, the lawyer shall, as far as reasonably possible, maintain a normal client-lawyer relationship with the client.
(b) When the lawyer reasonably believes that the client has diminished capacity, is at risk of substantial physical, financial or other harm unless action is taken and cannot adequately act in the client's own interest, the lawyer may take reasonably necessary protective action, including consulting with individuals or entities that have the ability to take action to protect the client and, in appropriate cases, seeking the appointment of a guardian ad litem, conservator or guardian.
(c) Information relating to the representation of a client with diminished capacity is protected by Rule 1.6. When taking protective action pursuant to paragraph (b), the lawyer is impliedly authorized under Rule 1.6(a) to reveal information about the client, but only to the extent reasonably necessary to protect the client's interests.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.14
[1] The normal client-lawyer relationship is based on the assumption that the client, when properly advised and assisted, is capable of making decisions about important matters. When the client is a minor or suffers from a diminished mental capacity, however, maintaining the ordinary client-lawyer relationship may not be possible in all respects. In particular, a severely incapacitated person may have no power to make legally binding decisions. Nevertheless, a client with diminished capacity often has the ability to understand, deliberate upon, and reach conclusions about matters affecting the client's own well-being. For example, children as young as five or six years of age, and certainly those of ten or twelve, are regarded as having opinions that are entitled to weight in legal proceedings concerning their custody. So also, it is recognized that some persons of advanced age can be quite capable of handling routine financial matters while needing special legal protection concerning major transactions.
[2] The fact that a client suffers a disability does not diminish the lawyer's obligation to treat the client with attention and respect. Even if the person has a legal representative, the lawyer should as far as possible accord the represented person the status of client, particularly in maintaining communication.
[3] The client may wish to have family members or other persons participate in discussions with the lawyer. When necessary to assist in the representation, the presence of such persons generally does not affect the applicability of the attorney-client evidentiary privilege. Nevertheless, the lawyer must keep the client's interests foremost and, except for protective action authorized under paragraph (b), must to look to the client, and not family members, to make decisions on the client's behalf.
[4] If a legal representative has already been appointed for the client, the lawyer should ordinarily look to the representative for decisions on behalf of the client. In matters involving a minor, whether the lawyer should look to the parents as natural guardians may depend on the type of proceeding or matter in which the lawyer is representing the minor. If the lawyer represents the guardian as distinct from the ward, and is aware that the guardian is acting adversely to the ward's interest, the lawyer may have an obligation to prevent or rectify the guardian's misconduct. See Rule 1.2(d).
Taking Protective Action
[5] If a lawyer reasonably believes that a client is at risk of substantial physical, financial or other harm unless action is taken, and that a normal client-lawyer relationship cannot be maintained as provided in paragraph (a) because the client lacks sufficient capacity to communicate or to make adequately considered decisions in connection with the representation, then paragraph (b) permits the lawyer to take protective measures deemed necessary. Such measures could include: consulting with family members, using a reconsideration period to permit clarification or improvement of circumstances, using voluntary surrogate decisionmaking tools such as durable powers of attorney or consulting with support groups, professional services, adult-protective agencies or other individuals or entities that have the ability to protect the client. In taking any protective action, the lawyer should be guided by such factors as the wishes and values of the client to the extent known, the client's best interests and the goals of intruding into the client's decisionmaking autonomy to the least extent feasible, maximizing client capacities and respecting the client's family and social connections.
[6] In determining the extent of the client's diminished capacity, the lawyer should consider and balance such factors as: the client's ability to articulate reasoning leading to a decision, variability of state of mind and ability to appreciate consequences of a decision; the substantive fairness of a decision; and the consistency of a decision with the known long-term commitments and values of the client. In appropriate circumstances, the lawyer may seek guidance from an appropriate diagnostician.
[7] If a legal representative has not been appointed, the lawyer should consider whether appointment of a guardian ad litem, conservator or guardian is necessary to protect the client's interests. Thus, if a client with diminished capacity has substantial property that should be sold for the client's benefit, effective completion of the transaction may require appointment of a legal representative. In addition, rules of procedure in litigation sometimes provide that minors or persons with diminished capacity must be represented by a guardian or next friend if they do not have a general guardian. In many circumstances, however, appointment of a legal representative may be more expensive or traumatic for the client than circumstances in fact require. Evaluation of such circumstances is a matter entrusted to the professional judgment of the lawyer. In considering alternatives, however, the lawyer should be aware of any law that requires the lawyer to advocate the least restrictive action on behalf of the client.
Disclosure of the Client's Condition
[8] Disclosure of the client's diminished capacity could adversely affect the client's interests. For example, raising the question of diminished capacity could, in some circumstances, lead to proceedings for involuntary commitment. Information relating to the representation is protected by Rule 1.6. Therefore, unless authorized to do so, the lawyer may not disclose such information. When taking protective action pursuant to paragraph (b), the lawyer is impliedly authorized to make the necessary disclosures, even when the client directs the lawyer to the contrary. Nevertheless, given the risks of disclosure, paragraph (c) limits what the lawyer may disclose in consulting with other individuals or entities or seeking the appointment of a legal representative. At the very least, the lawyer should determine whether it is likely that the person or entity consulted with will act adversely to the client's interests before discussing matters related to the client. The lawyer's position in such cases is an unavoidably difficult one.
Emergency Legal Assistance
[9] In an emergency where the health, safety or a financial interest of a person with seriously diminished capacity is threatened with imminent and irreparable harm, a lawyer may take legal action on behalf of such a person even though the person is unable to establish a client-lawyer relationship or to make or express considered judgments about the matter, when the person or another acting in good faith on that person's behalf has consulted with the lawyer. Even in such an emergency, however, the lawyer should not act unless the lawyer reasonably believes that the person has no other lawyer, agent or other representative available. The lawyer should take legal action on behalf of the person only to the extent reasonably necessary to maintain the status quo or otherwise avoid imminent and irreparable harm. A lawyer who undertakes to represent a person in such an exigent situation has the same duties under these Rules as the lawyer would with respect to a client.
[10] A lawyer who acts on behalf of a person with seriously diminished capacity in an emergency should keep the confidences of the person as if dealing with a client, disclosing them only to the extent necessary to accomplish the intended protective action. The lawyer should disclose to any tribunal involved and to any other counsel involved the nature of his or her relationship with the person. The lawyer should take steps to regularize the relationship or implement other protective solutions as soon as possible. Normally, a lawyer would not seek compensation for such emergency actions taken.

RULE 1.15:	SAFEKEEPING PROPERTY
Client-Lawyer Relationship
[IDAHO]
(a) A lawyer shall hold property of clients or third persons that is in a lawyer's possession in connection with a representation separate from the lawyer's own property. Funds shall be kept in a separate account maintained in the state where the lawyer's office is situated, [or, if the holder of the property consents, in some other place]. Other property shall be identified as such and appropriately safeguarded. Complete records of such account funds and other property shall be kept by the lawyer and shall be preserved for a period of [five years] after termination of the representation.
(b) A lawyer may deposit the lawyer's own funds in a client trust account for the sole purpose of paying bank service charges on that account, but only in an amount necessary for that purpose.
(c) A lawyer shall deposit into a client trust account legal fees and expenses that have been paid in advance, to be withdrawn by the lawyer only as fees are earned or expenses incurred.
(d) Upon receiving funds or other property in which a client or third person has an interest, a lawyer shall promptly notify the client or third person. Except as stated in this rule or otherwise permitted by law or by agreement with the client, a lawyer shall promptly deliver to the client or third person any funds or other property that the client or third person is entitled to receive and, upon request by the client or third person, shall promptly render a full accounting regarding such property.
(e) When in the course of representation a lawyer is in possession of property in which two or more persons (one of whom may be the lawyer) claim interests, the property shall be kept separate by the lawyer until the dispute is resolved. The lawyer shall promptly distribute all portions of the property as to which the interests are not in dispute.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.15
[1] A lawyer should hold property of others with the care required of a professional fiduciary. Securities should be kept in a safe deposit box, except when some other form of safekeeping is warranted by special circumstances. All property that is the property of clients or third persons, including prospective clients, must be kept separate from the lawyer's business and personal property and, if monies, in one or more trust accounts. Separate trust accounts may be warranted when administering estate monies or acting in similar fiduciary capacities. A lawyer should maintain on a current basis books and records in accordance with generally accepted accounting practice and comply with any recordkeeping rules established by law or court order. See, e.g., Model Rules for Client Trust Account Records.
[2] While normally it is impermissible to commingle the lawyer's own funds with client funds, paragraph (b) provides that it is permissible when necessary to pay bank service charges on that account. Accurate records must be kept regarding which part of the funds are the lawyer's.
[3] Lawyers often receive funds from which the lawyer's fee will be paid. The lawyer is not required to remit to the client funds that the lawyer reasonably believes represent fees owed. However, a lawyer may not hold funds to coerce a client into accepting the lawyer's contention. The disputed portion of the funds must be kept in a trust account and the lawyer should suggest means for prompt resolution of the dispute, such as arbitration. The undisputed portion of the funds shall be promptly distributed.
[4] Paragraph (e) also recognizes that third parties may have lawful claims against specific funds or other property in a lawyer's custody, such as a client's creditor who has a lien on funds recovered in a personal injury action. A lawyer may have a duty under applicable law to protect such third-party claims against wrongful interference by the client. In such cases, when the third-party claim is not frivolous under applicable law, the lawyer must refuse to surrender the property to the client until the claims are resolved. A lawyer should not unilaterally assume to arbitrate a dispute between the client and the third party, but, when there are substantial grounds for dispute as to the person entitled to the funds, the lawyer may file an action to have a court resolve the dispute.
[5] The obligations of a lawyer under this Rule are independent of those arising from activity other than rendering legal services. For example, a lawyer who serves only as an escrow agent is governed by the applicable law relating to fiduciaries even though the lawyer does not render legal services in the transaction and is not governed by this Rule.
[6] A lawyers' fund for client protection provides a means through the collective efforts of the bar to reimburse persons who have lost money or property as a result of dishonest conduct of a lawyer. Where such a fund has been established, a lawyer must participate where it is mandatory, and, even when it is voluntary, the lawyer should participate.

RULE 1.16:	DECLINING OR TERMINATING REPRESENTATION
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a) Except as stated in paragraph (c), a lawyer shall not represent a client or, where representation has commenced, shall withdraw from the representation of a client if:
(1) the representation will result in violation of the rules of professional conduct or other law;
(2) the lawyer's physical or mental condition materially impairs the lawyer's ability to represent the client; or
(3) the lawyer is discharged.
(b) Except as stated in paragraph (c), a lawyer may withdraw from representing a client if:
(1) withdrawal can be accomplished without material adverse effect on the interests of the client;
(2) the client persists in a course of action involving the lawyer's services that the lawyer reasonably believes is criminal or fraudulent;
(3) the client has used the lawyer's services to perpetrate a crime or fraud;
(4) the client insists upon taking action that the lawyer considers repugnant or with which the lawyer has a fundamental disagreement;
(5) the client fails substantially to fulfill an obligation to the lawyer regarding the lawyer's services and has been given reasonable warning that the lawyer will withdraw unless the obligation is fulfilled;
(6) the representation will result in an unreasonable financial burden on the lawyer or has been rendered unreasonably difficult by the client; or
(7) other good cause for withdrawal exists.
(c) A lawyer must comply with applicable law requiring notice to or permission of a tribunal when terminating a representation. When ordered to do so by a tribunal, a lawyer shall continue representation notwithstanding good cause for terminating the representation.
(d) Upon termination of representation, a lawyer shall take steps to the extent reasonably practicable to protect a client's interests, such as giving reasonable notice to the client, allowing time for employment of other counsel, surrendering papers and property to which the client is entitled and refunding any advance payment of fee or expense that has not been earned or incurred. The lawyer may retain papers relating to the client to the extent permitted by other law.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.16
[1] A lawyer should not accept representation in a matter unless it can be performed competently, promptly, without improper conflict of interest and to completion. Ordinarily, a representation in a matter is completed when the agreed-upon assistance has been concluded. See Rules 1.2(c) and 6.5. See also Rule 1.3, Comment [4].
Mandatory Withdrawal
[2] A lawyer ordinarily must decline or withdraw from representation if the client demands that the lawyer engage in conduct that is illegal or violates the Rules of Professional Conduct or other law. The lawyer is not obliged to decline or withdraw simply because the client suggests such a course of conduct; a client may make such a suggestion in the hope that a lawyer will not be constrained by a professional obligation.
[3] When a lawyer has been appointed to represent a client, withdrawal ordinarily requires approval of the appointing authority. See also Rule 6.2. Similarly, court approval or notice to the court is often required by applicable law before a lawyer withdraws from pending litigation. Difficulty may be encountered if withdrawal is based on the client's demand that the lawyer engage in unprofessional conduct. The court may request an explanation for the withdrawal, while the lawyer may be bound to keep confidential the facts that would constitute such an explanation. The lawyer's statement that professional considerations require termination of the representation ordinarily should be accepted as sufficient. Lawyers should be mindful of their obligations to both clients and the court under Rules 1.6 and 3.3.
Discharge
[4] A client has a right to discharge a lawyer at any time, with or without cause, subject to liability for payment for the lawyer's services. Where future dispute about the withdrawal may be anticipated, it may be advisable to prepare a written statement reciting the circumstances.
[5] Whether a client can discharge appointed counsel may depend on applicable law. A client seeking to do so should be given a full explanation of the consequences. These consequences may include a decision by the appointing authority that appointment of successor counsel is unjustified, thus requiring self-representation by the client.
[6] If the client has severely diminished capacity, the client may lack the legal capacity to discharge the lawyer, and in any event the discharge may be seriously adverse to the client's interests. The lawyer should make special effort to help the client consider the consequences and may take reasonably necessary protective action as provided in Rule 1.14.
Optional Withdrawal
[7] A lawyer may withdraw from representation in some circumstances. The lawyer has the option to withdraw if it can be accomplished without material adverse effect on the client's interests. Withdrawal is also justified if the client persists in a course of action that the lawyer reasonably believes is criminal or fraudulent, for a lawyer is not required to be associated with such conduct even if the lawyer does not further it. Withdrawal is also permitted if the lawyer's services were misused in the past even if that would materially prejudice the client. The lawyer may also withdraw where the client insists on taking action that the lawyer considers repugnant or with which the lawyer has a fundamental disagreement.
[8] A lawyer may withdraw if the client refuses to abide by the terms of an agreement relating to the representation, such as an agreement concerning fees or court costs or an agreement limiting the objectives of the representation.
Assisting the Client upon Withdrawal
[9] Even if the lawyer has been unfairly discharged by the client, a lawyer must take all reasonable steps to mitigate the consequences to the client. The lawyer may retain papers as security for a fee only to the extent permitted by law. See Rule 1.15.

RULE 1.17:	SALE OF LAW PRACTICE
Client-Lawyer Relationship
A lawyer or a law firm may sell or purchase a law practice, or an area of law practice, including good will, if the following conditions are satisfied:
(a) The seller ceases to engage in the private practice of law, or in the area of practice that has been sold, [in the geographic area] [in the jurisdiction] (a jurisdiction may elect either version) in which the practice has been conducted;
(b) The entire practice, or the entire area of practice, is sold to one or more lawyers or law firms;
(c) The seller gives written notice to each of the seller's clients regarding:
(1) the proposed sale;
(2) the client's right to retain other counsel or to take possession of the file; and
(3) the fact that the client's consent to the transfer of the client's files will be presumed if the client does not take any action or does not otherwise object within ninety (90) days of receipt of the notice. If a client cannot be given notice, the representation of that client may be transferred to the purchaser only upon entry of an order so authorizing by a court having jurisdiction. The seller may disclose to the court in camera information relating to the representation only to the extent necessary to obtain an order authorizing the transfer of a file. 
(d) The fees charged clients shall not be increased by reason of the sale.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.17
[1]  The practice of law is a profession, not merely a business. Clients are not commodities that can be purchased and sold at will. Pursuant to this Rule, when a lawyer or an entire firm ceases to practice, or ceases to practice in an area of law, and other lawyers or firms take over the representation, the selling lawyer or firm may obtain compensation for the reasonable value of the practice as may withdrawing partners of law firms. See Rules 5.4 and 5.6.
Termination of Practice by the Seller
[2]  The requirement that all of the private practice, or all of an area of practice, be sold is satisfied if the seller in good faith makes the entire practice, or the area of practice, available for sale to the purchasers. The fact that a number of the seller's clients decide not to be represented by the purchasers but take their matters elsewhere, therefore, does not result in a violation. Return to private practice as a result of an unanticipated change in circumstances does not necessarily result in a violation. For example, a lawyer who has sold the practice to accept an appointment to judicial office does not violate the requirement that the sale be attendant to cessation of practice if the lawyer later resumes private practice upon being defeated in a contested or a retention election for the office or resigns from a judiciary position.
[3]  The requirement that the seller cease to engage in the private practice of law does not prohibit employment as a lawyer on the staff of a public agency or a legal services entity that provides legal services to the poor, or as in-house counsel to a business.
[4]  The Rule permits a sale of an entire practice attendant upon retirement from the private practice of law within the jurisdiction. Its provisions, therefore, accommodate the lawyer who sells the practice on the occasion of moving to another state. Some states are so large that a move from one locale therein to another is tantamount to leaving the jurisdiction in which the lawyer has engaged in the practice of law. To also accommodate lawyers so situated, states may permit the sale of the practice when the lawyer leaves the geographical area rather than the jurisdiction. The alternative desired should be indicated by selecting one of the two provided for in Rule 1.17(a).
[5]  This Rule also permits a lawyer or law firm to sell an area of practice. If an area of practice is sold and the lawyer remains in the active practice of law, the lawyer must cease accepting any matters in the area of practice that has been sold, either as counsel or co-counsel or by assuming joint responsibility for a matter in connection with the division of a fee with another lawyer as would otherwise be permitted by Rule 1.5(e). For example, a lawyer with a substantial number of estate planning matters and a substantial number of probate administration cases may sell the estate planning portion of the practice but remain in the practice of law by concentrating on probate administration; however, that practitioner may not thereafter accept any estate planning matters. Although a lawyer who leaves a jurisdiction or geographical area typically would  sell the entire practice, this Rule permits the lawyer to limit the sale to one or more areas of the practice, thereby preserving the lawyer's right to continue practice in the areas of the practice that were not sold.
Sale of Entire Practice or Entire Area of Practice
[6]  The Rule requires that the seller's entire practice, or an entire area of practice, be sold. The prohibition against sale of less than an entire practice area protects those clients whose matters are less lucrative and who might find it difficult to secure other counsel if a sale could be limited to substantial fee-generating matters. The purchasers are required to undertake all client matters in the practice or practice area, subject to client consent. This requirement is satisfied, however, even if a purchaser is unable to undertake a particular client matter because of a conflict of interest.
Client Confidences, Consent and Notice
[7]  Negotiations between seller and prospective purchaser prior to disclosure of information relating to a specific representation of an identifiable client no more violate the confidentiality provisions of Model Rule 1.6 than do preliminary discussions concerning the possible association of another lawyer or mergers between firms, with respect to which client  consent is not required. See Rule 1.6(b)(7). Providing the purchaser access to detailed information relating to the representation, such as the client’s file, however, requires client consent. The Rule provides that before such information can be disclosed by the seller to the purchaser the client must be given actual written notice of the contemplated sale, including the identity of the purchaser, and must be told that the decision to consent or make other arrangements must be made within 90 days. If nothing  is heard from the client within that time, consent to the sale is presumed.
[8]  A lawyer or law firm ceasing to practice cannot be required to remain in practice because some clients cannot be given actual notice of the proposed purchase. Since these clients cannot themselves consent to the purchase or direct any other disposition of their files, the Rule requires an order from a court having jurisdiction authorizing their transfer or other disposition.  The court can be expected to determine whether reasonable efforts to locate the client have been exhausted, and whether the absent client's legitimate interests will be served by authorizing the transfer of the file so that the purchaser may continue the representation. Preservation of client confidences requires that the petition for a court order be considered in camera. (A procedure by which such an order can be obtained needs to be established in jurisdictions in which it presently does not exist).
[9]  All elements of client autonomy, including the client's absolute right to discharge a lawyer and transfer the representation to another, survive the sale of the practice or area of practice.
Fee Arrangements Between Client and Purchaser
[10]  The sale may not be financed by increases in fees charged the clients of the practice. Existing arrangements between the seller and the client as to fees and the scope of the work must be honored by the purchaser.
Other Applicable Ethical Standards
[11]  Lawyers participating in the sale of a law practice or a practice area are subject to the ethical standards applicable to involving another lawyer in the representation of a client. These include, for example, the seller's obligation to exercise competence in identifying a purchaser qualified to assume the practice and the purchaser's obligation to undertake the representation competently (see Rule 1.1); the obligation to avoid disqualifying conflicts, and to secure the client's informed consent for those conflicts that can be agreed to (see Rule 1.7 regarding conflicts and Rule 1.0(e) for the definition of informed consent); and the obligation to protect information relating to the representation (see Rules 1.6 and 1.9).
[12]  If approval of the substitution of the purchasing lawyer for the selling lawyer is required by the rules of any tribunal in which a matter is pending, such approval must be obtained before the matter can be included in the sale (see Rule 1.16).
Applicability of the Rule
[13]  This Rule applies to the sale of a law practice of a deceased, disabled or disappeared lawyer. Thus, the seller may be represented by a non-lawyer representative not subject to these Rules. Since, however, no lawyer may participate in a sale of a law practice which does not conform to the requirements of this Rule, the representatives of the seller as well as the purchasing lawyer can be expected to see to it that they are met.
[14]  Admission to or retirement from a law partnership or professional association, retirement plans and similar arrangements, and a sale of tangible assets of a law practice, do not constitute a sale or purchase governed by this Rule.
[15]  This Rule does not apply to the transfers of legal representation between lawyers when such transfers are unrelated to the sale of a practice or an area of practice.


RULE 1.18:	DUTIES TO PROSPECTIVE CLIENT
Client-Lawyer Relationship
(a)  A person who consults with a lawyer about the possibility of forming a client-lawyer relationship with respect to a matter is a prospective client.
(b)  Even when no client-lawyer relationship ensues, a lawyer who has learned information from a prospective client shall not use or reveal that information, except as Rule 1.9 would permit with respect to information of a former client.
(c)  A lawyer subject to paragraph (b) shall not represent a client with interests materially adverse to those of a prospective client in the same or a substantially related matter if the lawyer received information from the prospective client that could be significantly harmful to that person in the matter, except as provided in paragraph (d). If a lawyer is disqualified from representation under this paragraph, no lawyer in a firm with which that lawyer is associated may knowingly undertake or continue representation in such a matter, except as provided in paragraph (d).
(d)  When the lawyer has received disqualifying information as defined in paragraph (c), representation is permissible if:
(1)  both the affected client and the prospective client have given informed consent, confirmed in writing, or:
(2)  the lawyer who received the information took reasonable measures to avoid exposure to more disqualifying information than was reasonably necessary to determine whether to represent the prospective client; and
(i)  the disqualified lawyer is timely screened from any participation in the matter and is apportioned no part of the fee therefrom; and
(ii)  written notice is promptly given to the prospective client.
COMMENT ON RULE 1.18
[1]  Prospective clients, like clients, may disclose information to a lawyer, place documents or other property in the lawyer's custody, or rely on the lawyer's advice. A lawyer's consultations with a prospective client usually are limited in time and depth and leave both the prospective client and the lawyer free (and sometimes required) to proceed no further. Hence, prospective clients should receive some but not all of the protection afforded clients.
[2]  A person becomes a prospective client by consulting with a lawyer about the possibility of forming a client-lawyer relationship with respect to a matter.  Whether communications, including written, oral, or electronic communications, constitute a consultation depends on the circumstances.  For example, a consultation is likely to have occurred if a lawyer, either in person or through the lawyer’s advertising in any medium, specifically requests or invites the submission of information about a potential representation without clear and reasonably understandable warnings and cautionary statements that limit the lawyer’s obligations, and a person provides information in response. See also Comment [4].  In contrast, a consultation does not occur if a person provides information to a lawyer in response to advertising that merely describes the lawyer’s education, experience, areas of practice, and contact information, or provides legal information of general interest. Such a person communicates information unilaterally to a lawyer, without any reasonable expectation that the lawyer is willing to discuss the possibility of forming a client-lawyer relationship, and is thus not a "prospective client." Moreover, a person who communicates with a lawyer for the purpose of disqualifying the lawyer is not a “prospective client.”
[3]  It is often necessary for a prospective client to reveal information to the lawyer during an initial consultation prior to the decision about formation of a client-lawyer relationship. The lawyer often must learn such information to determine whether there is a conflict of interest with an existing client and whether the matter is one that the lawyer is willing to undertake. Paragraph (b) prohibits the lawyer from using or revealing that information, except as permitted by Rule 1.9, even if the client or lawyer decides not to proceed with the representation. The duty exists regardless of how brief the initial conference may be.
[4]  In order to avoid acquiring disqualifying information from a prospective client, a lawyer considering whether or not to undertake a new matter should limit the initial consultation to only such information as reasonably appears necessary for that purpose. Where the information indicates that a conflict of interest or other reason for non-representation exists, the lawyer should so inform the prospective client or decline the representation. If the prospective client wishes to retain the lawyer, and if consent is possible under Rule 1.7, then consent from all affected present or former clients must be obtained before accepting the representation.
[5]  A lawyer may condition a consultation with a prospective client on the person's informed consent that no information disclosed during the consultation will prohibit the lawyer from representing a different client in the matter. See Rule 1.0(e) for the definition of informed consent. If the agreement expressly so provides, the prospective client may also consent to the lawyer's subsequent use of information received from the prospective client.
[6]  Even in the absence of an agreement, under paragraph (c), the lawyer is not prohibited from representing a client with interests adverse to those of the prospective client in the same or a substantially related matter unless the lawyer has received from the prospective client information that could be significantly harmful if used in the matter.
[7]  Under paragraph (c), the prohibition in this Rule is imputed to other lawyers as provided in Rule 1.10, but, under paragraph (d)(1), imputation may be avoided if the lawyer obtains the informed consent, confirmed in writing, of both the prospective and affected clients. In the alternative, imputation may be avoided if the conditions of paragraph (d)(2) are met and all disqualified lawyers are timely screened and written notice is promptly given to the prospective client. See Rule 1.0(k) (requirements for screening procedures). Paragraph (d)(2)(i) does not prohibit the screened lawyer from receiving a salary or partnership share established by prior independent agreement, but that lawyer may not receive compensation directly related to the matter in which the lawyer is disqualified.
[8]  Notice, including a general description of the subject matter about which the lawyer was consulted, and of the screening procedures employed, generally should be given as soon as practicable after the need for screening becomes apparent.
[9]  For the duty of competence of a lawyer who gives assistance on the merits of a matter to a prospective client, see Rule 1.1. For a lawyer's duties when a prospective client entrusts valuables or papers to the lawyer's care, see Rule 1.15.

RULE 2.1:	ADVISOR
Counselor
In representing a client, a lawyer shall exercise independent professional judgment and render candid advice. In rendering advice, a lawyer may refer not only to law but to other considerations such as moral, economic, social and political factors, that may be relevant to the client's situation.
COMMENT ON RULE 2.1
Scope of Advice
[1] A client is entitled to straightforward advice expressing the lawyer's honest assessment. Legal advice often involves unpleasant facts and alternatives that a client may be disinclined to confront. In presenting advice, a lawyer endeavors to sustain the client's morale and may put advice in as acceptable a form as honesty permits. However, a lawyer should not be deterred from giving candid advice by the prospect that the advice will be unpalatable to the client.
[2] Advice couched in narrow legal terms may be of little value to a client, especially where practical considerations, such as cost or effects on other people, are predominant. Purely technical legal advice, therefore, can sometimes be inadequate. It is proper for a lawyer to refer to relevant moral and ethical considerations in giving advice. Although a lawyer is not a moral advisor as such, moral and ethical considerations impinge upon most legal questions and may decisively influence how the law will be applied.
[3] A client may expressly or impliedly ask the lawyer for purely technical advice. When such a request is made by a client experienced in legal matters, the lawyer may accept it at face value. When such a request is made by a client inexperienced in legal matters, however, the lawyer's responsibility as advisor may include indicating that more may be involved than strictly legal considerations.
[4] Matters that go beyond strictly legal questions may also be in the domain of another profession. Family matters can involve problems within the professional competence of psychiatry, clinical psychology or social work; business matters can involve problems within the competence of the accounting profession or of financial specialists. Where consultation with a professional in another field is itself something a competent lawyer would recommend, the lawyer should make such a recommendation. At the same time, a lawyer's advice at its best often consists of recommending a course of action in the face of conflicting recommendations of experts.
Offering Advice
[5] In general, a lawyer is not expected to give advice until asked by the client. However, when a lawyer knows that a client proposes a course of action that is likely to result in substantial adverse legal consequences to the client, the lawyer's duty to the client under Rule 1.4 may require that the lawyer offer advice if the client's course of action is related to the representation. Similarly, when a matter is likely to involve litigation, it may be necessary under Rule 1.4 to inform the client of forms of dispute resolution that might constitute reasonable alternatives to litigation. A lawyer ordinarily has no duty to initiate investigation of a client's affairs or to give advice that the client has indicated is unwanted, but a lawyer may initiate advice to a client when doing so appears to be in the client's interest.

RULE 2.2:	DELETED


RULE 2.3:	EVALUATION FOR USE BY THIRD PERSONS
Counselor
(a) A lawyer may provide an evaluation of a matter affecting a client for the use of someone other than the client if the lawyer reasonably believes that making the evaluation is compatible with other aspects of the lawyer's relationship with the client.
(b) When the lawyer knows or reasonably should know that the evaluation is likely to affect the client's interests materially and adversely, the lawyer shall not provide the evaluation unless the client gives informed consent.
(c) Except as disclosure is authorized in connection with a report of an evaluation, information relating to the evaluation is otherwise protected by Rule 1.6.
COMMENT ON RULE 2.3
Definition
[1] An evaluation may be performed at the client's direction or when impliedly authorized in order to carry out the representation. See Rule 1.2. Such an evaluation may be for the primary purpose of establishing information for the benefit of third parties; for example, an opinion concerning the title of property rendered at the behest of a vendor for the information of a prospective purchaser, or at the behest of a borrower for the information of a prospective lender. In some situations, the evaluation may be required by a government agency; for example, an opinion concerning the legality of the securities registered for sale under the securities laws. In other instances, the evaluation may be required by a third person, such as a purchaser of a business.
[2] A legal evaluation should be distinguished from an investigation of a person with whom the lawyer does not have a client-lawyer relationship. For example, a lawyer retained by a purchaser to analyze a vendor's title to property does not have a client-lawyer relationship with the vendor. So also, an investigation into a person's affairs by a government lawyer, or by special counsel employed by the government, is not an evaluation as that term is used in this Rule. The question is whether the lawyer is retained by the person whose affairs are being examined. When the lawyer is retained by that person, the general rules concerning loyalty to client and preservation of confidences apply, which is not the case if the lawyer is retained by someone else. For this reason, it is essential to identify the person by whom the lawyer is retained. This should be made clear not only to the person under examination, but also to others to whom the results are to be made available.
Duties Owed to Third Person and Client
[3] When the evaluation is intended for the information or use of a third person, a legal duty to that person may or may not arise. That legal question is beyond the scope of this Rule. However, since such an evaluation involves a departure from the normal client-lawyer relationship, careful analysis of the situation is required. The lawyer must be satisfied as a matter of professional judgment that making the evaluation is compatible with other functions undertaken in behalf of the client. For example, if the lawyer is acting as advocate in defending the client against charges of fraud, it would normally be incompatible with that responsibility for the lawyer to perform an evaluation for others concerning the same or a related transaction. Assuming no such impediment is apparent, however, the lawyer should advise the client of the implications of the evaluation, particularly the lawyer's responsibilities to third persons and the duty to disseminate the findings.
Access to and Disclosure of Information
[4] The quality of an evaluation depends on the freedom and extent of the investigation upon which it is based. Ordinarily a lawyer should have whatever latitude of investigation seems necessary as a matter of professional judgment. Under some circumstances, however, the terms of the evaluation may be limited. For example, certain issues or sources may be categorically excluded, or the scope of search may be limited by time constraints or the noncooperation of persons having relevant information. Any such limitations that are material to the evaluation should be described in the report. If after a lawyer has commenced an evaluation, the client refuses to comply with the terms upon which it was understood the evaluation was to have been made, the lawyer's obligations are determined by law, having reference to the terms of the client's agreement and the surrounding circumstances. In no circumstances is the lawyer permitted to knowingly make a false statement of material fact or law in providing an evaluation under this Rule. See Rule 4.1.

Obtaining Client's Informed Consent
[5] Information relating to an evaluation is protected by Rule 1.6. In many situations, providing an evaluation to a third party poses no significant risk to the client; thus, the lawyer may be impliedly authorized to disclose information to carry out the representation. See Rule 1.6(a). Where, however, it is reasonably likely that providing the evaluation will affect the client's interests materially and adversely, the lawyer must first obtain the client's consent after the client has been adequately informed concerning the important possible effects on the client's interests. See Rules 1.6(a) and 1.0(e).
Financial Auditors' Requests for Information
[6] When a question concerning the legal situation of a client arises at the instance of the client's financial auditor and the question is referred to the lawyer, the lawyer's response may be made in accordance with procedures recognized in the legal profession. Such a procedure is set forth in the American Bar Association Statement of Policy Regarding Lawyers' Responses to Auditors' Requests for Information, adopted in 1975.

RULE 2.4:	LAWYER SERVING AS THIRD-PARTY NEUTRAL
Counselor
(a) A lawyer serves as a third-party neutral when the lawyer assists two or more persons who are not clients of the lawyer to reach a resolution of a dispute or other matter that has arisen between them. Service as a third-party neutral may include service as an arbitrator, a mediator or in such other capacity as will enable the lawyer to assist the parties to resolve the matter.
(b) A lawyer serving as a third-party neutral shall inform unrepresented parties that the lawyer is not representing them. When the lawyer knows or reasonably should know that a party does not understand the lawyer's role in the matter, the lawyer shall explain the difference between the lawyer's role as a third-party neutral and a lawyer's role as one who represents a client.
COMMENT ON RULE 2.4
[1] Alternative dispute resolution has become a substantial part of the civil justice system. Aside from representing clients in dispute-resolution processes, lawyers often serve as third-party neutrals. A third-party neutral is a person, such as a mediator, arbitrator, conciliator or evaluator, who assists the parties, represented or unrepresented, in the resolution of a dispute or in the arrangement of a transaction. Whether a third-party neutral serves primarily as a facilitator, evaluator or decisionmaker depends on the particular process that is either selected by the parties or mandated by a court.
[2] The role of a third-party neutral is not unique to lawyers, although, in some court-connected contexts, only lawyers are allowed to serve in this role or to handle certain types of cases. In performing this role, the lawyer may be subject to court rules or other law that apply either to third-party neutrals generally or to lawyers serving as third-party neutrals. Lawyer-neutrals may also be subject to various codes of ethics, such as the Code of Ethics for Arbitrators in Commercial Disputes prepared by a joint committee of the American Bar Association and the American Arbitration Association or the Model Standards of Conduct for Mediators jointly prepared by the American Bar Association, the American Arbitration Association and the Society of Professionals in Dispute Resolution.
[3] Unlike nonlawyers who serve as third-party neutrals, lawyers serving in this role may experience unique problems as a result of differences between the role of a third-party neutral and a lawyer's service as a client representative. The potential for confusion is significant when the parties are unrepresented in the process. Thus, paragraph (b) requires a lawyer-neutral to inform unrepresented parties that the lawyer is not representing them. For some parties, particularly parties who frequently use dispute-resolution processes, this information will be sufficient. For others, particularly those who are using the process for the first time, more information will be required. Where appropriate, the lawyer should inform unrepresented parties of the important differences between the lawyer's role as third-party neutral and a lawyer's role as a client representative, including the inapplicability of the attorney-client evidentiary privilege. The extent of disclosure required under this paragraph will depend on the particular parties involved and the subject matter of the proceeding, as well as the particular features of the dispute-resolution process selected.
[4] A lawyer who serves as a third-party neutral subsequently may be asked to serve as a lawyer representing a client in the same matter. The conflicts of interest that arise for both the individual lawyer and the lawyer's law firm are addressed in Rule 1.12.
[5] Lawyers who represent clients in alternative dispute-resolution processes are governed by the Rules of Professional Conduct. When the dispute-resolution process takes place before a tribunal, as in binding arbitration (see Rule 1.0(m)), the lawyer's duty of candor is governed by Rule 3.3. Otherwise, the lawyer's duty of candor toward both the third-party neutral and other parties is governed by Rule 4.1.


RULE 3.1:	MERITORIOUS CLAIMS & CONTENTIONS
Advocate
A lawyer shall not bring or defend a proceeding, or assert or controvert an issue therein, unless there is a basis in law and fact for doing so that is not frivolous, which includes a good faith argument for an extension, modification or reversal of existing law. A lawyer for the defendant in a criminal proceeding, or the respondent in a proceeding that could result in incarceration, may nevertheless so defend the proceeding as to require that every element of the case be established.
COMMENT ON RULE 3.1
[1] The advocate has a duty to use legal procedure for the fullest benefit of the client's cause, but also a duty not to abuse legal procedure. The law, both procedural and substantive, establishes the limits within which an advocate may proceed. However, the law is not always clear and never is static. Accordingly, in determining the proper scope of advocacy, account must be taken of the law's ambiguities and potential for change.
[2] The filing of an action or defense or similar action taken for a client is not frivolous merely because the facts have not first been fully substantiated or because the lawyer expects to develop vital evidence only by discovery. What is required of lawyers, however, is that they inform themselves about the facts of their clients' cases and the applicable law and determine that they can make good faith arguments in support of their clients' positions. Such action is not frivolous even though the lawyer believes that the client's position ultimately will not prevail. The action is frivolous, however, if the lawyer is unable either to make a good faith argument on the merits of the action taken or to support the action taken by a good faith argument for an extension, modification or reversal of existing law.
[3] The lawyer's obligations under this Rule are subordinate to federal or state constitutional law that entitles a defendant in a criminal matter to the assistance of counsel in presenting a claim or contention that otherwise would be prohibited by this Rule.

RULE 3.2:	EXPEDITING LITIGATION
Advocate
A lawyer shall make reasonable efforts to expedite litigation consistent with the interests of the client.

COMMENT ON RULE 3.2
[1] Dilatory practices bring the administration of justice into disrepute. Although there will be occasions when a lawyer may properly seek a postponement for personal reasons, it is not proper for a lawyer to routinely fail to expedite litigation solely for the convenience of the advocates. Nor will a failure to expedite be reasonable if done for the purpose of frustrating an opposing party's attempt to obtain rightful redress or repose. It is not a justification that similar conduct is often tolerated by the bench and bar. The question is whether a competent lawyer acting in good faith would regard the course of action as having some substantial purpose other than delay. Realizing financial or other benefit from otherwise improper delay in litigation is not a legitimate interest of the client.

RULE 3.3:	CANDOR TOWARD THE TRIBUNAL
Advocate
(a) A lawyer shall not knowingly:
(1) make a false statement of fact or law to a tribunal or fail to correct a false statement of material fact or law previously made to the tribunal by the lawyer;
(2) fail to disclose to the tribunal legal authority in the controlling jurisdiction known to the lawyer to be directly adverse to the position of the client and not disclosed by opposing counsel; or
(3) offer evidence that the lawyer knows to be false. If a lawyer, the lawyer’s client, or a witness called by the lawyer, has offered material evidence and the lawyer comes to know of its falsity, the lawyer shall take reasonable remedial measures, including, if necessary, disclosure to the tribunal. A lawyer may refuse to offer evidence, other than the testimony of a defendant in a criminal matter, that the lawyer reasonably believes is false.
(b) A lawyer who represents a client in an adjudicative proceeding and who knows that a person intends to engage, is engaging or has engaged in criminal or fraudulent conduct related to the proceeding shall take reasonable remedial measures, including, if necessary, disclosure to the tribunal.
(c) The duties stated in paragraphs (a) and (b) continue to the conclusion of the proceeding, and apply even if compliance requires disclosure of information otherwise protected by Rule 1.6.
(d) In an ex parte proceeding, a lawyer shall inform the tribunal of all material facts known to the lawyer that will enable the tribunal to make an informed decision, whether or not the facts are adverse.
COMMENT ON RULE 3.3
[1] This Rule governs the conduct of a lawyer who is representing a client in the proceedings of a tribunal. See Rule 1.0(m) for the definition of "tribunal." It also applies when the lawyer is representing a client in an ancillary proceeding conducted pursuant to the tribunal’s adjudicative authority, such as a deposition. Thus, for example, paragraph (a)(3) requires a lawyer to take reasonable remedial measures if the lawyer comes to know that a client who is testifying in a deposition has offered evidence that is false.
[2] This Rule sets forth the special duties of lawyers as officers of the court to avoid conduct that undermines the integrity of the adjudicative process. A lawyer acting as an advocate in an adjudicative proceeding has an obligation to present the client's case with persuasive force. Performance of that duty while maintaining confidences of the client, however, is qualified by the advocate's duty of candor to the tribunal. Consequently, although a lawyer in an adversary proceeding is not required to present an impartial exposition of the law or to vouch for the evidence submitted in a cause, the lawyer must not allow the tribunal to be misled by false statements of law or fact or evidence that the lawyer knows to be false.
Representations by a Lawyer
[3] An advocate is responsible for pleadings and other documents prepared for litigation, but is usually not required to have personal knowledge of matters asserted therein, for litigation documents ordinarily present assertions by the client, or by someone on the client's behalf, and not assertions by the lawyer. Compare Rule 3.1. However, an assertion purporting to be on the lawyer's own knowledge, as in an affidavit by the lawyer or in a statement in open court, may properly be made only when the lawyer knows the assertion is true or believes it to be true on the basis of a reasonably diligent inquiry. There are circumstances where failure to make a disclosure is the equivalent of an affirmative misrepresentation. The obligation prescribed in Rule 1.2(d) not to counsel a client to commit or assist the client in committing a fraud applies in litigation. Regarding compliance with Rule 1.2(d), see the Comment to that Rule. See also the Comment to Rule 8.4(b).
Legal Argument
[4] Legal argument based on a knowingly false representation of law constitutes dishonesty toward the tribunal. A lawyer is not required to make a disinterested exposition of the law, but must recognize the existence of pertinent legal authorities. Furthermore, as stated in paragraph (a)(2), an advocate has a duty to disclose directly adverse authority in the controlling jurisdiction that has not been disclosed by the opposing party. The underlying concept is that legal argument is a discussion seeking to determine the legal premises properly applicable to the case.
Offering Evidence
[5] Paragraph (a)(3) requires that the lawyer refuse to offer evidence that the lawyer knows to be false, regardless of the client’s wishes. This duty is premised on the lawyer’s obligation as an officer of the court to prevent the trier of fact from being misled by false evidence. A lawyer does not violate this Rule if the lawyer offers the evidence for the purpose of establishing its falsity.
[6] If a lawyer knows that the client intends to testify falsely or wants the lawyer to introduce false evidence, the lawyer should seek to persuade the client that the evidence should not be offered. If the persuasion is ineffective and the lawyer continues to represent the client, the lawyer must refuse to offer the false evidence. If only a portion of a witness's testimony will be false, the lawyer may call the witness to testify but may not elicit or otherwise permit the witness to present the testimony that the lawyer knows is false.
[7] The duties stated in paragraphs (a) and (b) apply to all lawyers, including defense counsel in criminal cases. In some jurisdictions, however, courts have required counsel to present the accused as a witness or to give a narrative statement if the accused so desires, even if counsel knows that the testimony or statement will be false. The obligation of the advocate under the Rules of Professional Conduct is subordinate to such requirements. See also Comment [9].
[8] The prohibition against offering false evidence only applies if the lawyer knows that the evidence is false. A lawyer’s reasonable belief that evidence is false does not preclude its presentation to the trier of fact. A lawyer’s knowledge that evidence is false, however, can be inferred from the circumstances. See Rule 1.0(f). Thus, although a lawyer should resolve doubts about the veracity of testimony or other evidence in favor of the client, the lawyer cannot ignore an obvious falsehood.
[9] Although paragraph (a)(3) only prohibits a lawyer from offering evidence the lawyer knows to be false, it permits the lawyer to refuse to offer testimony or other proof that the lawyer reasonably believes is false. Offering such proof may reflect adversely on the lawyer's ability to discriminate in the quality of evidence and thus impair the lawyer's effectiveness as an advocate. Because of the special protections historically provided criminal defendants, however, this Rule does not permit a lawyer to refuse to offer the testimony of such a client where the lawyer reasonably believes but does not know that the testimony will be false. Unless the lawyer knows the testimony will be false, the lawyer must honor the client’s decision to testify. See also Comment [7].
Remedial Measures
[10] Having offered material evidence in the belief that it was true, a lawyer may subsequently come to know that the evidence is false. Or, a lawyer may be surprised when the lawyer’s client, or another witness called by the lawyer, offers testimony the lawyer knows to be false, either during the lawyer’s direct examination or in response to cross-examination by the opposing lawyer. In such situations or if the lawyer knows of the falsity of testimony elicited from the client during a deposition, the lawyer must take reasonable remedial measures. In such situations, the advocate's proper course is to remonstrate with the client confidentially, advise the client of the lawyer’s duty of candor to the tribunal and seek the client’s cooperation with respect to the withdrawal or correction of the false statements or evidence. If that fails, the advocate must take further remedial action. If withdrawal from the representation is not permitted or will not undo the effect of the false evidence, the advocate must make such disclosure to the tribunal as is reasonably necessary to remedy the situation, even if doing so requires the lawyer to reveal information that otherwise would be protected by Rule 1.6. It is for the tribunal then to determine what should be done — making a statement about the matter to the trier of fact, ordering a mistrial or perhaps nothing.
[11] The disclosure of a client’s false testimony can result in grave consequences to the client, including not only a sense of betrayal but also loss of the case and perhaps a prosecution for perjury. But the alternative is that the lawyer cooperate in deceiving the court, thereby subverting the truth-finding process which the adversary system is designed to implement. See Rule 1.2(d). Furthermore, unless it is clearly understood that the lawyer will act upon the duty to disclose the existence of false evidence, the client can simply reject the lawyer's advice to reveal the false evidence and insist that the lawyer keep silent. Thus the client could in effect coerce the lawyer into being a party to fraud on the court.
Preserving Integrity of Adjudicative Process
[12] Lawyers have a special obligation to protect a tribunal against criminal or fraudulent conduct that undermines the integrity of the adjudicative process, such as bribing, intimidating or otherwise unlawfully communicating with a witness, juror, court official or other participant in the proceeding, unlawfully destroying or concealing documents or other evidence or failing to disclose information to the tribunal when required by law to do so. Thus, paragraph (b) requires a lawyer to take reasonable remedial measures, including disclosure if necessary, whenever the lawyer knows that a person, including the lawyer’s client, intends to engage, is engaging or has engaged in criminal or fraudulent conduct related to the proceeding.
Duration of Obligation
[13] A practical time limit on the obligation to rectify false evidence or false statements of law and fact has to be established. The conclusion of the proceeding is a reasonably definite point for the termination of the obligation. A proceeding has concluded within the meaning of this Rule when a final judgment in the proceeding has been affirmed on appeal or the time for review has passed.
Ex Parte Proceedings
[14] Ordinarily, an advocate has the limited responsibility of presenting one side of the matters that a tribunal should consider in reaching a decision; the conflicting position is expected to be presented by the opposing party. However, in any ex parte proceeding, such as an application for a temporary restraining order, there is no balance of presentation by opposing advocates. The object of an ex parte proceeding is nevertheless to yield a substantially just result. The judge has an affirmative responsibility to accord the absent party just consideration. The lawyer for the represented party has the correlative duty to make disclosures of material facts known to the lawyer and that the lawyer reasonably believes are necessary to an informed decision.
Withdrawal
[15] Normally, a lawyer’s compliance with the duty of candor imposed by this Rule does not require that the lawyer withdraw from the representation of a client whose interests will be or have been adversely affected by the lawyer’s disclosure. The lawyer may, however, be required by Rule 1.16(a) to seek permission of the tribunal to withdraw if the lawyer’s compliance with this Rule’s duty of candor results in such an extreme deterioration of the client-lawyer relationship that the lawyer can no longer competently represent the client. Also see Rule 1.16(b) for the circumstances in which a lawyer will be permitted to seek a tribunal’s permission to withdraw. In connection with a request for permission to withdraw that is premised on a client’s misconduct, a lawyer may reveal information relating to the representation only to the extent reasonably necessary to comply with this Rule or as otherwise permitted by Rule 1.6.

RULE 3.4:	FAIRNESS TO OPPOSING PARTY & COUNSEL
Advocate
A lawyer shall not:
(a) unlawfully obstruct another party' s access to evidence or unlawfully alter, destroy or conceal a document or other material having potential evidentiary value. A lawyer shall not counsel or assist another person to do any such act;
(b) falsify evidence, counsel or assist a witness to testify falsely, or offer an inducement to a witness that is prohibited by law;
(c) knowingly disobey an obligation under the rules of a tribunal except for an open refusal based on an assertion that no valid obligation exists;
(d) in pretrial procedure, make a frivolous discovery request or fail to make reasonably diligent effort to comply with a legally proper discovery request by an opposing party;
(e) in trial, allude to any matter that the lawyer does not reasonably believe is relevant or that will not be supported by admissible evidence, assert personal knowledge of facts in issue except when testifying as a witness, or state a personal opinion as to the justness of a cause, the credibility of a witness, the culpability of a civil litigant or the guilt or innocence of an accused; or
(f) request a person other than a client to refrain from voluntarily giving relevant information to another party unless:
(1) the person is a relative or an employee or other agent of a client; and
(2) the lawyer reasonably believes that the person's interests will not be adversely affected by refraining from giving such information.
COMMENT ON RULE 3.4
[1] The procedure of the adversary system contemplates that the evidence in a case is to be marshalled competitively by the contending parties. Fair competition in the adversary system is secured by prohibitions against destruction or concealment of evidence, improperly influencing witnesses, obstructive tactics in discovery procedure, and the like.
[2] Documents and other items of evidence are often essential to establish a claim or defense. Subject to evidentiary privileges, the right of an opposing party, including the government, to obtain evidence through discovery or subpoena is an important procedural right. The exercise of that right can be frustrated if relevant material is altered, concealed or destroyed. Applicable law in many jurisdictions makes it an offense to destroy material for purpose of impairing its availability in a pending proceeding or one whose commencement can be foreseen. Falsifying evidence is also generally a criminal offense. Paragraph (a) applies to evidentiary material generally, including computerized information. Applicable law may permit a lawyer to take temporary possession of physical evidence of client crimes for the purpose of conducting a limited examination that will not alter or destroy material characteristics of the evidence. In such a case, applicable law may require the lawyer to turn the evidence over to the police or other prosecuting authority, depending on the circumstances.
[3] With regard to paragraph (b), it is not improper to pay a witness's expenses or to compensate an expert witness on terms permitted by law. The common law rule in most jurisdictions is that it is improper to pay an occurrence witness any fee for testifying and that it is improper to pay an expert witness a contingent fee.
[4] Paragraph (f) permits a lawyer to advise employees of a client to refrain from giving information to another party, for the employees may identify their interests with those of the client. See also Rule 4.2.

RULE 3.5:	IMPARTIALITY & DECORUM OF THE TRIBUNAL
Advocate
A lawyer shall not:
(a) seek to influence a judge, juror, prospective juror or other official by means prohibited by law;
(b) communicate ex parte with such a person during the proceeding unless authorized to do so by law or court order;
(c) communicate with a juror or prospective juror after discharge of the jury if:
(1) the communication is prohibited by law or court order;
(2) the juror has made known to the lawyer a desire not to communicate; or
(3) the communication involves misrepresentation, coercion, duress or harassment; or
(d) engage in conduct intended to disrupt a tribunal.
COMMENT ON RULE 3.5
[1] Many forms of improper influence upon a tribunal are proscribed by criminal law. Others are specified in the ABA Model Code of Judicial Conduct, with which an advocate should be familiar. A lawyer is required to avoid contributing to a violation of such provisions.
[2] During a proceeding a lawyer may not communicate ex parte with persons serving in an official capacity in the proceeding, such as judges, masters or jurors, unless authorized to do so by law or court order.
[3] A lawyer may on occasion want to communicate with a juror or prospective juror after the jury has been discharged. The lawyer may do so unless the communication is prohibited by law or a court order but must respect the desire of the juror not to talk with the lawyer. The lawyer may not engage in improper conduct during the communication.
[4] The advocate's function is to present evidence and argument so that the cause may be decided according to law. Refraining from abusive or obstreperous conduct is a corollary of the advocate's right to speak on behalf of litigants. A lawyer may stand firm against abuse by a judge but should avoid reciprocation; the judge's default is no justification for similar dereliction by an advocate. An advocate can present the cause, protect the record for subsequent review and preserve professional integrity by patient firmness no less effectively than by belligerence or theatrics.
[5] The duty to refrain from disruptive conduct applies to any proceeding of a tribunal, including a deposition. See Rule 1.0(m).

RULE 3.6:	TRIAL PUBLICITY
Advocate
(a) A lawyer who is participating or has participated in the investigation or litigation of a matter shall not make an extrajudicial statement that the lawyer knows or reasonably should know will be disseminated by means of public communication and will have a substantial likelihood of materially prejudicing an adjudicative proceeding in the matter.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a lawyer may state:
(1) the claim, offense or defense involved and, except when prohibited by law, the identity of the persons involved;
(2) information contained in a public record;
(3) that an investigation of a matter is in progress;
(4) the scheduling or result of any step in litigation;
(5) a request for assistance in obtaining evidence and information necessary thereto;
(6) a warning of danger concerning the behavior of a person involved, when there is reason to believe that there exists the likelihood of substantial harm to an individual or to the public interest; and
(7) in a criminal case, in addition to subparagraphs (1) through (6):
(i) the identity, residence, occupation and family status of the accused;
(ii) if the accused has not been apprehended, information necessary to aid in apprehension of that person;
(iii) the fact, time and place of arrest; and
(iv) the identity of investigating and arresting officers or agencies and the length of the investigation.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a lawyer may make a statement that a reasonable lawyer would believe is required to protect a client from the substantial undue prejudicial effect of recent publicity not initiated by the lawyer or the lawyer's client. A statement made pursuant to this paragraph shall be limited to such information as is necessary to mitigate the recent adverse publicity.
(d) No lawyer associated in a firm or government agency with a lawyer subject to paragraph (a) shall make a statement prohibited by paragraph (a).
COMMENT ON RULE 3.6
[1] It is difficult to strike a balance between protecting the right to a fair trial and safeguarding the right of free expression. Preserving the right to a fair trial necessarily entails some curtailment of the information that may be disseminated about a party prior to trial, particularly where trial by jury is involved. If there were no such limits, the result would be the practical nullification of the protective effect of the rules of forensic decorum and the exclusionary rules of evidence. On the other hand, there are vital social interests served by the free dissemination of information about events having legal consequences and about legal proceedings themselves. The public has a right to know about threats to its safety and measures aimed at assuring its security. It also has a legitimate interest in the conduct of judicial proceedings, particularly in matters of general public concern. Furthermore, the subject matter of legal proceedings is often of direct significance in debate and deliberation over questions of public policy.
[2] Special rules of confidentiality may validly govern proceedings in juvenile, domestic relations and mental disability proceedings, and perhaps other types of litigation. Rule 3.4(c) requires compliance with such rules.
[3] The Rule sets forth a basic general prohibition against a lawyer's making statements that the lawyer knows or should know will have a substantial likelihood of materially prejudicing an adjudicative proceeding. Recognizing that the public value of informed commentary is great and the likelihood of prejudice to a proceeding by the commentary of a lawyer who is not involved in the proceeding is small, the rule applies only to lawyers who are, or who have been involved in the investigation or litigation of a case, and their associates.
[4] Paragraph (b) identifies specific matters about which a lawyer's statements would not ordinarily be considered to present a substantial likelihood of material prejudice, and should not in any event be considered prohibited by the general prohibition of paragraph (a). Paragraph (b) is not intended to be an exhaustive listing of the subjects upon which a lawyer may make a statement, but statements on other matters may be subject to paragraph (a).
[5] There are, on the other hand, certain subjects that are more likely than not to have a material prejudicial effect on a proceeding, particularly when they refer to a civil matter triable to a jury, a criminal matter, or any other proceeding that could result in incarceration. These subjects relate to:
(1) the character, credibility, reputation or criminal record of a party, suspect in a criminal investigation or witness, or the identity of a witness, or the expected testimony of a party or witness;
(2) in a criminal case or proceeding that could result in incarceration, the possibility of a plea of guilty to the offense or the existence or contents of any confession, admission, or statement given by a defendant or suspect or that person's refusal or failure to make a statement;
(3) the performance or results of any examination or test or the refusal or failure of a person to submit to an examination or test, or the identity or nature of physical evidence expected to be presented;
(4) any opinion as to the guilt or innocence of a defendant or suspect in a criminal case or proceeding that could result in incarceration;
(5) information that the lawyer knows or reasonably should know is likely to be inadmissible as evidence in a trial and that would, if disclosed, create a substantial risk of prejudicing an impartial trial; or
(6) the fact that a defendant has been charged with a crime, unless there is included therein a statement explaining that the charge is merely an accusation and that the defendant is presumed innocent until and unless proven guilty.
[6] Another relevant factor in determining prejudice is the nature of the proceeding involved. Criminal jury trials will be most sensitive to extrajudicial speech. Civil trials may be less sensitive. Non-jury hearings and arbitration proceedings may be even less affected. The Rule will still place limitations on prejudicial comments in these cases, but the likelihood of prejudice may be different depending on the type of proceeding.
[7] Finally, extrajudicial statements that might otherwise raise a question under this Rule may be permissible when they are made in response to statements made publicly by another party, another party's lawyer, or third persons, where a reasonable lawyer would believe a public response is required in order to avoid prejudice to the lawyer's client. When prejudicial statements have been publicly made by others, responsive statements may have the salutary effect of lessening any resulting adverse impact on the adjudicative proceeding. Such responsive statements should be limited to contain only such information as is necessary to mitigate undue prejudice created by the statements made by others.
[8] See Rule 3.8(f) for additional duties of prosecutors in connection with extrajudicial statements about criminal proceedings.

RULE 3.7:	LAWYER AS WITNESS
Advocate
(a) A lawyer shall not act as advocate at a trial in which the lawyer is likely to be a necessary witness unless:
(1) the testimony relates to an uncontested issue;
(2) the testimony relates to the nature and value of legal services rendered in the case; or
(3) disqualification of the lawyer would work substantial hardship on the client.
(b) A lawyer may act as advocate in a trial in which another lawyer in the lawyer's firm is likely to be called as a witness unless precluded from doing so by Rule 1.7 or Rule 1.9.
COMMENT ON RULE 3.7
[1] Combining the roles of advocate and witness can prejudice the tribunal and the opposing party and can also involve a conflict of interest between the lawyer and client.
Advocate-Witness Rule
[2] The tribunal has proper objection when the trier of fact may be confused or misled by a lawyer serving as both advocate and witness. The opposing party has proper objection where the combination of roles may prejudice that party's rights in the litigation. A witness is required to testify on the basis of personal knowledge, while an advocate is expected to explain and comment on evidence given by others. It may not be clear whether a statement by an advocate-witness should be taken as proof or as an analysis of the proof.
[3] To protect the tribunal, paragraph (a) prohibits a lawyer from simultaneously serving as advocate and necessary witness except in those circumstances specified in paragraphs (a)(1) through (a)(3). Paragraph (a)(1) recognizes that if the testimony will be uncontested, the ambiguities in the dual role are purely theoretical. Paragraph (a)(2) recognizes that where the testimony concerns the extent and value of legal services rendered in the action in which the testimony is offered, permitting the lawyers to testify avoids the need for a second trial with new counsel to resolve that issue. Moreover, in such a situation the judge has firsthand knowledge of the matter in issue; hence, there is less dependence on the adversary process to test the credibility of the testimony.
[4] Apart from these two exceptions, paragraph (a)(3) recognizes that a balancing is required between the interests of the client and those of the tribunal and the opposing party. Whether the tribunal is likely to be misled or the opposing party is likely to suffer prejudice depends on the nature of the case, the importance and probable tenor of the lawyer's testimony, and the probability that the lawyer's testimony will conflict with that of other witnesses. Even if there is risk of such prejudice, in determining whether the lawyer should be disqualified, due regard must be given to the effect of disqualification on the lawyer's client. It is relevant that one or both parties could reasonably foresee that the lawyer would probably be a witness. The conflict of interest principles stated in Rules 1.7, 1.9 and 1.10 have no application to this aspect of the problem.
[5] Because the tribunal is not likely to be misled when a lawyer acts as advocate in a trial in which another lawyer in the lawyer's firm will testify as a necessary witness, paragraph (b) permits the lawyer to do so except in situations involving a conflict of interest.
Conflict of Interest
[6] In determining if it is permissible to act as advocate in a trial in which the lawyer will be a necessary witness, the lawyer must also consider that the dual role may give rise to a conflict of interest that will require compliance with Rules 1.7 or 1.9. For example, if there is likely to be substantial conflict between the testimony of the client and that of the lawyer the representation involves a conflict of interest that requires compliance with Rule 1.7. This would be true even though the lawyer might not be prohibited by paragraph (a) from simultaneously serving as advocate and witness because the lawyer's disqualification would work a substantial hardship on the client. Similarly, a lawyer who might be permitted to simultaneously serve as an advocate and a witness by paragraph (a)(3) might be precluded from doing so by Rule 1.9. The problem can arise whether the lawyer is called as a witness on behalf of the client or is called by the opposing party. Determining whether or not such a conflict exists is primarily the responsibility of the lawyer involved. If there is a conflict of interest, the lawyer must secure the client's informed consent, confirmed in writing. In some cases, the lawyer will be precluded from seeking the client's consent. See Rule 1.7. See Rule 1.0(b) for the definition of "confirmed in writing" and Rule 1.0(e) for the definition of "informed consent."
[7] Paragraph (b) provides that a lawyer is not disqualified from serving as an advocate because a lawyer with whom the lawyer is associated in a firm is precluded from doing so by paragraph (a). If, however, the testifying lawyer would also be disqualified by Rule 1.7 or Rule 1.9 from representing the client in the matter, other lawyers in the firm will be precluded from representing the client by Rule 1.10 unless the client gives informed consent under the conditions stated in Rule 1.7.

RULE 3.8:	SPECIAL RESPONSIBILITIES OF A PROSECUTOR
Advocate
The prosecutor in a criminal case shall:
(a) refrain from prosecuting a charge that the prosecutor knows is not supported by probable cause;
(b) make reasonable efforts to assure that the accused has been advised of the right to, and the procedure for obtaining, counsel and has been given reasonable opportunity to obtain counsel;
(c) not seek to obtain from an unrepresented accused a waiver of important pretrial rights, such as the right to a preliminary hearing;
(d) make timely disclosure to the defense of all evidence or information known to the prosecutor that tends to negate the guilt of the accused or mitigates the offense, and, in connection with sentencing, disclose to the defense and to the tribunal all unprivileged mitigating information known to the prosecutor, except when the prosecutor is relieved of this responsibility by a protective order of the tribunal;
(e) not subpoena a lawyer in a grand jury or other criminal proceeding to present evidence about a past or present client unless the prosecutor reasonably believes:
(1) the information sought is not protected from disclosure by any applicable privilege;
(2) the evidence sought is essential to the successful completion of an ongoing investigation or prosecution; and
(3) there is no other feasible alternative to obtain the information;
(f) except for statements that are necessary to inform the public of the nature and extent of the prosecutor's action and that serve a legitimate law enforcement purpose, refrain from making extrajudicial comments that have a substantial likelihood of heightening public condemnation of the accused and exercise reasonable care to prevent investigators, law enforcement personnel, employees or other persons assisting or associated with the prosecutor in a criminal case from making an extrajudicial statement that the prosecutor would be prohibited from making under Rule 3.6 or this Rule.
(g) When a prosecutor knows of new, credible and material evidence creating a reasonable likelihood that a convicted defendant did not commit an offense of which the defendant was convicted, the prosecutor shall:
(1) promptly disclose that evidence to an appropriate court or authority, and
(2) if the conviction was obtained in the prosecutor’s jurisdiction,
(i) promptly disclose that evidence to the defendant unless a court authorizes delay, and
(ii) undertake further investigation, or make reasonable efforts to cause an investigation, to determine whether the defendant was convicted of an offense that the defendant did not commit.
(h) When a prosecutor knows of clear and convincing evidence establishing that a defendant in the prosecutor’s jurisdiction was convicted of an offense that the defendant did not commit, the prosecutor shall seek to remedy the conviction.
COMMENT ON RULE 3.8
[1] A prosecutor has the responsibility of a minister of justice and not simply that of an advocate. This responsibility carries with it specific obligations to see that the defendant is accorded procedural justice, that guilt is decided upon the basis of sufficient evidence, and that special precautions are taken to prevent and to rectify the conviction of innocent persons. The extent of mandated remedial action is a matter of debate and varies in different jurisdictions. Many jurisdictions have adopted the ABA Standards of Criminal Justice Relating to the Prosecution Function, which are the product of prolonged and careful deliberation by lawyers experienced in both criminal prosecution and defense. Competent representation of the sovereignty may require a prosecutor to undertake some procedural and remedial measures as a matter of obligation. Applicable law may require other measures by the prosecutor and knowing disregard of those obligations or a systematic abuse of prosecutorial discretion could constitute a violation of Rule 8.4.
[2] In some jurisdictions, a defendant may waive a preliminary hearing and thereby lose a valuable opportunity to challenge probable cause. Accordingly, prosecutors should not seek to obtain waivers of preliminary hearings or other important pretrial rights from unrepresented accused persons. Paragraph (c) does not apply, however, to an accused appearing pro se with the approval of the tribunal. Nor does it forbid the lawful questioning of an uncharged suspect who has knowingly waived the rights to counsel and silence.
[3] The exception in paragraph (d) recognizes that a prosecutor may seek an appropriate protective order from the tribunal if disclosure of information to the defense could result in substantial harm to an individual or to the public interest.
[4] Paragraph (e) is intended to limit the issuance of lawyer subpoenas in grand jury and other criminal proceedings to those situations in which there is a genuine need to intrude into the client-lawyer relationship.
[5] Paragraph (f) supplements Rule 3.6, which prohibits extrajudicial statements that have a substantial likelihood of prejudicing an adjudicatory proceeding. In the context of a criminal prosecution, a prosecutor's extrajudicial statement can create the additional problem of increasing public condemnation of the accused. Although the announcement of an indictment, for example, will necessarily have severe consequences for the accused, a prosecutor can, and should, avoid comments which have no legitimate law enforcement purpose and have a substantial likelihood of increasing public opprobrium of the accused. Nothing in this Comment is intended to restrict the statements which a prosecutor may make which comply with Rule 3.6(b) or 3.6(c).
[6] Like other lawyers, prosecutors are subject to Rules 5.1 and 5.3, which relate to responsibilities regarding lawyers and nonlawyers who work for or are associated with the lawyer's office. Paragraph (f) reminds the prosecutor of the importance of these obligations in connection with the unique dangers of improper extrajudicial statements in a criminal case. In addition, paragraph (f) requires a prosecutor to exercise reasonable care to prevent persons assisting or associated with the prosecutor from making improper extrajudicial statements, even when such persons are not under the direct supervision of the prosecutor. Ordinarily, the reasonable care standard will be satisfied if the prosecutor issues the appropriate cautions to law- enforcement personnel and other relevant individuals.
[7] When a prosecutor knows of new, credible and material evidence creating a reasonable likelihood that a person outside the prosecutor’s jurisdiction was convicted of a crime that the person did not commit, paragraph (g) requires prompt disclosure to the court or other appropriate authority, such as the chief prosecutor of the jurisdiction where the conviction occurred. If the conviction was obtained in the prosecutor’s jurisdiction, paragraph (g) requires the prosecutor to examine the evidence and undertake further investigation to determine whether the defendant is in fact innocent or make reasonable efforts to cause another appropriate authority to undertake the necessary investigation, and to promptly disclose the evidence to the court and, absent court-authorized delay, to the defendant. Consistent with the objectives of Rules 4.2 and 4.3, disclosure to a represented defendant must be made through the defendant’s counsel, and, in the case of an unrepresented defendant, would ordinarily be accompanied by a request to a court for the appointment of counsel to assist the defendant in taking such legal measures as may be appropriate.
[8] Under paragraph (h), once the prosecutor knows of clear and convincing evidence that the defendant was convicted of an offense that the defendant did not commit, the prosecutor must seek to remedy the conviction. Necessary steps may include disclosure of the evidence to the defendant, requesting that the court appoint counsel for an unrepresented indigent defendant and, where appropriate, notifying the court that the prosecutor has knowledge that the defendant did not commit the offense of which the defendant was convicted.
[9] A prosecutor’s independent judgment, made in good faith, that the new evidence is not of such nature as to trigger the obligations of sections (g) and (h), though subsequently determined to have been erroneous, does not constitute a violation of this Rule.

RULE 3.9:	ADVOCATE IN NONADJUDICATIVE PROCEEDINGS
Advocate
A lawyer representing a client before a legislative body or administrative agency in a nonadjudicative proceeding shall disclose that the appearance is in a representative capacity and shall conform to the provisions of Rules 3.3(a) through (c), 3.4(a) through (c), and 3.5.
COMMENT ON RULE 3.9
[1] In representation before bodies such as legislatures, municipal councils, and executive and administrative agencies acting in a rule-making or policy-making capacity, lawyers present facts, formulate issues and advance argument in the matters under consideration. The decision-making body, like a court, should be able to rely on the integrity of the submissions made to it. A lawyer appearing before such a body must deal with it honestly and in conformity with applicable rules of procedure. See Rules 3.3(a) through (c), 3.4(a) through (c) and 3.5.
[2] Lawyers have no exclusive right to appear before nonadjudicative bodies, as they do before a court. The requirements of this Rule therefore may subject lawyers to regulations inapplicable to advocates who are not lawyers. However, legislatures and administrative agencies have a right to expect lawyers to deal with them as they deal with courts.
[3] This Rule only applies when a lawyer represents a client in connection with an official hearing or meeting of a governmental agency or a legislative body to which the lawyer or the lawyer’s client is presenting evidence or argument. It does not apply to representation of a client in a negotiation or other bilateral transaction with a governmental agency or in connection with an application for a license or other privilege or the client’s compliance with generally applicable reporting requirements, such as the filing of income-tax returns. Nor does it apply to the representation of a client in connection with an investigation or examination of the client’s affairs conducted by government investigators or examiners. Representation in such matters is governed by Rules 4.1 through 4.4.


RULE 4.1:	TRUTHFULNESS IN STATEMENTS TO OTHERS
Transactions With Persons Other Than Clients
In the course of representing a client a lawyer shall not knowingly:
(a) make a false statement of material fact or law to a third person; or
(b) fail to disclose a material fact to a third person when disclosure is necessary to avoid assisting a criminal or fraudulent act by a client, unless disclosure is prohibited by Rule 1.6.
COMMENT ON RULE 4.1
Misrepresentation
[1] A lawyer is required to be truthful when dealing with others on a client’s behalf, but generally has no affirmative duty to inform an opposing party of relevant facts. A misrepresentation can occur if the lawyer incorporates or affirms a statement of another person that the lawyer knows is false. Misrepresentations can also occur by partially true but misleading statements or omissions that are the equivalent of affirmative false statements. For dishonest conduct that does not amount to a false statement or for misrepresentations by a lawyer other than in the course of representing a client, see Rule 8.4.
Statements of Fact
[2] This Rule refers to statements of fact. Whether a particular statement should be regarded as one of fact can depend on the circumstances. Under generally accepted conventions in negotiation, certain types of statements ordinarily are not taken as statements of material fact. Estimates of price or value placed on the subject of a transaction and a party’s intentions as to an acceptable settlement of a claim are ordinarily in this category, and so is the existence of an undisclosed principal except where nondisclosure of the principal would constitute fraud. Lawyers should be mindful of their obligations under applicable law to avoid criminal and tortious misrepresentation.
Crime or Fraud by Client
[3] Under Rule 1.2(d), a lawyer is prohibited from counseling or assisting a client in conduct that the lawyer knows is criminal or fraudulent. Paragraph (b) states a specific application of the principle set forth in Rule 1.2(d) and addresses the situation where a client’s crime or fraud takes the form of a lie or misrepresentation. Ordinarily, a lawyer can avoid assisting a client’s crime or fraud by withdrawing from the representation. Sometimes it may be necessary for the lawyer to give notice of the fact of withdrawal and to disaffirm an opinion, document, affirmation or the like. In extreme cases, substantive law may require a lawyer to disclose information relating to the representation to avoid being deemed to have assisted the client’s crime or fraud. If the lawyer can avoid assisting a client’s crime or fraud only by disclosing this information, then under paragraph (b) the lawyer is required to do so, unless the disclosure is prohibited by Rule 1.6.

RULE 4.2:	COMMUNICATION WITH PERSON REPRESENTED BY COUNSEL
Transactions With Persons Other Than Clients
In representing a client, a lawyer shall not communicate about the subject of the representation with a person the lawyer knows to be represented by another lawyer in the matter, unless the lawyer has the consent of the other lawyer or is authorized to do so by law or a court order.
COMMENT ON RULE 4.2
[1] This Rule contributes to the proper functioning of the legal system by protecting a person who has chosen to be represented by a lawyer in a matter against possible overreaching by other lawyers who are participating in the matter, interference by those lawyers with the client-lawyer relationship and the uncounseled disclosure of information relating to the representation.
[2] This Rule applies to communications with any person who is represented by counsel concerning the matter to which the communication relates.
[3] The Rule applies even though the represented person initiates or consents to the communication. A lawyer must immediately terminate communication with a person if, after commencing communication, the lawyer learns that the person is one with whom communication is not permitted by this Rule.
[4] This Rule does not prohibit communication with a represented person, or an employee or agent of such a person, concerning matters outside the representation. For example, the existence of a controversy between a government agency and a private party, or between two organizations, does not prohibit a lawyer for either from communicating with nonlawyer representatives of the other regarding a separate matter. Nor does this Rule preclude communication with a represented person who is seeking advice from a lawyer who is not otherwise representing a client in the matter. A lawyer may not make a communication prohibited by this Rule through the acts of another. See Rule 8.4(a). Parties to a matter may communicate directly with each other, and a lawyer is not prohibited from advising a client concerning a communication that the client is legally entitled to make. Also, a lawyer having independent justification or legal authorization for communicating with a represented person is permitted to do so.
[5] Communications authorized by law may include communications by a lawyer on behalf of a client who is exercising a constitutional or other legal right to communicate with the government. Communications authorized by law may also include investigative activities of lawyers representing governmental entities, directly or through investigative agents, prior to the commencement of criminal or civil enforcement proceedings. When communicating with the accused in a criminal matter, a government lawyer must comply with this Rule in addition to honoring the constitutional rights of the accused. The fact that a communication does not violate a state or federal constitutional right is insufficient to establish that the communication is permissible under this Rule.
[6] A lawyer who is uncertain whether a communication with a represented person is permissible may seek a court order. A lawyer may also seek a court order in exceptional circumstances to authorize a communication that would otherwise be prohibited by this Rule, for example, where communication with a person represented by counsel is necessary to avoid reasonably certain injury.
[7] In the case of a represented organization, this Rule prohibits communications with a constituent of the organization who supervises, directs or regularly consults with the organization’s lawyer concerning the matter or has authority to obligate the organization with respect to the matter or whose act or omission in connection with the matter may be imputed to the organization for purposes of civil or criminal liability. Consent of the organization’s lawyer is not required for communication with a former constituent. If a constituent of the organization is represented in the matter by his or her own counsel, the consent by that counsel to a communication will be sufficient for purposes of this Rule. Compare Rule 3.4(f). In communicating with a current or former constituent of an organization, a lawyer must not use methods of obtaining evidence that violate the legal rights of the organization. See Rule 4.4.
[8] The prohibition on communications with a represented person only applies in circumstances where the lawyer knows that the person is in fact represented in the matter to be discussed. This means that the lawyer has actual knowledge of the fact of the representation; but such actual knowledge may be inferred from the circumstances. See Rule 1.0(f). Thus, the lawyer cannot evade the requirement of obtaining the consent of counsel by closing eyes to the obvious.
[9] In the event the person with whom the lawyer communicates is not known to be represented by counsel in the matter, the lawyer's communications are subject to Rule 4.3.

RULE 4.3:	DEALING WITH UNREPRESENTED PERSON
Transactions With Persons Other Than Clients
In dealing on behalf of a client with a person who is not represented by counsel, a lawyer shall not state or imply that the lawyer is disinterested. When the lawyer knows or reasonably should know that the unrepresented person misunderstands the lawyer’s role in the matter, the lawyer shall make reasonable efforts to correct the misunderstanding. The lawyer shall not give legal advice to an unrepresented person, other than the advice to secure counsel, if the lawyer knows or reasonably should know that the interests of such a person are or have a reasonable possibility of being in conflict with the interests of the client.
COMMENT ON RULE 4.3
[1] An unrepresented person, particularly one not experienced in dealing with legal matters, might assume that a lawyer is disinterested in loyalties or is a disinterested authority on the law even when the lawyer represents a client. In order to avoid a misunderstanding, a lawyer will typically need to identify the lawyer’s client and, where necessary, explain that the client has interests opposed to those of the unrepresented person. For misunderstandings that sometimes arise when a lawyer for an organization deals with an unrepresented constituent, see Rule 1.13(f).
[2] The Rule distinguishes between situations involving unrepresented persons whose interests may be adverse to those of the lawyer’s client and those in which the person’s interests are not in conflict with the client’s. In the former situation, the possibility that the lawyer will compromise the unrepresented person’s interests is so great that the Rule prohibits the giving of any advice, apart from the advice to obtain counsel. Whether a lawyer is giving impermissible advice may depend on the experience and sophistication of the unrepresented person, as well as the setting in which the behavior and comments occur. This Rule does not prohibit a lawyer from negotiating the terms of a transaction or settling a dispute with an unrepresented person. So long as the lawyer has explained that the lawyer represents an adverse party and is not representing the person, the lawyer may inform the person of the terms on which the lawyer's client will enter into an agreement or settle a matter, prepare documents that require the person's signature and explain the lawyer's own view of the meaning of the document or the lawyer's view of the underlying legal obligations.


RULE 4.4:	RESPECT FOR RIGHTS OF THIRD PERSONS
Transactions With Persons Other Than Clients
(a)  In representing a client, a lawyer shall not use means that have no substantial purpose other than to embarrass, delay, or burden a third person, or use methods of obtaining evidence that violate the legal rights of such a person.
(b)  A lawyer who receives a document or electronically stored information relating to the representation of the lawyer's client and knows or reasonably should know that the document or electronically stored information was inadvertently sent shall promptly notify the sender.
COMMENT ON RULE 4.4
[1]  Responsibility to a client requires a lawyer to subordinate the interests of others to those of the client, but that responsibility does not imply that a lawyer may disregard the rights of third persons. It is impractical to catalogue all such rights, but they include legal restrictions on methods of obtaining evidence from third persons and unwarranted intrusions into privileged relationships, such as the client-lawyer relationship.
[2]  Paragraph (b) recognizes that lawyers sometimes receive a document or electronically stored information that was mistakenly sent or produced by opposing parties or their lawyers.  A document or electronically stored information is inadvertently sent when it is accidentally transmitted, such as when an email or letter is misaddressed or a document or electronically stored information is accidentally included with information that was intentionally transmitted.  If a lawyer knows or reasonably should know that such a document or electronically stored information was sent inadvertently, then this Rule requires the lawyer to promptly notify the sender in order to permit that person to take protective measures. Whether the lawyer is required to take additional steps, such as returning the document or electronically stored information, is a matter of law beyond the scope of these Rules, as is the question of whether the privileged status of a document or electronically stored information has been waived. Similarly, this Rule does not address the legal duties of a lawyer who receives a document or electronically stored information that the lawyer knows or reasonably should know may have been inappropriately obtained by the sending person. For purposes of this Rule, ‘‘document or electronically stored information’’ includes, in addition to paper documents, email and other forms of electronically stored information, including embedded data (commonly referred to as “metadata”), that is subject to being read or put into readable form.  Metadata in electronic documents creates an obligation under this Rule only if the receiving lawyer knows or reasonably should know that the metadata was inadvertently sent to the receiving lawyer.
[3]  Some lawyers may choose to return a document or delete electronically stored information unread, for example, when the lawyer learns before receiving it that it was inadvertently sent. Where a lawyer is not required by applicable law to do so, the decision to voluntarily return such a document or delete electronically stored information is a matter of professional judgment ordinarily reserved to the lawyer. See Rules 1.2 and 1.4.

RULE 5.1:	RESPONSIBILITIES OF A PARTNER OR SUPERVISORY LAWYER
Law Firms And Associations
(a) A partner in a law firm, and a lawyer who individually or together with other lawyers possesses comparable managerial authority in a law firm, shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that the firm has in effect measures giving reasonable assurance that all lawyers in the firm conform to the Rules of Professional Conduct.
(b) A lawyer having direct supervisory authority over another lawyer shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that the other lawyer conforms to the Rules of Professional Conduct.
(c) A lawyer shall be responsible for another lawyer's violation of the Rules of Professional Conduct if:
(1) the lawyer orders or, with knowledge of the specific conduct, ratifies the conduct involved; or
(2) the lawyer is a partner or has comparable managerial authority in the law firm in which the other lawyer practices, or has direct supervisory authority over the other lawyer, and knows of the conduct at a time when its consequences can be avoided or mitigated but fails to take reasonable remedial action.
COMMENT ON RULE 5.1
[1] Paragraph (a) applies to lawyers who have managerial authority over the professional work of a firm. See Rule 1.0(c). This includes members of a partnership, the shareholders in a law firm organized as a professional corporation, and members of other associations authorized to practice law; lawyers having comparable managerial authority in a legal services organization or a law department of an enterprise or government agency; and lawyers who have intermediate managerial responsibilities in a firm. Paragraph (b) applies to lawyers who have supervisory authority over the work of other lawyers in a firm.
[2] Paragraph (a) requires lawyers with managerial authority within a firm to make reasonable efforts to establish internal policies and procedures designed to provide reasonable assurance that all lawyers in the firm will conform to the Rules of Professional Conduct. Such policies and procedures include those designed to detect and resolve conflicts of interest, identify dates by which actions must be taken in pending matters, account for client funds and property and ensure that inexperienced lawyers are properly supervised.
[3] Other measures that may be required to fulfill the responsibility prescribed in paragraph (a) can depend on the firm's structure and the nature of its practice. In a small firm of experienced lawyers, informal supervision and periodic review of compliance with the required systems ordinarily will suffice. In a large firm, or in practice situations in which difficult ethical problems frequently arise, more elaborate measures may be necessary. Some firms, for example, have a procedure whereby junior lawyers can make confidential referral of ethical problems directly to a designated senior partner or special committee. See Rule 5.2. Firms, whether large or small, may also rely on continuing legal education in professional ethics. In any event, the ethical atmosphere of a firm can influence the conduct of all its members and the partners may not assume that all lawyers associated with the firm will inevitably conform to the Rules.
[4] Paragraph (c) expresses a general principle of personal responsibility for acts of another. See also Rule 8.4(a).
[5] Paragraph (c)(2) defines the duty of a partner or other lawyer having comparable managerial authority in a law firm, as well as a lawyer who has direct supervisory authority over performance of specific legal work by another lawyer. Whether a lawyer has supervisory authority in particular circumstances is a question of fact. Partners and lawyers with comparable authority have at least indirect responsibility for all work being done by the firm, while a partner or manager in charge of a particular matter ordinarily also has supervisory responsibility for the work of other firm lawyers engaged in the matter. Appropriate remedial action by a partner or managing lawyer would depend on the immediacy of that lawyer's involvement and the seriousness of the misconduct. A supervisor is required to intervene to prevent avoidable consequences of misconduct if the supervisor knows that the misconduct occurred. Thus, if a supervising lawyer knows that a subordinate misrepresented a matter to an opposing party in negotiation, the supervisor as well as the subordinate has a duty to correct the resulting misapprehension.
[6] Professional misconduct by a lawyer under supervision could reveal a violation of paragraph (b) on the part of the supervisory lawyer even though it does not entail a violation of paragraph (c) because there was no direction, ratification or knowledge of the violation.
[7] Apart from this Rule and Rule 8.4(a), a lawyer does not have disciplinary liability for the conduct of a partner, associate or subordinate. Whether a lawyer may be liable civilly or criminally for another lawyer's conduct is a question of law beyond the scope of these Rules.
[8] The duties imposed by this Rule on managing and supervising lawyers do not alter the personal duty of each lawyer in a firm to abide by the Rules of Professional Conduct. See Rule 5.2(a).

RULE 5.2:	RESPONSIBILITIES OF A SUBORDINATE LAWYER
Law Firms And Associations
(a) A lawyer is bound by the Rules of Professional Conduct notwithstanding that the lawyer acted at the direction of another person.
(b) A subordinate lawyer does not violate the Rules of Professional Conduct if that lawyer acts in accordance with a supervisory lawyer's reasonable resolution of an arguable question of professional duty.
COMMENT ON RULE 5.2
[1] Although a lawyer is not relieved of responsibility for a violation by the fact that the lawyer acted at the direction of a supervisor, that fact may be relevant in determining whether a lawyer had the knowledge required to render conduct a violation of the Rules. For example, if a subordinate filed a frivolous pleading at the direction of a supervisor, the subordinate would not be guilty of a professional violation unless the subordinate knew of the document's frivolous character.
[2] When lawyers in a supervisor-subordinate relationship encounter a matter involving professional judgment as to ethical duty, the supervisor may assume responsibility for making the judgment. Otherwise a consistent course of action or position could not be taken. If the question can reasonably be answered only one way, the duty of both lawyers is clear and they are equally responsible for fulfilling it. However, if the question is reasonably arguable, someone has to decide upon the course of action. That authority ordinarily reposes in the supervisor, and a subordinate may be guided accordingly. For example, if a question arises whether the interests of two clients conflict under Rule 1.7, the supervisor's reasonable resolution of the question should protect the subordinate professionally if the resolution is subsequently challenged.

RULE 5.3:	RESPONSIBILITIES REGARDING NONLAWYER ASSISTANT
Law Firms And Associations
With respect to a nonlawyer employed or retained by or associated with a lawyer:
(a) a partner, and a lawyer who individually or together with other lawyers possesses comparable managerial authority in a law firm shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that the firm has in effect measures giving reasonable assurance that the person's conduct is compatible with the professional obligations of the lawyer;
(b) a lawyer having direct supervisory authority over the nonlawyer shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that the person's conduct is compatible with the professional obligations of the lawyer; and
(c) a lawyer shall be responsible for conduct of such a person that would be a violation of the Rules of Professional Conduct if engaged in by a lawyer if:
(1) the lawyer orders or, with the knowledge of the specific conduct, ratifies the conduct involved; or
(2) the lawyer is a partner or has comparable managerial authority in the law firm in which the person is employed, or has direct supervisory authority over the person, and knows of the conduct at a time when its consequences can be avoided or mitigated but fails to take reasonable remedial action.
COMMENT ON RULE 5.3
[1]  Paragraph (a) requires lawyers with managerial authority within a law firm to make reasonable efforts to ensure that the firm has in effect measures giving reasonable assurance that nonlawyers in the firm and nonlawyers outside the firm who work on firm matters act in a way compatible with the professional obligations of the lawyer. See Comment [6] to Rule 1.1 (retaining lawyers outside the firm) and Comment [1] to Rule 5.1 (responsibilities with respect to lawyers within a firm).  Paragraph (b) applies to lawyers who have supervisory authority over such nonlawyers within or outside the firm. Paragraph (c) specifies the circumstances in which a lawyer is responsible for the conduct of such nonlawyers within or outside the firm that would be a violation of the Rules of Professional Conduct if engaged in by a lawyer.
Nonlawyers Within the Firm
[2]  Lawyers generally employ assistants in their practice, including secretaries, investigators, law student interns, and paraprofessionals. Such assistants, whether employees or independent contractors, act for the lawyer in rendition of the lawyer's professional services. A lawyer must give such assistants appropriate instruction and supervision concerning the ethical aspects of their employment, particularly regarding the obligation not to disclose information relating to representation of the client, and should be responsible for their work product. The measures employed in supervising nonlawyers should take account of the fact that they do not have legal training and are not subject to professional discipline.
Nonlawyers Outside the Firm
[3]  A lawyer may use nonlawyers outside the firm to assist the lawyer in rendering legal services to the client.  Examples include the retention of an investigative or paraprofessional service, hiring a document management company to create and maintain a database for complex litigation, sending client documents to a third party for printing or scanning, and using an Internet-based service to store client information.  When using such services outside the firm, a lawyer must make reasonable efforts to ensure that the services are provided in a manner that is compatible with the lawyer’s professional obligations.  The extent of this obligation will depend upon the circumstances, including the education, experience and reputation of the nonlawyer; the nature of the services involved; the terms of any arrangements concerning the protection of client information; and the legal and ethical environments of the jurisdictions in which the services will be performed, particularly with regard to confidentiality. See also Rules 1.1 (competence), 1.2 (allocation of authority), 1.4 (communication with client), 1.6 (confidentiality), 5.4(a) (professional independence of the lawyer), and 5.5(a) (unauthorized practice of law).  When retaining or directing a nonlawyer outside the firm, a lawyer should communicate directions appropriate under the circumstances to give reasonable assurance that the nonlawyer's conduct is compatible with the professional obligations of the lawyer.
[4]  Where the client directs the selection of a particular nonlawyer service provider outside the firm, the lawyer ordinarily should agree with the client concerning the allocation of responsibility for monitoring as between the client and the lawyer.  See Rule 1.2.  When making such an allocation in a matter pending before a tribunal, lawyers and parties may have additional obligations that are a matter of law beyond the scope of these Rules.

RULE 5.4:	PROFESSIONAL INDEPENDENCE OF A LAWYER
Law Firms And Associations
(a) A lawyer or law firm shall not share legal fees with a nonlawyer, except that:
(1) an agreement by a lawyer with the lawyer's firm, partner, or associate may provide for the payment of money, over a reasonable period of time after the lawyer's death, to the lawyer's estate or to one or more specified persons;
(2) a lawyer who purchases the practice of a deceased, disabled, or disappeared lawyer may, pursuant to the provisions of Rule 1.17, pay to the estate or other representative of that lawyer the agreed-upon purchase price;
(3) a lawyer or law firm may include nonlawyer employees in a compensation or retirement plan, even though the plan is based in whole or in part on a profit-sharing arrangement; and
(4) a lawyer may share court-awarded legal fees with a nonprofit organization that employed, retained or recommended employment of the lawyer in the matter.
(b) A lawyer shall not form a partnership with a nonlawyer if any of the activities of the partnership consist of the practice of law.
(c) A lawyer shall not permit a person who recommends, employs, or pays the lawyer to render legal services for another to direct or regulate the lawyer's professional judgment in rendering such legal services.
(d) A lawyer shall not practice with or in the form of a professional corporation or association authorized to practice law for a profit, if:
(1) a nonlawyer owns any interest therein, except that a fiduciary representative of the estate of a lawyer may hold the stock or interest of the lawyer for a reasonable time during administration;
(2) a nonlawyer is a corporate director or officer thereof or occupies the position of similar responsibility in any form of association other than a corporation ; or
(3) a nonlawyer has the right to direct or control the professional judgment of a lawyer.
COMMENT ON RULE 5.4
[1] The provisions of this Rule express traditional limitations on sharing fees. These limitations are to protect the lawyer's professional independence of judgment. Where someone other than the client pays the lawyer's fee or salary, or recommends employment of the lawyer, that arrangement does not modify the lawyer's obligation to the client. As stated in paragraph (c), such arrangements should not interfere with the lawyer's professional judgment.
[2] This Rule also expresses traditional limitations on permitting a third party to direct or regulate the lawyer's professional judgment in rendering legal services to another. See also Rule 1.8(f) (lawyer may accept compensation from a third party as long as there is no interference with the lawyer's independent professional judgment and the client gives informed consent).

RULE 5.5:	UNAUTHORIZED PRACTICE OF LAW; MULTIJURISDICTIONAL
PRACTICE OF LAW
Law Firms And Associations
(a) A lawyer shall not practice law in a jurisdiction in violation of the regulation of the legal profession in that jurisdiction, or assist another in doing so.
(b) A lawyer who is not admitted to practice in this jurisdiction shall not:
(1) except as authorized by these Rules or other law, establish an office or other systematic and continuous presence in this jurisdiction for the practice of law; or
(2) hold out to the public or otherwise represent that the lawyer is admitted to practice law in this jurisdiction.
(c) A lawyer admitted in another United States jurisdiction, and not disbarred or suspended from practice in any jurisdiction, may provide legal services on a temporary basis in this jurisdiction that:
(1) are undertaken in association with a lawyer who is admitted to practice in this jurisdiction and who actively participates in the matter;
(2) are in or reasonably related to a pending or potential proceeding before a tribunal in this or another jurisdiction, if the lawyer, or a person the lawyer is assisting, is authorized by law or order to appear in such proceeding or reasonably expects to be so authorized;
(3) are in or reasonably related to a pending or potential arbitration, mediation, or other alternative resolution proceeding in this or another jurisdiction, if the services arise out of or are reasonably related to the lawyer's practice in a jurisdiction in which the lawyer is admitted to practice and are not services for which the forum requires pro hac vice admission; or
(4) are not within paragraphs (c) (2) or (c)(3) and arise out of or are reasonably related to the lawyer's practice in a jurisdiction in which the lawyer is admitted to practice.
(d) A lawyer admitted in another United States jurisdiction or in a foreign jurisdiction, and not disbarred or suspended from practice in any jurisdiction or the equivalent thereof, or a person otherwise lawfully practicing as an in-house counsel under the laws of a foreign jurisdiction, may provide legal services through an office or other systematic and continuous presence in this jurisdiction that:
(1) are provided to the lawyer's employer or its organizational affiliates, are not services for which the forum requires pro hac vice admission; and when performed by a foreign lawyer and requires advice on the law of this or another U.S. jurisdiction or of the United States, such advice shall be based upon the advice of a lawyer who is duly licensed and authorized by the jurisdiction to provide such advice; or
(2) are services that the lawyer is authorized by federal or other law or rule to provide in this jurisdiction.
(e) For purposes of paragraph (d):
(1) the foreign lawyer must be a member in good standing of a recognized legal profession in a foreign jurisdiction, the members of which are admitted to practice as lawyers or counselors at law or the equivalent, and subject to effective regulation and discipline by a duly constituted professional body or a public authority; or,
(2) the person otherwise lawfully practicing as an in-house counsel under the laws of a foreign jurisdiction must be authorized to practice under this Rule by, in the exercise of its discretion, [the highest court of this jurisdiction].

COMMENT ON RULE 5.5
[1] A lawyer may practice law only in a jurisdiction in which the lawyer is authorized to practice. A lawyer may be admitted to practice law in a jurisdiction on a regular basis or may be authorized by court rule or order or by law to practice for a limited purpose or on a restricted basis. Paragraph (a) applies to unauthorized practice of law by a lawyer, whether through the lawyer’s direct action or by the lawyer assisting another person. For example, a lawyer may not assist a person in practicing law in violation of the rules governing professional conduct in that person’s jurisdiction.
[2] The definition of the practice of law is established by law and varies from one jurisdiction to another. Whatever the definition, limiting the practice of law to members of the bar protects the public against rendition of legal services by unqualified persons. This Rule does not prohibit a lawyer from employing the services of paraprofessionals and delegating functions to them, so long as the lawyer supervises the delegated work and retains responsibility for their work. See Rule 5.3.
[3] A lawyer may provide professional advice and instruction to nonlawyers whose employment requires knowledge of the law; for example, claims adjusters, employees of financial or commercial institutions, social workers, accountants and persons employed in government agencies. Lawyers also may assist independent nonlawyers, such as paraprofessionals, who are authorized by the law of a jurisdiction to provide particular law-related services. In addition, a lawyer may counsel nonlawyers who wish to proceed pro se.
[4] Other than as authorized by law or this Rule, a lawyer who is not admitted to practice generally in this jurisdiction violates paragraph (b)(1) if the lawyer establishes an office or other systematic and continuous presence in this jurisdiction for the practice of law. Presence may be systematic and continuous even if the lawyer is not physically present here. Such a lawyer must not hold out to the public or otherwise represent that the lawyer is admitted to practice law in this jurisdiction. See also Rule 7.1.
[5] There are occasions in which a lawyer admitted to practice in another United States jurisdiction, and not disbarred or suspended from practice in any jurisdiction, may provide legal services on a temporary basis in this jurisdiction under circumstances that do not create an unreasonable risk to the interests of their clients, the public or the courts. Paragraph (c) identifies four such circumstances. The fact that conduct is not so identified does not imply that the conduct is or is not authorized. With the exception of paragraphs (d)(1) and (d)(2), this Rule does not authorize a U.S. or foreign lawyer to establish an office or other systematic and continuous presence in this jurisdiction without being admitted to practice generally here.
[6] There is no single test to determine whether a lawyer’s services are provided on a “temporary basis” in this jurisdiction, and may therefore be permissible under paragraph (c). Services may be “temporary” even though the lawyer provides services in this jurisdiction on a recurring basis, or for an extended period of time, as when the lawyer is representing a client in a single lengthy negotiation or litigation.
[7] Paragraphs (c) and (d) apply to lawyers who are admitted to practice law in any United States jurisdiction, which includes the District of Columbia and any state, territory or commonwealth of the United States. Paragraph (d) also applies to lawyers admitted in a foreign jurisdiction. The word “admitted” in paragraphs (c), (d) and (e) contemplates that the lawyer is authorized to practice in the jurisdiction in which the lawyer is admitted and excludes a lawyer who while technically admitted is not authorized to practice, because, for example, the lawyer is on inactive status.
[8] Paragraph (c)(1) recognizes that the interests of clients and the public are protected if a lawyer admitted only in another jurisdiction associates with a lawyer licensed to practice in this jurisdiction. For this paragraph to apply, however, the lawyer admitted to practice in this jurisdiction must actively participate in and share responsibility for the representation of the client.
[9] Lawyers not admitted to practice generally in a jurisdiction may be authorized by law or order of a tribunal or an administrative agency to appear before the tribunal or agency. This authority may be granted pursuant to formal rules governing admission pro hac vice or pursuant to informal practice of the tribunal or agency. Under paragraph (c)(2), a lawyer does not violate this Rule when the lawyer appears before a tribunal or agency pursuant to such authority. To the extent that a court rule or other law of this jurisdiction requires a lawyer who is not admitted to practice in this jurisdiction to obtain admission pro hac vice before appearing before a tribunal or administrative agency, this Rule requires the lawyer to obtain that authority.
[10] Paragraph (c)(2) also provides that a lawyer rendering services in this jurisdiction on a temporary basis does not violate this Rule when the lawyer engages in conduct in anticipation of a proceeding or hearing in a jurisdiction in which the lawyer is authorized to practice law or in which the lawyer reasonably expects to be admitted pro hac vice. Examples of such conduct include meetings with the client, interviews of potential witnesses, and the review of documents. Similarly, a lawyer admitted only in another jurisdiction may engage in conduct temporarily in this jurisdiction in connection with pending litigation in another jurisdiction in which the lawyer is or reasonably expects to be authorized to appear, including taking depositions in this jurisdiction.
[11] When a lawyer has been or reasonably expects to be admitted to appear before a court or administrative agency, paragraph (c)(2) also permits conduct by lawyers who are associated with that lawyer in the matter, but who do not expect to appear before the court or administrative agency. For example, subordinate lawyers may conduct research, review documents, and attend meetings with witnesses in support of the lawyer responsible for the litigation.
[12] Paragraph (c)(3) permits a lawyer admitted to practice law in another jurisdiction to perform services on a temporary basis in this jurisdiction if those services are in or reasonably related to a pending or potential arbitration, mediation, or other alternative dispute resolution proceeding in this or another jurisdiction, if the services arise out of or are reasonably related to the lawyer’s practice in a jurisdiction in which the lawyer is admitted to practice. The lawyer, however, must obtain admission pro hac vice in the case of a court-annexed arbitration or mediation or otherwise if court rules or law so require.
[13] Paragraph (c)(4) permits a lawyer admitted in another jurisdiction to provide certain legal services on a temporary basis in this jurisdiction that arise out of or are reasonably related to the lawyer’s practice in a jurisdiction in which the lawyer is admitted but are not within paragraphs (c)(2) or (c)(3). These services include both legal services and services that nonlawyers may perform but that are considered the practice of law when performed by lawyers.
[14] Paragraphs (c)(3) and (c)(4) require that the services arise out of or be reasonably related to the lawyer’s practice in a jurisdiction in which the lawyer is admitted. A variety of factors evidence such a relationship. The lawyer’s client may have been previously represented by the lawyer, or may be resident in or have substantial contacts with the jurisdiction in which the lawyer is admitted. The matter, although involving other jurisdictions, may have a significant connection with that jurisdiction. In other cases, significant aspects of the lawyer’s work might be conducted in that jurisdiction or a significant aspect of the matter may involve the law of that jurisdiction. The necessary relationship might arise when the client’s activities or the legal issues involve multiple jurisdictions, such as when the officers of a multinational corporation survey potential business sites and seek the services of their lawyer in assessing the relative merits of each. In addition, the services may draw on the lawyer’s recognized expertise developed through the regular practice of law on behalf of clients in matters involving a particular body of federal, nationally-uniform, foreign, or international law. Lawyers desiring to provide pro bono legal services on a temporary basis in a jurisdiction that has been affected by a major disaster, but in which they are not otherwise authorized to practice law, as well as lawyers from the affected jurisdiction who seek to practice law temporarily in another jurisdiction, but in which they are not otherwise authorized to practice law, should consult the [Model Court Rule on Provision of Legal Services Following Determination of Major Disaster].
[15] Paragraph (d) identifies two circumstances in which a lawyer who is admitted to practice in another United States or a foreign jurisdiction, and is not disbarred or suspended from practice in any jurisdiction, or the equivalent thereof, may establish an office or other systematic and continuous presence in this jurisdiction for the practice of law. Pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Rule, a lawyer admitted in any U.S. jurisdiction may also provide legal services in this jurisdiction on a temporary basis. See also Model Rule on Temporary Practice by Foreign Lawyers. Except as provided in paragraphs (d)(1) and (d)(2), a lawyer who is admitted to practice law in another United States or foreign jurisdiction and who establishes an office or other systematic or continuous presence in this jurisdiction must become admitted to practice law generally in this jurisdiction.
[16] Paragraph (d)(1) applies to a U.S. or foreign lawyer who is employed by a client to provide legal services to the client or its organizational affiliates, i.e., entities that control, are controlled by, or are under common control with the employer. This paragraph does not authorize the provision of personal legal services to the employer’s officers or employees. The paragraph applies to in-house corporate lawyers, government lawyers and others who are employed to render legal services to the employer. The lawyer’s ability to represent the employer outside the jurisdiction in which the lawyer is licensed generally serves the interests of the employer and does not create an unreasonable risk to the client and others because the employer is well situated to assess the lawyer’s qualifications and the quality of the lawyer’s work. To further decrease any risk to the client, when advising on the domestic law of a United States jurisdiction or on the law of the United States, the foreign lawyer authorized to practice under paragraph (d)(1) of this Rule needs to base that advice on the advice of a lawyer licensed and authorized by the jurisdiction to provide it.
[17] If an employed lawyer establishes an office or other systematic presence in this jurisdiction for the purpose of rendering legal services to the employer, the lawyer may be subject to registration or other requirements, including assessments for client protection funds and mandatory continuing legal education. See Model Rule for Registration of In-House Counsel.
[18] Paragraph (d)(2) recognizes that a U.S. or foreign lawyer may provide legal services in a jurisdiction in which the lawyer is not licensed when authorized to do so by federal or other law, which includes statute, court rule, executive regulation or judicial precedent. See, e.g., Model Rule on Practice Pending Admission.
[19] A lawyer who practices law in this jurisdiction pursuant to paragraphs (c) or (d) or otherwise is subject to the disciplinary authority of this jurisdiction. See Rule 8.5(a).
[20] In some circumstances, a lawyer who practices law in this jurisdiction pursuant to paragraphs (c) or (d) may have to inform the client that the lawyer is not licensed to practice law in this jurisdiction. For example, that may be required when the representation occurs primarily in this jurisdiction and requires knowledge of the law of this jurisdiction. See Rule 1.4(b).
[21] Paragraphs (c) and (d) do not authorize communications advertising legal services in this jurisdiction by lawyers who are admitted to practice in other jurisdictions. Whether and how lawyers may communicate the availability of their services in this jurisdiction is governed by Rules 7.1 to 7.3.

RULE 5.6:	RESTRICTIONS ON RIGHTS TO PRACTICE
Law Firms And Associations
A lawyer shall not participate in offering or making:
(a) a partnership, shareholders, operating, employment, or other similar type of agreement that restricts the right of a lawyer to practice after termination of the relationship, except an agreement concerning benefits upon retirement; or
(b) an agreement in which a restriction on the lawyer's right to practice is part of the settlement of a client controversy.
COMMENT ON RULE 5.6
[1] An agreement restricting the right of lawyers to practice after leaving a firm not only limits their professional autonomy but also limits the freedom of clients to choose a lawyer. Paragraph (a) prohibits such agreements except for restrictions incident to provisions concerning retirement benefits for service with the firm.
[2] Paragraph (b) prohibits a lawyer from agreeing not to represent other persons in connection with settling a claim on behalf of a client.
[3] This Rule does not apply to prohibit restrictions that may be included in the terms of the sale of a law practice pursuant to Rule 1.17.

RULE 5.7:	RESPONSIBILITIES REGARDING LAW-RELATED SERVICES
Law Firms And Associations
(a) A lawyer shall be subject to the Rules of Professional Conduct with respect to the provision of law-related services, as defined in paragraph (b), if the law-related services are provided:
(1) by the lawyer in circumstances that are not distinct from the lawyer's provision of legal services to clients; or
(2) in other circumstances by an entity controlled by the lawyer individually or with others if the lawyer fails to take reasonable measures to assure that a person obtaining the law-related services knows that the services are not legal services and that the protections of the client-lawyer relationship do not exist.
(b) The term "law-related services" denotes services that might reasonably be performed in conjunction with and in substance are related to the provision of legal services, and that are not prohibited as unauthorized practice of law when provided by a nonlawyer.
COMMENT ON RULE 5.7
[1] When a lawyer performs law-related services or controls an organization that does so, there exists the potential for ethical problems. Principal among these is the possibility that the person for whom the law-related services are performed fails to understand that the services may not carry with them the protections normally afforded as part of the client-lawyer relationship. The recipient of the law-related services may expect, for example, that the protection of client confidences, prohibitions against representation of persons with conflicting interests, and obligations of a lawyer to maintain professional independence apply to the provision of law-related services when that may not be the case.
[2] Rule 5.7 applies to the provision of law-related services by a lawyer even when the lawyer does not provide any legal services to the person for whom the law-related services are performed and whether the law-related services are performed through a law firm or a separate entity. The Rule identifies the circumstances in which all of the Rules of Professional Conduct apply to the provision of law-related services. Even when those circumstances do not exist, however, the conduct of a lawyer involved in the provision of law-related services is subject to those Rules that apply generally to lawyer conduct, regardless of whether the conduct involves the provision of legal services. See, e.g., Rule 8.4.
[3] When law-related services are provided by a lawyer under circumstances that are not distinct from the lawyer's provision of legal services to clients, the lawyer in providing the law-related services must adhere to the requirements of the Rules of Professional Conduct as provided in paragraph (a)(1). Even when the law-related and legal services are provided in circumstances that are distinct from each other, for example through separate entities or different support staff within the law firm, the Rules of Professional Conduct apply to the lawyer as provided in paragraph (a)(2) unless the lawyer takes reasonable measures to assure that the recipient of the law-related services knows that the services are not legal services and that the protections of the client-lawyer relationship do not apply.
[4] Law-related services also may be provided through an entity that is distinct from that through which the lawyer provides legal services. If the lawyer individually or with others has control of such an entity's operations, the Rule requires the lawyer to take reasonable measures to assure that each person using the services of the entity knows that the services provided by the entity are not legal services and that the Rules of Professional Conduct that relate to the client-lawyer relationship do not apply. A lawyer's control of an entity extends to the ability to direct its operation. Whether a lawyer has such control will depend upon the circumstances of the particular case.
[5] When a client-lawyer relationship exists with a person who is referred by a lawyer to a separate law-related service entity controlled by the lawyer, individually or with others, the lawyer must comply with Rule 1.8(a).
[6] In taking the reasonable measures referred to in paragraph (a)(2) to assure that a person using law-related services understands the practical effect or significance of the inapplicability of the Rules of Professional Conduct, the lawyer should communicate to the person receiving the law-related services, in a manner sufficient to assure that the person understands the significance of the fact, that the relationship of the person to the business entity will not be a client-lawyer relationship. The communication should be made before entering into an agreement for provision of or providing law-related services, and preferably should be in writing.
[7] The burden is upon the lawyer to show that the lawyer has taken reasonable measures under the circumstances to communicate the desired understanding. For instance, a sophisticated user of law-related services, such as a publicly held corporation, may require a lesser explanation than someone unaccustomed to making distinctions between legal services and law-related services, such as an individual seeking tax advice from a lawyer-accountant or investigative services in connection with a lawsuit.
[8] Regardless of the sophistication of potential recipients of law-related services, a lawyer should take special care to keep separate the provision of law-related and legal services in order to minimize the risk that the recipient will assume that the law-related services are legal services. The risk of such confusion is especially acute when the lawyer renders both types of services with respect to the same matter. Under some circumstances the legal and law-related services may be so closely entwined that they cannot be distinguished from each other, and the requirement of disclosure and consultation imposed by paragraph (a)(2) of the Rule cannot be met. In such a case a lawyer will be responsible for assuring that both the lawyer's conduct and, to the extent required by Rule 5.3, that of nonlawyer employees in the distinct entity that the lawyer controls complies in all respects with the Rules of Professional Conduct.
[9] A broad range of economic and other interests of clients may be served by lawyers' engaging in the delivery of law-related services. Examples of law-related services include providing title insurance, financial planning, accounting, trust services, real estate counseling, legislative lobbying, economic analysis, social work, psychological counseling, tax preparation, and patent, medical or environmental consulting.
[10] When a lawyer is obliged to accord the recipients of such services the protections of those Rules that apply to the client-lawyer relationship, the lawyer must take special care to heed the proscriptions of the Rules addressing conflict of interest (Rules 1.7 through 1.11, especially Rules 1.7(a)(2) and 1.8(a), (b) and (f)), and to scrupulously adhere to the requirements of Rule 1.6 relating to disclosure of confidential information. The promotion of the law-related services must also in all respects comply with Rules 7.1 through 7.3, dealing with advertising and solicitation. In that regard, lawyers should take special care to identify the obligations that may be imposed as a result of a jurisdiction's decisional law.
[11] When the full protections of all of the Rules of Professional Conduct do not apply to the provision of law-related services, principles of law external to the Rules, for example, the law of principal and agent, govern the legal duties owed to those receiving the services. Those other legal principles may establish a different degree of protection for the recipient with respect to confidentiality of information, conflicts of interest and permissible business relationships with clients. See also Rule 8.4 (Misconduct).

RULE 6.1:	VOLUNTARY PRO BONO PUBLICO SERVICE
Public Service
Every lawyer has a professional responsibility to provide legal services to those unable to pay. A lawyer should aspire to render at least (50) hours of pro bono publico legal services per year. In fulfilling this responsibility, the lawyer should:
(a) provide a substantial majority of the (50) hours of legal services without fee or expectation of fee to:
(1) persons of limited means or
(2) charitable, religious, civic, community, governmental and educational organizations in matters that are designed primarily to address the needs of persons of limited means; and
(b) provide any additional services through:
(1) delivery of legal services at no fee or substantially reduced fee to individuals, groups or organizations seeking to secure or protect civil rights, civil liberties or public rights, or charitable, religious, civic, community, governmental and educational organizations in matters in furtherance of their organizational purposes, where the payment of standard legal fees would significantly deplete the organization's economic resources or would be otherwise inappropriate;
(2) delivery of legal services at a substantially reduced fee to persons of limited means; or
(3) participation in activities for improving the law, the legal system or the legal profession.
In addition, a lawyer should voluntarily contribute financial support to organizations that provide legal services to persons of limited means.
COMMENT ON RULE 6.1
[1] Every lawyer, regardless of professional prominence or professional work load, has a responsibility to provide legal services to those unable to pay, and personal involvement in the problems of the disadvantaged can be one of the most rewarding experiences in the life of a lawyer. The American Bar Association urges all lawyers to provide a minimum of 50 hours of pro bono services annually. States, however, may decide to choose a higher or lower number of hours of annual service (which may be expressed as a percentage of a lawyer's professional time) depending upon local needs and local conditions. It is recognized that in some years a lawyer may render greater or fewer hours than the annual standard specified, but during the course of his or her legal career, each lawyer should render on average per year, the number of hours set forth in this Rule. Services can be performed in civil matters or in criminal or quasi-criminal matters for which there is no government obligation to provide funds for legal representation, such as post-conviction death penalty appeal cases.
[2] Paragraphs (a)(1) and (2) recognize the critical need for legal services that exists among persons of limited means by providing that a substantial majority of the legal services rendered annually to the disadvantaged be furnished without fee or expectation of fee. Legal services under these paragraphs consist of a full range of activities, including individual and class representation, the provision of legal advice, legislative lobbying, administrative rule making and the provision of free training or mentoring to those who represent persons of limited means. The variety of these activities should facilitate participation by government lawyers, even when restrictions exist on their engaging in the outside practice of law.
[3] Persons eligible for legal services under paragraphs (a)(1) and (2) are those who qualify for participation in programs funded by the Legal Services Corporation and those whose incomes and financial resources are slightly above the guidelines utilized by such programs but nevertheless, cannot afford counsel. Legal services can be rendered to individuals or to organizations such as homeless shelters, battered women's centers and food pantries that serve those of limited means. The term "governmental organizations" includes, but is not limited to, public protection programs and sections of governmental or public sector agencies.
[4] Because service must be provided without fee or expectation of fee, the intent of the lawyer to render free legal services is essential for the work performed to fall within the meaning of paragraphs (a)(1) and (2). Accordingly, services rendered cannot be considered pro bono if an anticipated fee is uncollected, but the award of statutory attorneys' fees in a case originally accepted as pro bono would not disqualify such services from inclusion under this section. Lawyers who do receive fees in such cases are encouraged to contribute an appropriate portion of such fees to organizations or projects that benefit persons of limited means.
[5] While it is possible for a lawyer to fulfill the annual responsibility to perform pro bono services exclusively through activities described in paragraphs (a)(1) and (2), to the extent that any hours of service remained unfulfilled, the remaining commitment can be met in a variety of ways as set forth in paragraph (b). Constitutional, statutory or regulatory restrictions may prohibit or impede government and public sector lawyers and judges from performing the pro bono services outlined in paragraphs (a)(1) and (2). Accordingly, where those restrictions apply, government and public sector lawyers and judges may fulfill their pro bono responsibility by performing services outlined in paragraph (b).
[6] Paragraph (b)(1) includes the provision of certain types of legal services to those whose incomes and financial resources place them above limited means. It also permits the pro bono lawyer to accept a substantially reduced fee for services. Examples of the types of issues that may be addressed under this paragraph include First Amendment claims, Title VII claims and environmental protection claims. Additionally, a wide range of organizations may be represented, including social service, medical research, cultural and religious groups.
[7] Paragraph (b)(2) covers instances in which lawyers agree to and receive a modest fee for furnishing legal services to persons of limited means. Participation in judicare programs and acceptance of court appointments in which the fee is substantially below a lawyer's usual rate are encouraged under this section.
[8] Paragraph (b)(3) recognizes the value of lawyers engaging in activities that improve the law, the legal system or the legal profession. Serving on bar association committees, serving on boards of pro bono or legal services programs, taking part in Law Day activities, acting as a continuing legal education instructor, a mediator or an arbitrator and engaging in legislative lobbying to improve the law, the legal system or the profession are a few examples of the many activities that fall within this paragraph.
[9] Because the provision of pro bono services is a professional responsibility, it is the individual ethical commitment of each lawyer. Nevertheless, there may be times when it is not feasible for a lawyer to engage in pro bono services. At such times a lawyer may discharge the pro bono responsibility by providing financial support to organizations providing free legal services to persons of limited means. Such financial support should be reasonably equivalent to the value of the hours of service that would have otherwise been provided. In addition, at times it may be more feasible to satisfy the pro bono responsibility collectively, as by a firm's aggregate pro bono activities.
[10] Because the efforts of individual lawyers are not enough to meet the need for free legal services that exists among persons of limited means, the government and the profession have instituted additional programs to provide those services. Every lawyer should financially support such programs, in addition to either providing direct pro bono services or making financial contributions when pro bono service is not feasible.
[11] Law firms should act reasonably to enable and encourage all lawyers in the firm to provide the pro bono legal services called for by this Rule.
[12] The responsibility set forth in this Rule is not intended to be enforced through disciplinary process.

RULE 6.2:	ACCEPTING APPOINTMENTS
Public Service
A lawyer shall not seek to avoid appointment by a tribunal to represent a person except for good cause, such as:
(a) representing the client is likely to result in violation of the Rules of Professional Conduct or other law;
(b) representing the client is likely to result in an unreasonable financial burden on the lawyer; or
(c) the client or the cause is so repugnant to the lawyer as to be likely to impair the client-lawyer relationship or the lawyer's ability to represent the client.
COMMENT ON RULE 6.2
[1] A lawyer ordinarily is not obliged to accept a client whose character or cause the lawyer regards as repugnant. The lawyer's freedom to select clients is, however, qualified. All lawyers have a responsibility to assist in providing pro bono publico service. See Rule 6.1. An individual lawyer fulfills this responsibility by accepting a fair share of unpopular matters or indigent or unpopular clients. A lawyer may also be subject to appointment by a court to serve unpopular clients or persons unable to afford legal services.
Appointed Counsel
[2] For good cause a lawyer may seek to decline an appointment to represent a person who cannot afford to retain counsel or whose cause is unpopular. Good cause exists if the lawyer could not handle the matter competently, see Rule 1.1, or if undertaking the representation would result in an improper conflict of interest, for example, when the client or the cause is so repugnant to the lawyer as to be likely to impair the client-lawyer relationship or the lawyer's ability to represent the client. A lawyer may also seek to decline an appointment if acceptance would be unreasonably burdensome, for example, when it would impose a financial sacrifice so great as to be unjust.
[3] An appointed lawyer has the same obligations to the client as retained counsel, including the obligations of loyalty and confidentiality, and is subject to the same limitations on the client-lawyer relationship, such as the obligation to refrain from assisting the client in violation of the Rules.

RULE 6.3:	MEMBERSHIP IN LEGAL SERVICES ORGANIZATION
Public Service
A lawyer may serve as a director, officer or member of a legal services organization, apart from the law firm in which the lawyer practices, notwithstanding that the organization serves persons having interests adverse to a client of the lawyer. The lawyer shall not knowingly participate in a decision or action of the organization:
(a) if participating in the decision or action would be incompatible with the lawyer's obligations to a client under Rule 1.7; or
(b) where the decision or action could have a material adverse effect on the representation of a client of the organization whose interests are adverse to a client of the lawyer.
COMMENT ON RULE 6.3
[1] Lawyers should be encouraged to support and participate in legal service organizations. A lawyer who is an officer or a member of such an organization does not thereby have a client-lawyer relationship with persons served by the organization. However, there is potential conflict between the interests of such persons and the interests of the lawyer's clients. If the possibility of such conflict disqualified a lawyer from serving on the board of a legal services organization, the profession's involvement in such organizations would be severely curtailed.
[2] It may be necessary in appropriate cases to reassure a client of the organization that the representation will not be affected by conflicting loyalties of a member of the board. Established, written policies in this respect can enhance the credibility of such assurances.

RULE 6.4:	LAW REFORM ACTIVITIES AFFECTING CLIENT INTERESTS
Public Service
A lawyer may serve as a director, officer or member of an organization involved in reform of the law or its administration notwithstanding that the reform may affect the interests of a client of the lawyer. When the lawyer knows that the interests of a client may be materially benefitted by a decision in which the lawyer participates, the lawyer shall disclose that fact but need not identify the client.
COMMENT ON RULE 6.4
[1] Lawyers involved in organizations seeking law reform generally do not have a client-lawyer relationship with the organization. Otherwise, it might follow that a lawyer could not be involved in a bar association law reform program that might indirectly affect a client. See also Rule 1.2(b). For example, a lawyer specializing in antitrust litigation might be regarded as disqualified from participating in drafting revisions of rules governing that subject. In determining the nature and scope of participation in such activities, a lawyer should be mindful of obligations to clients under other Rules, particularly Rule 1.7. A lawyer is professionally obligated to protect the integrity of the program by making an appropriate disclosure within the organization when the lawyer knows a private client might be materially benefitted.


RULE 6.5:	NONPROFIT & COURT-ANNEXED LIMITED LEGAL SERVICES PROGRAMS
Public Service
(a) A lawyer who, under the auspices of a program sponsored by a nonprofit organization or court, provides short-term limited legal services to a client without expectation by either the lawyer or the client that the lawyer will provide continuing representation in the matter:
(1) is subject to Rules 1.7 and 1.9(a) only if the lawyer knows that the representation of the client involves a conflict of interest; and
(2) is subject to Rule 1.10 only if the lawyer knows that another lawyer associated with the lawyer in a law firm is disqualified by Rule 1.7 or 1.9(a) with respect to the matter.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (a)(2), Rule 1.10 is inapplicable to a representation governed by this Rule.
COMMENT ON RULE 6.5
[1] Legal services organizations, courts and various nonprofit organizations have established programs through which lawyers provide short-term limited legal services — such as advice or the completion of legal forms - that will assist persons to address their legal problems without further representation by a lawyer. In these programs, such as legal-advice hotlines, advice-only clinics or pro se counseling programs, a client-lawyer relationship is established, but there is no expectation that the lawyer's representation of the client will continue beyond the limited consultation. Such programs are normally operated under circumstances in which it is not feasible for a lawyer to systematically screen for conflicts of interest as is generally required before undertaking a representation. See, e.g., Rules 1.7, 1.9 and 1.10.
[2] A lawyer who provides short-term limited legal services pursuant to this Rule must secure the client's informed consent to the limited scope of the representation. See Rule 1.2(c). If a short-term limited representation would not be reasonable under the circumstances, the lawyer may offer advice to the client but must also advise the client of the need for further assistance of counsel. Except as provided in this Rule, the Rules of Professional Conduct, including Rules 1.6 and 1.9(c), are applicable to the limited representation.
[3] Because a lawyer who is representing a client in the circumstances addressed by this Rule ordinarily is not able to check systematically for conflicts of interest, paragraph (a) requires compliance with Rules 1.7 or 1.9(a) only if the lawyer knows that the representation presents a conflict of interest for the lawyer, and with Rule 1.10 only if the lawyer knows that another lawyer in the lawyer's firm is disqualified by Rules 1.7 or 1.9(a) in the matter.
[4] Because the limited nature of the services significantly reduces the risk of conflicts of interest with other matters being handled by the lawyer's firm, paragraph (b) provides that Rule 1.10 is inapplicable to a representation governed by this Rule except as provided by paragraph (a)(2). Paragraph (a)(2) requires the participating lawyer to comply with Rule 1.10 when the lawyer knows that the lawyer's firm is disqualified by Rules 1.7 or 1.9(a). By virtue of paragraph (b), however, a lawyer's participation in a short-term limited legal services program will not preclude the lawyer's firm from undertaking or continuing the representation of a client with interests adverse to a client being represented under the program's auspices. Nor will the personal disqualification of a lawyer participating in the program be imputed to other lawyers participating in the program.
[5] If, after commencing a short-term limited representation in accordance with this Rule, a lawyer undertakes to represent the client in the matter on an ongoing basis, Rules 1.7, 1.9(a) and 1.10 become applicable.

RULE 7.1:	COMMUNICATION CONCERNING A LAWYER'S SERVICES
Information About Legal Services
A lawyer shall not make a false or misleading communication about the lawyer or the lawyer's services. A communication is false or misleading if it contains a material misrepresentation of fact or law, or omits a fact necessary to make the statement considered as a whole not materially misleading.
COMMENT ON RULE 7.1
[1]  This Rule governs all communications about a lawyer's services, including advertising permitted by Rule 7.2. Whatever means are used to make known a lawyer's services, statements about them must be truthful.
[2]  Truthful statements that are misleading are also prohibited by this Rule. A truthful statement is misleading if it omits a fact necessary to make the lawyer's communication considered as a whole not materially misleading. A truthful statement is also misleading if there is a substantial likelihood that it will lead a reasonable person to formulate a specific conclusion about the lawyer or the lawyer's services for which there is no reasonable factual foundation.
[3]  An advertisement that truthfully reports a lawyer's achievements on behalf of clients or former clients may be misleading if presented so as to lead a reasonable person to form an unjustified expectation that the same results could be obtained for other clients in similar matters without reference to the specific factual and legal circumstances of each client's case. Similarly, an unsubstantiated comparison of the lawyer's services or fees with the services or fees of other lawyers may be misleading if presented with such specificity as would lead a reasonable person to conclude that the comparison can be substantiated. The inclusion of an appropriate disclaimer or qualifying language may preclude a finding that a statement is likely to create unjustified expectations or otherwise mislead the public.
[4]  See also Rule 8.4(e) for the prohibition against stating or implying an ability to influence improperly a government agency or official or to achieve results by means that violate the Rules of Professional Conduct or other law.

RULE 7.2:	ADVERTISING
Information About Legal Services
(a) A lawyer may communicate information regarding the lawyer’s services through any media.
(b) A lawyer shall not compensate, give or promise anything of value to a person for recommending the lawyer’s services except that a lawyer may:
(1) pay the reasonable costs of advertisements or communications permitted by this Rule;
(2) pay the usual charges of a legal service plan or a not-for-profit or qualified lawyer referral service;
(3) pay for a law practice in accordance with Rule 1.17;
(4) refer clients to another lawyer or a nonlawyer professional pursuant to an agreement not otherwise prohibited under these Rules that provides for the other person to refer clients or customers to the lawyer, if:
(i) the reciprocal referral agreement is not exclusive; and
(ii) the client is informed of the existence and nature of the agreement; and
(5) give nominal gifts as an expression of appreciation that are neither intended nor reasonably expected to be a form of compensation for recommending a lawyer’s services.
(c) A lawyer shall not state or imply that a lawyer is certified as a specialist in a particular field of law, unless:
(1) the lawyer has been certified as a specialist by an organization that has been approved by an appropriate authority of the state or the District of Columbia or a U.S. Territory or that has been accredited by the American Bar Association; and
(2) the name of the certifying organization is clearly identified in the communication.
(d) Any communication made under this Rule must include the name and contact information of at least one lawyer or law firm responsible for its content.
COMMENT ON RULE 7.2
[1]  This Rule permits public dissemination of information concerning a lawyer’s or law firm’s name, address, email address, website, and telephone number; the kinds of services the lawyer will undertake; the basis on which the lawyer’s fees are determined, including prices for specific services and payment and credit arrangements; a lawyer’s foreign language ability; names of references and, with their consent, names of clients regularly represented; and other information that might invite the attention of those seeking legal assistance.
Paying Others to Recommend a Lawyer
[2]  Except as permitted under paragraphs (b)(1)-(b)(5), lawyers are not permitted to pay others for recommending the lawyer’s services. A communication contains a recommendation if it endorses or vouches for a lawyer’s credentials, abilities, competence, character, or other professional qualities. Directory listings and group advertisements that list lawyers by practice area, without more, do not constitute impermissible “recommendations.”
[3]  Paragraph (b)(1) allows a lawyer to pay for advertising and communications permitted by this Rule, including the costs of print directory listings, on-line directory listings, newspaper ads, television and radio airtime, domain-name registrations, sponsorship fees, Internet-based advertisements, and group advertising. A lawyer may compensate employees, agents and vendors who are engaged to provide marketing or client development services, such as publicists, public-relations personnel, business-development staff, television and radio station employees or spokespersons and website designers.
[4]  Paragraph (b)(5) permits lawyers to give nominal gifts as an expression of appreciation to a person for recommending the lawyer’s services or referring a prospective client. The gift may not be more than a token item as might be given for holidays, or other ordinary social hospitality.  A gift is prohibited if offered or given in consideration of any promise, agreement or understanding that such a gift would be forthcoming or that referrals would be made or encouraged in the future.
[5]  A lawyer may pay others for generating client leads, such as Internet-based client leads, as long as the lead generator does not recommend the lawyer, any payment to the lead generator is consistent with Rules 1.5(e) (division of fees) and 5.4 (professional independence of the lawyer), and the lead generator’s communications are consistent with Rule 7.1 (communications concerning a lawyer’s services). To comply with Rule 7.1, a lawyer must not pay a lead generator that states, implies, or creates a reasonable impression that it is recommending the lawyer, is making the referral without payment from the lawyer, or has analyzed a person’s legal problems when determining which lawyer should receive the referral. See Comment [2] (definition of “recommendation”). See also Rule 5.3 (duties of lawyers and law firms with respect to the conduct of nonlawyers); Rule 8.4(a) (duty to avoid violating the Rules through the acts of another).
[6]  A lawyer may pay the usual charges of a legal service plan or a not-for-profit or qualified lawyer referral service. A legal service plan is a prepaid or group legal service plan or a similar delivery system that assists people who seek to secure legal representation. A lawyer referral service, on the other hand, is any organization that holds itself out to the public as a lawyer referral service. Qualified referral services are consumer-oriented organizations that provide unbiased referrals to lawyers with appropriate experience in the subject matter of the representation and afford other client protections, such as complaint procedures or malpractice insurance requirements. Consequently, this Rule only permits a lawyer to pay the usual charges of a not-for-profit or qualified lawyer referral service. A qualified lawyer referral service is one that is approved by an appropriate regulatory authority as affording adequate protections for the public. See, e.g., the American Bar Association's Model Supreme Court Rules Governing Lawyer Referral Services and Model Lawyer Referral and Information Service Quality Assurance Act.
[7]  A lawyer who accepts assignments or referrals from a legal service plan or referrals from a lawyer referral service must act reasonably to assure that the activities of the plan or service are compatible with the lawyer's professional obligations. Legal service plans and lawyer referral services may communicate with the public, but such communication must be in conformity with these Rules. Thus, advertising must not be false or misleading, as would be the case if the communications of a group advertising program or a group legal services plan would mislead the public to think that it was a lawyer referral service sponsored by a state agency or bar association.
[8]  A lawyer also may agree to refer clients to another lawyer or a nonlawyer professional, in return for the undertaking of that person to refer clients or customers to the lawyer. Such reciprocal referral arrangements must not interfere with the lawyer’s professional judgment as to making referrals or as to providing substantive legal services. See Rules 2.1 and 5.4(c). Except as provided in Rule 1.5(e), a lawyer who receives referrals from a lawyer or nonlawyer professional must not pay anything solely for the referral, but the lawyer does not violate paragraph (b) of this Rule by agreeing to refer clients to the other lawyer or nonlawyer professional, so long as the reciprocal referral agreement is not exclusive and the client is informed of the referral agreement. Conflicts of interest created by such arrangements are governed by Rule 1.7. Reciprocal referral agreements should not be of indefinite duration and should be reviewed periodically to determine whether they comply with these Rules. This Rule does not restrict referrals or divisions of revenues or net income among lawyers within firms comprised of multiple entities.
Communications about Fields of Practice
[9]  Paragraph (c) of this Rule permits a lawyer to communicate that the lawyer does or does not practice in particular areas of law. A lawyer is generally permitted to state that the lawyer “concentrates in” or is a “specialist,” practices a “specialty,” or “specializes in” particular fields based on the lawyer’s experience, specialized training or education, but such communications are subject to the “false and misleading” standard applied in Rule 7.1 to communications concerning a lawyer’s services.
[10]  The Patent and Trademark Office has a long-established policy of designating lawyers practicing before the Office. The designation of Admiralty practice also has a long historical tradition associated with maritime commerce and the federal courts. A lawyer’s communications about these practice areas are not prohibited by this Rule.
[11]  This Rule permits a lawyer to state that the lawyer is certified as a specialist in a field of law if such certification is granted by an organization approved by an appropriate authority of a state, the District of Columbia or a U.S. Territory or accredited by the American Bar Association or another organization, such as a state supreme court or a state bar association, that has been approved by the authority of the state, the District of Columbia or a U.S. Territory to accredit organizations that certify lawyers as specialists. Certification signifies that an objective entity has recognized an advanced degree of knowledge and experience in the specialty area greater than is suggested by general licensure to practice law. Certifying organizations may be expected to apply standards of experience, knowledge and proficiency to ensure that a lawyer’s recognition as a specialist is meaningful and reliable. To ensure that consumers can obtain access to useful information about an organization granting certification, the name of the certifying organization must be included in any communication regarding the certification.
Required Contact Information
[12]  This Rule requires that any communication about a lawyer or law firm’s services include the name of, and contact information for, the lawyer or law firm. Contact information includes a website address, a telephone number, an email address or a physical office location.

RULE 7.3:	DIRECT CONTACT WITH PROSPECTIVE CLIENTS
Information About Legal Services
(a) “Solicitation” or “solicit” denotes a communication initiated by or on behalf of a lawyer or law firm that is directed to a specific person the lawyer knows or reasonably should know needs legal services in a particular matter and that offers to provide, or reasonably can be understood as offering to provide, legal services for that matter.
(b) A lawyer shall not solicit professional employment by live person-to-person contact when a significant motive for the lawyer’s doing so is the lawyer’s or law firm’s pecuniary gain, unless the contact is with a:
 	(1) lawyer;
(2) person who has a family, close personal, or prior business or professional relationship with the lawyer or law firm; or
(3) person who routinely uses for business purposes the type of legal services offered by the lawyer.
(c) A lawyer shall not solicit professional employment even when not otherwise prohibited by paragraph (b), if:
(1) the target of the solicitation has made known to the lawyer a desire not to be solicited by the lawyer; or
(2) the solicitation involves coercion, duress or harassment.
(d) This Rule does not prohibit communications authorized by law or ordered by a court or other tribunal.
(e) Notwithstanding the prohibitions in this Rule, a lawyer may participate with a prepaid or group legal service plan operated by an organization not owned or directed by the lawyer that uses live person-to-person contact to enroll members or sell subscriptions for the plan from persons who are not known to need legal services in a particular matter covered by the plan.
COMMENT ON RULE 7.3
[1]    Paragraph (b) prohibits a lawyer from soliciting professional employment by live person-to-person contact when a significant motive for the lawyer’s doing so is the lawyer’s or the law firm’s pecuniary gain. A lawyer’s communication is not a solicitation if it is directed to the general public, such as through a billboard, an Internet banner advertisement, a website or a television commercial, or if it is in response to a request for information or is automatically generated in response to electronic searches.
[2]   “Live person-to-person contact” means in-person, face-to-face, live telephone and other real-time visual or auditory person-to-person communications where the person is subject to a direct personal encounter without time for reflection. Such person-to-person contact does not include chat rooms, text messages or other written communications that recipients may easily disregard. A potential for overreaching exists when a lawyer, seeking pecuniary gain, solicits a person known to be in need of legal services. This form of contact subjects a person to the private importuning of the trained advocate in a direct interpersonal encounter. The person, who may already feel overwhelmed by the circumstances giving rise to the need for legal services, may find it difficult to fully evaluate all available alternatives with reasoned judgment and appropriate self interest in the face of the lawyer’s presence and insistence upon an immediate response. The situation is fraught with the possibility of undue influence, intimidation, and overreaching.
[3]   The potential for overreaching inherent in live person-to-person contact justifies its prohibition, since lawyers have alternative means of conveying necessary information. In particular, communications can be mailed or transmitted by email or other electronic means that do not violate other laws. These forms of communications make it possible for the public to be informed about the need for legal services, and about the qualifications of available lawyers and law firms, without subjecting the public to live person-to-person persuasion that may overwhelm a person’s judgment.
[4]   The contents of live person-to-person contact can be disputed and may not be subject to third party scrutiny. Consequently, they are much more likely to approach (and occasionally cross) the dividing line between accurate representations and those that are false and misleading.
[5]   There is far less likelihood that a lawyer would engage in overreaching against a former client, or a person with whom the lawyer has a close personal, family, business or professional relationship, or in situations in which the lawyer is motivated by considerations other than the lawyer’s pecuniary gain. Nor is there a serious potential for overreaching when the person contacted is a lawyer or is known to routinely use the type of legal services involved for business purposes. Examples include persons who routinely hire outside counsel to represent the entity; entrepreneurs who regularly engage business, employment law or intellectual property lawyers; small business proprietors who routinely hire lawyers for lease or contract issues; and other people who routinely retain lawyers for business transactions or formations. Paragraph (b) is not intended to prohibit a lawyer from participating in constitutionally protected activities of public or charitable legal-service organizations or bona fide political, social, civic, fraternal, employee or trade organizations whose purposes include providing or recommending legal services to their members or beneficiaries.
[6]   A solicitation that contains false or misleading information within the meaning of Rule 7.1, that involves coercion, duress or harassment within the meaning of Rule 7.3 (c)(2), or that involves contact with someone who has made known to the lawyer a desire not to be solicited by the lawyer within the meaning of Rule 7.3(c)(1) is prohibited. Live, person-to-person contact of individuals who may be especially vulnerable to coercion or duress is ordinarily not appropriate, for example, the elderly, those whose first language is not English, or the disabled.
[7]   This Rule does not prohibit a lawyer from contacting representatives of organizations or groups that may be interested in establishing a group or prepaid legal plan for their members, insureds, beneficiaries or other third parties for the purpose of informing such entities of the availability of and details concerning the plan or arrangement which the lawyer or lawyer's firm is willing to offer. This form of communication is not directed to people who are seeking legal services for themselves. Rather, it is usually addressed to an individual acting in a fiduciary capacity seeking a supplier of legal services for others who may, if they choose, become prospective clients of the lawyer. Under these circumstances, the activity which the lawyer undertakes in communicating with such representatives and the type of information transmitted to the individual are functionally similar to and serve the same purpose as advertising permitted under Rule 7.2.
[8]   Communications authorized by law or ordered by a court or tribunal include a notice to potential members of a class in class action litigation.
[9]   Paragraph (e) of this Rule permits a lawyer to participate with an organization which uses personal contact to enroll members for its group or prepaid legal service plan, provided that the personal contact is not undertaken by any lawyer who would be a provider of legal services through the plan. The organization must not be owned by or directed (whether as manager or otherwise) by any lawyer or law firm that participates in the plan. For example, paragraph (e) would not permit a lawyer to create an organization controlled directly or indirectly by the lawyer and use the organization for the person-to-person solicitation of legal employment of the lawyer through memberships in the plan or otherwise. The communication permitted by these organizations must not be directed to a person known to need legal services in a particular matter, but must be designed to inform potential plan members generally of another means of affordable legal services. Lawyers who participate in a legal service plan must reasonably assure that the plan sponsors are in compliance with Rules 7.1, 7.2 and 7.3 (c).


RULE 7.4:	DELETED

RULE 7.5:	DELETED

RULE 7.6:	POLITICAL CONTRIBUTIONS TO OBTAIN LEGAL ENGAGEMENTS
OR APPOINTMENTS BY JUDGES
Information About Legal Services
A lawyer or law firm shall not accept a government legal engagement or an appointment by a judge if the lawyer or law firm makes a political contribution or solicits political contributions for the purpose of obtaining or being considered for that type of legal engagement or appointment.
COMMENT ON RULE 7.6
[1] Lawyers have a right to participate fully in the political process, which includes making and soliciting political contributions to candidates for judicial and other public office. Nevertheless, when lawyers make or solicit political contributions in order to obtain an engagement for legal work awarded by a government agency, or to obtain appointment by a judge, the public may legitimately question whether the lawyers engaged to perform the work are selected on the basis of competence and merit. In such a circumstance, the integrity of the profession is undermined.
[2] The term "political contribution" denotes any gift, subscription, loan, advance or deposit of anything of value made directly or indirectly to a candidate, incumbent, political party or campaign committee to influence or provide financial support for election to or retention in judicial or other government office. Political contributions in initiative and referendum elections are not included. For purposes of this Rule, the term "political contribution" does not include uncompensated services.
[3] Subject to the exceptions below, (i) the term "government legal engagement" denotes any engagement to provide legal services that a public official has the direct or indirect power to award; and (ii) the term "appointment by a judge" denotes an appointment to a position such as referee, commissioner, special master, receiver, guardian or other similar position that is made by a judge. Those terms do not, however, include (a) substantially uncompensated services; (b) engagements or appointments made on the basis of experience, expertise, professional qualifications and cost following a request for proposal or other process that is free from influence based upon political contributions; and (c) engagements or appointments made on a rotational basis from a list compiled without regard to political contributions.
[4] The term "lawyer or law firm" includes a political action committee or other entity owned or controlled by a lawyer or law firm.
[5] Political contributions are for the purpose of obtaining or being considered for a government legal engagement or appointment by a judge if, but for the desire to be considered for the legal engagement or appointment, the lawyer or law firm would not have made or solicited the contributions. The purpose may be determined by an examination of the circumstances in which the contributions occur. For example, one or more contributions that in the aggregate are substantial in relation to other contributions by lawyers or law firms, made for the benefit of an official in a position to influence award of a government legal engagement, and followed by an award of the legal engagement to the contributing or soliciting lawyer or the lawyer's firm would support an inference that the purpose of the contributions was to obtain the engagement, absent other factors that weigh against existence of the proscribed purpose. Those factors may include among others that the contribution or solicitation was made to further a political, social, or economic interest or because of an existing personal, family, or professional relationship with a candidate.
[6] If a lawyer makes or solicits a political contribution under circumstances that constitute bribery or another crime, Rule 8.4(b) is implicated.

RULE 8.1:	BAR ADMISSION & DISCIPLINARY MATTERS
Maintaining The Integrity Of The Profession
An applicant for admission to the bar, or a lawyer in connection with a bar admission application or in connection with a disciplinary matter, shall not:
(a) knowingly make a false statement of material fact; or
(b) fail to disclose a fact necessary to correct a misapprehension known by the person to have arisen in the matter, or knowingly fail to respond to a lawful demand for information from an admissions or disciplinary authority, except that this rule does not require disclosure of information otherwise protected by Rule 1.6.
COMMENT ON RULE 8.1
[1] The duty imposed by this Rule extends to persons seeking admission to the bar as well as to lawyers. Hence, if a person makes a material false statement in connection with an application for admission, it may be the basis for subsequent disciplinary action if the person is admitted, and in any event may be relevant in a subsequent admission application. The duty imposed by this Rule applies to a lawyer's own admission or discipline as well as that of others. Thus, it is a separate professional offense for a lawyer to knowingly make a misrepresentation or omission in connection with a disciplinary investigation of the lawyer's own conduct. Paragraph (b) of this Rule also requires correction of any prior misstatement in the matter that the applicant or lawyer may have made and affirmative clarification of any misunderstanding on the part of the admissions or disciplinary authority of which the person involved becomes aware.
[2] This Rule is subject to the provisions of the Fifth Amendment of the United States Constitution and corresponding provisions of state constitutions. A person relying on such a provision in response to a question, however, should do so openly and not use the right of nondisclosure as a justification for failure to comply with this Rule.
[3] A lawyer representing an applicant for admission to the bar, or representing a lawyer who is the subject of a disciplinary inquiry or proceeding, is governed by the rules applicable to the client-lawyer relationship, including Rule 1.6 and, in some cases, Rule 3.3.

RULE 8.2:	JUDICIAL & LEGAL OFFICIALS
Maintaining The Integrity Of The Profession
(a) A lawyer shall not make a statement that the lawyer knows to be false or with reckless disregard as to its truth or falsity concerning the qualifications or integrity of a judge, adjudicatory officer or public legal officer, or of a candidate for election or appointment to judicial or legal office.
(b) A lawyer who is a candidate for judicial office shall comply with the applicable provisions of the Code of Judicial Conduct.
COMMENT ON RULE 8.2
[1] Assessments by lawyers are relied on in evaluating the professional or personal fitness of persons being considered for election or appointment to judicial office and to public legal offices, such as attorney general, prosecuting attorney and public defender. Expressing honest and candid opinions on such matters contributes to improving the administration of justice. Conversely, false statements by a lawyer can unfairly undermine public confidence in the administration of justice.
[2] When a lawyer seeks judicial office, the lawyer should be bound by applicable limitations on political activity.
[3] To maintain the fair and independent administration of justice, lawyers are encouraged to continue traditional efforts to defend judges and courts unjustly criticized.

RULE 8.3:	REPORTING PROFESSIONAL MISCONDUCT
Maintaining The Integrity Of The Profession
(a) A lawyer who knows that another lawyer has committed a violation of the Rules of Professional Conduct that raises a substantial question as to that lawyer's honesty, trustworthiness or fitness as a lawyer in other respects, shall inform the appropriate professional authority.
(b) A lawyer who knows that a judge has committed a violation of applicable rules of judicial conduct that raises a substantial question as to the judge's fitness for office shall inform the appropriate authority.
(c) This Rule does not require disclosure of information otherwise protected by Rule 1.6 or information gained by a lawyer or judge while participating in an approved lawyers assistance program.
COMMENT ON RULE 8.3
[1] Self-regulation of the legal profession requires that members of the profession initiate disciplinary investigation when they know of a violation of the Rules of Professional Conduct. Lawyers have a similar obligation with respect to judicial misconduct. An apparently isolated violation may indicate a pattern of misconduct that only a disciplinary investigation can uncover. Reporting a violation is especially important where the victim is unlikely to discover the offense.
[2] A report about misconduct is not required where it would involve violation of Rule 1.6. However, a lawyer should encourage a client to consent to disclosure where prosecution would not substantially prejudice the client's interests.
[3] If a lawyer were obliged to report every violation of the Rules, the failure to report any violation would itself be a professional offense. Such a requirement existed in many jurisdictions but proved to be unenforceable. This Rule limits the reporting obligation to those offenses that a self-regulating profession must vigorously endeavor to prevent. A measure of judgment is, therefore, required in complying with the provisions of this Rule. The term "substantial" refers to the seriousness of the possible offense and not the quantum of evidence of which the lawyer is aware. A report should be made to the bar disciplinary agency unless some other agency, such as a peer review agency, is more appropriate in the circumstances. Similar considerations apply to the reporting of judicial misconduct.
[4] The duty to report professional misconduct does not apply to a lawyer retained to represent a lawyer whose professional conduct is in question. Such a situation is governed by the Rules applicable to the client-lawyer relationship.
[5] Information about a lawyer's or judge's misconduct or fitness may be received by a lawyer in the course of that lawyer's participation in an approved lawyers or judges assistance program. In that circumstance, providing for an exception to the reporting requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Rule encourages lawyers and judges to seek treatment through such a program. Conversely, without such an exception, lawyers and judges may hesitate to seek assistance from these programs, which may then result in additional harm to their professional careers and additional injury to the welfare of clients and the public. These Rules do not otherwise address the confidentiality of information received by a lawyer or judge participating in an approved lawyers assistance program; such an obligation, however, may be imposed by the rules of the program or other law.

RULE 8.4:	MISCONDUCT
Maintaining The Integrity Of The Profession
It is professional misconduct for a lawyer to:
(a) violate or attempt to violate the Rules of Professional Conduct, knowingly assist or induce another to do so, or do so through the acts of another;
(b) commit a criminal act that reflects adversely on the lawyer's honesty, trustworthiness or fitness as a lawyer in other respects;
(c) engage in conduct involving dishonesty, fraud, deceit or misrepresentation;
(d) engage in conduct that is prejudicial to the administration of justice;
(e) state or imply an ability to influence improperly a government agency or official or to achieve results by means that violate the Rules of Professional Conduct or other law; or
(f) knowingly assist a judge or judicial officer in conduct that is a violation of applicable rules of judicial conduct or other law.
(g) engage in conduct that the lawyer knows or reasonably should know is harassment or discrimination on the basis of race, sex, religion, national origin, ethnicity, disability, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status [or socioeconomic status] in conduct related to the practice of law. This paragraph does not limit the ability of a lawyer to accept, decline or withdraw from a representation in accordance with [Rule 1.16]. This paragraph does not preclude legitimate advice or advocacy consistent with these Rules.
COMMENT ON RULE 8.4
[1] Lawyers are subject to discipline when they violate or attempt to violate the Rules of Professional Conduct, knowingly assist or induce another to do so or do so through the acts of another, as when they request or instruct an agent to do so on the lawyer's behalf. Paragraph (a), however, does not prohibit a lawyer from advising a client concerning action the client is legally entitled to take.
[2] Many kinds of illegal conduct reflect adversely on fitness to practice law, such as offenses involving fraud and the offense of willful failure to file an income tax return. However, some kinds of offenses carry no such implication. Traditionally, the distinction was drawn in terms of offenses involving "moral turpitude." That concept can be construed to include offenses concerning some matters of personal morality, such as adultery and comparable offenses, that have no specific connection to fitness for the practice of law. Although a lawyer is personally answerable to the entire criminal law, a lawyer should be professionally answerable only for offenses that indicate lack of those characteristics relevant to law practice. Offenses involving violence, dishonesty, breach of trust, or serious interference with the administration of justice are in that category. A pattern of repeated offenses, even ones of minor significance when considered separately, can indicate indifference to legal obligation.
[3] Discrimination and harassment by lawyers in violation of paragraph (g) undermine confidence in the legal profession and the legal system. Such discrimination includes harmful verbal or physical conduct that manifests bias or prejudice towards others. Harassment includes sexual harassment and derogatory or demeaning verbal or physical conduct. Sexual harassment includes unwelcome sexual advances, requests for sexual favors, and other unwelcome verbal or physical conduct of a sexual nature. The substantive law of antidiscrimination and anti-harassment statutes and case law may guide application of paragraph (g).
[4] Conduct related to the practice of law includes representing clients; interacting with witnesses, coworkers, court personnel, lawyers and others while engaged in the practice of law; operating or managing a law firm or law practice; and participating in bar association, business or social activities in connection with the practice of law. Lawyers may engage in conduct undertaken to promote diversity and inclusion without violating this Rule by, for example, implementing initiatives aimed at recruiting, hiring, retaining and advancing diverse employees or sponsoring diverse law student organizations.
[5] A trial judge’s finding that peremptory challenges were exercised on a discriminatory basis does not alone establish a violation of paragraph (g). A lawyer does not violate paragraph (g) by limiting the scope or subject matter of the lawyer’s practice or by limiting the lawyer’s practice to members of underserved populations in accordance with these Rules and other law. A lawyer may charge and collect reasonable fees and expenses for a representation. Rule 1.5(a). Lawyers also should be mindful of their professional obligations under Rule 6.1 to provide legal services to those who are unable to pay, and their obligation under Rule 6.2 not to avoid appointments from a tribunal except for good cause. See Rule 6.2(a), (b) and (c). A lawyer’s representation of a client does not constitute an endorsement by the lawyer of the client’s views or activities. See Rule 1.2(b).
[6] A lawyer may refuse to comply with an obligation imposed by law upon a good faith belief that no valid obligation exists. The provisions of Rule 1.2(d) concerning a good faith challenge to the validity, scope, meaning or application of the law apply to challenges of legal regulation of the practice of law.
[7] Lawyers holding public office assume legal responsibilities going beyond those of other citizens. A lawyer's abuse of public office can suggest an inability to fulfill the professional role of lawyers. The same is true of abuse of positions of private trust such as trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, agent and officer, director or manager of a corporation or other organization.

RULE 8.5:	DISCIPLINARY AUTHORITY; CHOICE OF LAW
Maintaining The Integrity Of The Profession
(a) Disciplinary Authority. A lawyer admitted to practice in this jurisdiction is subject to the disciplinary authority of this jurisdiction, regardless of where the lawyer's conduct occurs. A lawyer not admitted in this jurisdiction is also subject to the disciplinary authority of this jurisdiction if the lawyer provides or offers to provide any legal services in this jurisdiction. A lawyer may be subject to the disciplinary authority of both this jurisdiction and another jurisdiction for the same conduct.
(b) Choice of Law. In any exercise of the disciplinary authority of this jurisdiction, the rules of professional conduct to be applied shall be as follows:
(1) for conduct in connection with a matter pending before a tribunal, the rules of the jurisdiction in which the tribunal sits, unless the rules of the tribunal provide otherwise; and
(2) for any other conduct, the rules of the jurisdiction in which the lawyer’s conduct occurred, or, if the predominant effect of the conduct is in a different jurisdiction, the rules of that jurisdiction shall be applied to the conduct. A lawyer shall not be subject to discipline if the lawyer’s conduct conforms to the rules of a jurisdiction in which the lawyer reasonably believes the predominant effect of the lawyer’s conduct will occur.
COMMENT ON RULE 8.5
Disciplinary Authority
[1] It is longstanding law that the conduct of a lawyer admitted to practice in this jurisdiction is subject to the disciplinary authority of this jurisdiction. Extension of the disciplinary authority of this jurisdiction to other lawyers who provide or offer to provide legal services in this jurisdiction is for the protection of the citizens of this jurisdiction. Reciprocal enforcement of a jurisdiction’s disciplinary findings and sanctions will further advance the purposes of this Rule. See, Rules 6 and 22, ABA Model Rules for Lawyer Disciplinary Enforcement. A lawyer who is subject to the disciplinary authority of this jurisdiction under Rule 8.5(a) appoints an official to be designated by this Court to receive service of process in this jurisdiction. The fact that the lawyer is subject to the disciplinary authority of this jurisdiction may be a factor in determining whether personal jurisdiction may be asserted over the lawyer for civil matters.
Choice of Law
[2] A lawyer may be potentially subject to more than one set of rules of professional conduct which impose different obligations. The lawyer may be licensed to practice in more than one jurisdiction with differing rules, or may be admitted to practice before a particular court with rules that differ from those of the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the lawyer is licensed to practice. Additionally, the lawyer’s conduct may involve significant contacts with more than one jurisdiction.
[3] Paragraph (b) seeks to resolve such potential conflicts. Its premise is that minimizing conflicts between rules, as well as uncertainty about which rules are applicable, is in the best interest of both clients and the profession (as well as the bodies having authority to regulate the profession). Accordingly, it takes the approach of (i) providing that any particular conduct of a lawyer shall be subject to only one set of rules of professional conduct, (ii) making the determination of which set of rules applies to particular conduct as straightforward as possible, consistent with recognition of appropriate regulatory interests of relevant jurisdictions, and (iii) providing protection from discipline for lawyers who act reasonably in the face of uncertainty.
[4] Paragraph (b)(1) provides that as to a lawyer's conduct relating to a proceeding pending before a tribunal, the lawyer shall be subject only to the rules of the jurisdiction in which the tribunal sits unless the rules of the tribunal, including its choice of law rule, provide otherwise. As to all other conduct, including conduct in anticipation of a proceeding not yet pending before a tribunal, paragraph (b)(2) provides that a lawyer shall be subject to the rules of the jurisdiction in which the lawyer’s conduct occurred, or, if the predominant effect of the conduct is in another jurisdiction, the rules of that jurisdiction shall be applied to the conduct. In the case of conduct in anticipation of a proceeding that is likely to be before a tribunal, the predominant effect of such conduct could be where the conduct occurred, where the tribunal sits or in another jurisdiction.
[5] When a lawyer’s conduct involves significant contacts with more than one jurisdiction, it may not be clear whether the predominant effect of the lawyer’s conduct will occur in a jurisdiction other than the one in which the conduct occurred. So long as the lawyer’s conduct conforms to the rules of a jurisdiction in which the lawyer reasonably believes the predominant effect will occur, the lawyer shall not be subject to discipline under this Rule. With respect to conflicts of interest, in determining a lawyer’s reasonable belief under paragraph (b)(2), a written agreement between the lawyer and client that reasonably specifies a particular jurisdiction as within the scope of that paragraph may be considered if the agreement was obtained with the client’s informed consent confirmed in the agreement.
[6] If two admitting jurisdictions were to proceed against a lawyer for the same conduct, they should, applying this rule, identify the same governing ethics rules. They should take all appropriate steps to see that they do apply the same rule to the same conduct, and in all events should avoid proceeding against a lawyer on the basis of two inconsistent rules.
[7] The choice of law provision applies to lawyers engaged in transnational practice, unless international law, treaties or other agreements between competent regulatory authorities in the affected jurisdictions provide otherwise.
